It's not just that this film is a bloated remake of a quick, clean, near-perfect minimalist thriller. It's not that much of the added material (particularly the internal affairs sub-plot) feels tacked-on and unnecessary. It's not even that Pacino's character is a toned-down shell of the dangerously off-kilter detective of the original, that one of the more complicated characters (Frya Selmer/Tanya Francke) has been reduced down to set dressing, or that the ending ruins the film's moral atmosphere. It's the fact that Nolan, a sublimely talented director, is unable to coax a believable performance from any of his leads. Pacino does the method-acting bit again, taking it over the top in every single scene; Hilary Swank plays a pale imitation of her better roles as the down-to-earth hometown girl; and Robin Williams--well, he's Robin Williams. The kids in this film, Katharine Isabelle and Jonathan Jackson, turn in fine performances that, while hardly career-makers (which they couldn't be, considering how far their roles have been pared down), are a refreshing change of pace from their adult contemporaries' mugging. See the film for their far-too-short performances, but make sure you rent it, and don't pay too much to do so</review_text>
It's not just that this film is a bloated remake of a quick, clean, near-perfect minimalist thriller. It's not that much of the added material (particularly the internal affairs sub-plot) feels tacked-on and unnecessary. It's not even that Pacino's character is a toned-down shell of the dangerously off-kilter detective of the original, that one of the more complicated characters (Frya Selmer/Tanya Francke) has been reduced down to set dressing, or that the ending ruins the film's moral atmosphere. It's the fact that Nolan, a sublimely talented director, is unable to coax a believable performance from any of his leads. Pacino does the method-acting bit again, taking it over the top in every single scene; Hilary Swank plays a pale imitation of her better roles as the down-to-earth hometown girl; and Robin Williams--well, he's Robin Williams. The kids in this film, Katharine Isabelle and Jonathan Jackson, turn in fine performances that, while hardly career-makers (which they couldn't be, considering how far their roles have been pared down), are a refreshing change of pace from their adult contemporaries' mugging. See the film for their far-too-short performances, but make sure you rent it, and don't pay too much to do so</review_text>
I have rented this video for the sake of a trip down Memory Lane. Of course, fourteen years produce a great shift in gullibility. I hated this video for its teaching of American ideology in perhaps the least open manner imaginable. For example, in</review_text>
this is another story that I don't know if I like it or not because Amazon.com never sent it too me.  this has happened about 4/5 times.  While usually I have no problem getting movies, sometimes I do.  sending them e-mails doesn't seem to work.  If they didn't have the best prices for movies, I'd leave</review_text>
hard to Believe that Sidney Poitier went from Directing a Classic Comedy like "Stir Crazy" to this Music Video not ready for MTV type of Film.very 80's Campy&it was Corny then as it is now</review_text>
If you are a Christian, this book isn't for you. It is full of blashphemy, concluding that we must "... forgive God" and that we must love God "... even if He isnt perfect". Kusher even has the will to say that "...God would not be God..." without our love for Him. At one point he reduces God to an aminal saying that in the garden of Eden, when God said "...let US make man in OUR image" he was speking to animals and creation. Kusher explains that God created the world, and in the next paragraph that we came by evolution.Since when was God in need of forgiveness? Isnt it that "... God so loved the world" and it wasnt us that loved God? I have no words in describing this book. It is full of error, because it does not base it self on the Gospel of Jesus Christ. All this book does is frees you from the thought that you are a sinner, and that it isnt your fault, and that actully you are a good person. Why do bad things happen to good people? Wrong question. There are no good people in the world in the first place. " for all have sinned and come short of the glory of God..." The world is in sin. The world DOES NOT HAVE GOOD PEOPLE!! Only by the grace of God, through faith in Jesus Christ you are made righteous. I beg you in the name of Jesus Christ to stay away from this book. It hasnt helped 4 million people, but it lied to them. Kusher, please turn from your ways and come to Jesus, then will you understand the life question "WHY"</review_text>
This romantic comedy was charming, funny, and clever. I recommend it to anyone who doesn't have a problem with heavy British accents. (If you do, try it with captions). It was fun, funny, and a nice pick-me-up when one needs a lift</review_text>
Having avoided seeing this film, I found that the mistake of sending my partner to the rental store on his on, brought "Tuesday..."unbiden into our home.My aversion to Oprah and her ilk, does not cloud my dislike of this film. A bad film is a bad film.Devoid of any real plot and hampered by some very poor acting on the part of all concerned, and directionless directing, this film should not be seen by anyone who values the aforementioned,To me a reasonable premise should move a story forward. Something should occur, my interest should be engaged. This film takes reams of pre-packaged aphorisms and greeting card verses, and attempts to build the plot from words alone. It is as if someone picked up the telephone book and said, "Hey,this book is full of words, lets make a movie."In a way a movie about the different lives of those listed in the telephone book would be more interesting.To be honest, Jack Lemmon was not very good in this film. He played the same character he always did. Just older. Hank Azaria was just awful. He talked as if his mouth was filled with stones, and was wooden and expressionless. Maybe he was too embarrased to be there. As to the other actor's; well they filled up the space nicely.The look of the film was cheap and of the movie of the week quality. The sprayed on snow in a winter scene looked as fake as it was. They even covered the green leaves on the trees. Some better acting, some good R rated dialogue, and maybe some nudity would have spiced up this film. As it stands,however, it will only be of interest to fans of Oprah and Dr.Phil, etc. The purveyors of our national state of pity and feeling soory for ourselves.It is seldom that we find car keys under our chairs, but films such as this perpetuate the myth that a few nice phrases, a good cry, and a genial talk-show presenter will somehow make it all better.I,for one, think that a nice cuppa is more beneficial. Then pull the finger out, and just get on with it.(To the grammar and form police: I did have this in paragraphs, but the editing process scrunched it all together. Sorry</review_text>
This video did not live up to my expectations.  I have a five-year-old Chihuahua who is somewhat afraid of people and lunges and bites when strangers get too close.The description of the video promised a simple behavior modification program to help deal with his aggression.  Instead, Ian Dunbar simply says that behavior like this in old dogs is very difficult deal with, and focuses on puppy socialization in the video.Well, that's great if I had a puppy, but I adopted an older dog, and I need help now.I don't recommend this video for owners of older dogs with biting problems.  If you have a puppy, it might be somewhat helpful, but there are better books</review_text>
Having avoided seeing this film, I found that the mistake of sending my partner to the rental store on his on, brought "Tuesday..."unbiden into our home.My aversion to Oprah and her ilk, does not cloud my dislike of this film. A bad film is a bad film.Devoid of any real plot and hampered by some very poor acting on the part of all concerned, and directionless directing, this film should not be seen by anyone who values the aforementioned,To me a reasonable premise should move a story forward. Something should occur, my interest should be engaged. This film takes reams of pre-packaged aphorisms and greeting card verses, and attempts to build the plot from words alone. It is as if someone picked up the telephone book and said, "Hey,this book is full of words, lets make a movie."In a way a movie about the different lives of those listed in the telephone book would be more interesting.To be honest, Jack Lemmon was not very good in this film. He played the same character he always did. Just older. Hank Azaria was just awful. He talked as if his mouth was filled with stones, and was wooden and expressionless. Maybe he was too embarrased to be there. As to the other actor's; well they filled up the space nicely.The look of the film was cheap and of the movie of the week quality. The sprayed on snow in a winter scene looked as fake as it was. They even covered the green leaves on the trees. Some better acting, some good R rated dialogue, and maybe some nudity would have spiced up this film. As it stands,however, it will only be of interest to fans of Oprah and Dr.Phil, etc. The purveyors of our national state of pity and feeling soory for ourselves.It is seldom that we find car keys under our chairs, but films such as this perpetuate the myth that a few nice phrases, a good cry, and a genial talk-show presenter will somehow make it all better.I,for one, think that a nice cuppa is more beneficial. Then pull the finger out, and just get on with it.(To the grammar and form police: I did have this in paragraphs, but the editing process scrunched it all together. Sorry</review_text>
I hate lawyers.What is a lawyer, anyway? Basically: it's a telemarketer in a decent suit, a guy who would be hawking the latest Ronco Hair-in-a-Can super-duper late night special to folks in Akron over his plantronic headset, only he won the genetic lottery and got shot out of an upper-middle class womb.Shakespeare said it first and best: "First, let's kill all the lawyers!". Former Enron uber-dealmaker John Wing put a little fast-times Houston spin on that one: "get all the lawyers in a room---and shoot 'em!---in the mouth, so you *can't* miss!"Exactly. Anyway, "The Firm" is a flick that purports to make the world of high-priced yappers jaw-rippingly exciting, so I was probably all amped up to despise it.But not really: back before I dug into a gig with the Dark Side in high finance, back when I was hefting a backpack over the sodden campus of my old alma mater, I briefly considered going into law: briefly, for about an hour. It was a desperate time, and I needed money.Why did I consider walking Hell's Highway, if only for an instant? Because John Grisham, boring lawyer-turned-ripping-potboiler-writer-turned-back-into-boring-lawyer, a kind of Tom Clancy for the paper-pusher and green-eyeshade set, made it all sound pretty damned funky (and lucrative! Hey, dig that BMW 7 series, baby, beep beep!) in his engrossing little novel "The Firm": granted, I've read better prose on the backs of cereal boxes, but it held my attention.I mean, seriously: you're 19, and the whole flying out on the corporate Lear to Grand Cayman and switching out briefcases full of cash sounds kinda cool. And strippers, man, plenty of strippers. Oh, and did someone mention a BMW?What's the difference between a lawyer and a snake? The snake at least has the decency to hiss before it sinks its fangs into your a**.Now it's true: Grisham writes like Kim Jong Il sings, but---in "The Firm", anyway---he was a master craftsman at moving things along at a bristling pace, from the pedestrian---hotshot Law School whiz kid gets picked up by a Memphis white-shoe law firm---to the Pretty Damned Atrocious, all while keeping the pressure ratcheted up with a dense, suffocating sense of malice.Grisham, like Michael Crichton, isn't a prose genius: he's not even mediocre. But he writes for film, and "The Firm" cried out for cinematic treatment.So it's baffling that, with all the right Stuff---Tom Cruise as winsome lead Mitch McDeere, Gene Hackman doing his chain-drinking Gene Hackman thang as the corrupt (but ultimately worn-out and pathetic) senior partner, and Sydney Pollack helming it up---that the big-screen treatment of "The Firm" is such a yawner.Talk about contempt of court.Pollack takes all that intricately woven little Grisham-plot and barfs big ugly chunks of it up on the screen. At its guts, really, "The Firm" was really nothing more than the Big Career Nightmare: I've bet the farm on this gig, I'm getting big money, I'm working like a fiend, my wife is having trouble remembering my name, and evidently I'm not doing tax-deals for loaded clients---I'm doing money laundering for The Mob.Pollack just mangles the whole thing, convolutes the simple, and renders up a flick that will have you checking your watch and yawning. Casting is part of the problem: Cruise does his thing, running around Memphis with his briefcase. Hackman drinks a lot and exudes pure Armani-clad sleaze: "The Firm" is all funny-wrinkles when he's onscreen, but hey, a man can only do so much.Jeanne Tripplehorn (Cruise's squeeze), who plays Lara San Giacomo when she's not playing Tripplehorn (seriously, google the two of 'em: astounding!) is a bitter old battleaxe who made me want to stick forks in my eyes. Wilford Brimley is just plain wrong as The Firm's security chief: too bald, too cracker, too rotund, too silly, too low-end, to do the role justice.Holly Hunter is even worse: Hunter is one of those eighties thangs who got pumped up as Something Sexy, which is baffling, given that she's about 3'8, and has all the sex appeal of an Oompah-Loompah. It doesn't help that she's a big, ugly Southern stereotype, the caricature most denizens of dumpy Michigan towns imagine Southerners to be. You want her to die: she doesn't. Pollack wants us to think she's clever and funny. She isn't.Ed Harris, I think, is in this movie. So is Hal Holbrook, which kinda ruins everything, because everytime Hal Holbrook is in a movie you know you're dealing with a bunch of friggin' crooks.Anyway, the coup de grace to the stupidity is the entrance, Deus Ex Machina, of Paul Sorvino (Don Morolto---what kind of Goombah name is dat, anyway? Somebody call Tony Soprano!), who takes this juggernaut of boredom from the merely stupid to the totally ridiculous.If you wanna see Tom Cruise running around Memphis with his briefcase for two hours, by all means belly up to the bar.Otherwise, case dismissed.JS</review_text>
Great movie but CD not perfoming in the last few scenes.  It gets stuck or restarts itself.  Very frustrating and more frustrating to have to return new CD</review_text>
the movie title itself says a lot, the movie itself is a total scam, fools people to rent or to watch it. a horrible directing, script and performance. you'd better jump off empire state building in the late afternoon if you feel bored than watching this brain-dean bad movie</review_text>
This movie is very mildly amusing for about ten minutes.  Yes, it is slightly interesting to see the Cannes environment, but not enough to watch this film. It could be a cure for insomnia, though.  Fans who are looking forward to seeing their favorite actors in a satire will be disappointed.  You can count in seconds the amount of time any famous actor is on the screen, and it's really just very boring. All those fans of Johnny Depp: be particularly warned. He may have co-star billing, but blink and you'll miss him</review_text>
When a movie producer in 1998 foregoes available spectrum of colors and technology opting to feed his audience grain-black, white and jittery gray, the result had better be good. That fraction of members of the technicolor-drunk general viewing audience who will even stipulate to watch such a thing do so at decided perils of time and money, push Play alongside Mr. Benefit-Of-A-Doubt and strain to see if it works. Thus begins the argument of effect and more specifically, that of color. The problem with a black and white movie is that very few movies that resort to that, despite some grand intention, DO NOT WORK, or, in the alternative, DO NOT WORK AS WELL. Citing two examples - SIN CITY which is near-tolerable acting paired with an absurd choice of black and white, tantamount to robbery, and GOOD NIGHT AMERICA which is all and about the same. The dilemma with black and white productions is that regardless of how well it comes together, there seems always a thread of an argument in the back of one's mind that if one must resort to black and white to make one's point, one might be better served as a charcoal artist. Color is the medium of life. From a budgetary perspective, black and white films save money as the 'challenges' of color, which, in a good feature, can be excessive, are thus eliminated. Yet complications arise - for instance - I wasn't sure if that was blood or motor oil dripping from that guy's hand. Similarly, the entire cast in SIN CITY could have been wearing hot pink, in shades of course, and we would never know. Yet of course this is no excuse to dislike a movie - or is it? One wonders, however, that, if PI production would have had more money, would they have opted for color? Moot point. It's done.Notwithstanding the obvious that I don't prefer black and white movies and incidentally don't know lots of people who do, PI, although a courageous artistic attempt with significant merits ranging from creative camera work, clever symbolism and high-octane guts, seems to lanquish for other reasons. Despite PI's visceral intensity which is delibertaely hot-wired throughout, spinning out scenes that sizzle the nerves, after Max's third or fourth headache it gives up the ghost. As as result, the movie stays earthbound, weighted down by a mediocre revolving-door plotline (obsessing man chases number grail looking for key to life while beset by outside forces including the recycling feeds of his own troubled mind), unremarkable narrative with a gem here and there, failing repetitive effect and thin, uninspiring 2-D support cast, leaving the movie wanting for depth and intelligent character interplay. Unresolved imagery and scenes lent the impression that this creative endeavor was a bit out of control and ad-hoc which is no fatal flaw in and of itself but in this case was signficantly detractive. Despite a reasonably decent stockpile of cinematic victories the battle wasn't won. The themes inspiring PI have excellent potential however this movie trafficked the runway like an antiquated flying machine - airborne one second, belly down the next. As a fine creative exercise, the creators are praised for their effort and bravery - PI is as bodacious as a skunk engaging rush-hour traffic and commands the watcher's attention until that undefined moment when boredom sets in. Contains subterranean theme seedlings which likely served as brain fertilizer for the subsequent more advanced spin-off -  "A Beautiful Mind"</review_text>
When I first saw the previews, I thought that it looked very interesting and could be a good movie...of course, I thought the same about White Noise.  I guess the lesson here is that Hollywood has trouble making a good movie from beginning to end (like The Sixth Sense).  I think Hollywood is more interested in making a good TRAILER than they are a good movie so they can make a lot of money in the box office.  The Forgotten is no exception.  The first half an hour or so is very good and Joseph Ruben creates a creepy atmosphere with good performances from Julianne Moore and Dominic West.  However, the movie quickly begins to fall apart (like White Noise) and becomes less and less believable.  I was hoping for a logical explanation, especially since the box of the movie read: "The biggest jaw-dropper since The Sixth Sense."  However, the explanation is flimsy and unrealistic and my jaw only dropped at how ridiculous it was.  Nothing at all like when the ending came for Sixth Sense.  I bought this movie for $2 so I can't complain but so much, but am still amazed at Hollywood still struggles to make an entertaining, cohesive movie without so many holes.  The only thing that is "forgotten" is I have forgotten when creepy, psychological movies were good</review_text>
Admittedly the film is clever and the acting is good and it has it's moments of entertainment, BUT overall it's long and pretty boring.  It seems it would have been better suited as a play, which apparently it was originally.  I had just finished re-reading Romeo and Juliet when I rented this, thinking I was still in a Shakespeare mood, but this didn't do it for me.  I suppose if I had just finished reading or watching Hamlet, it would have been better.  My favorite parts are Oldman's silent scientific discoveries, completely amusing.  Couldn't wait for the movie to end, honestly</review_text>
I picked up the book at a yardsale without knowing much about it, and absolutely loved it! It is so smart, funny, and heartbreaking, without ever being sappy. So, naturally, I was curious about the movie too. I figured that because Ephron had written the screenplay too, not much could go wrong. And while the story line followed the book more or less, the movie turned out terrible. I could not have been more disappointed!! First of all, Jack Nicholson is completely miscast, because he essentially plays himself (as usual), not the *interesting* guy that Mark is supposed to be. He is the opposite of charming, funny, tender, lovable, i.e. somebody that the character of the wife (Rachel) would fall so deeply in love with and trust so completely. You suspect all along that he is a cad; therefore, Rachel's utter shock at his betrayal doesn't make sense. Besides, he is too old for the role! Meryl Streep is annoyingly twitchy, but much better in her role as Rachel. Still, she can't carry the movie alone, and her love scenes with Nicholson are flat; there is no spark there. I wonder how happy Ephron was with the movie adaptation of her novel, and whether she really did write all the scenes. The wedding scene, where Rachel has doubts about marying Mark and spends what feels like 5 hours in a room alone agonizing, while the wedding guests wait, is out of place, not to mention boring, not to mention heavy handed. A total dud</review_text>
This movie made me sick to my stomach. Here we have a woman like Nora Ephron, a woman with professional job skills and talent and when she marries, she turns into a needy, desperate women whom evidently believes her own self-worth is determined by having babies, one after another. I ususally love all of Meryl's movies, but I could not stand seeing her turn into a needy, always pregnant &quot;homemaker&quot;. If I were a man, I would have run awary screaming, too</review_text>
By the time you see the ending, you'll already be wishing that you hadn't watched this movie</review_text>
To be honest with you I thought the movie was really bad. the acting was ok but the only good part about the movie was that ricky (Rodney Eastman) was in the movie. (for about 5 mins) but i would not suggest renting this movie and waisting 4 dollars</review_text>
The Fridays gang steals some diamonds.  Mike Epps is not Chris Tucker no matter how hard he tries to be.  His constant whinning is enough to ride my last nerve.  Plus, everything about the movie is just campy and just wholly unbelieveable that I don't know where to begin.  Whatever you do don't buy or rent this garbage-wait to catch it on TBS or something</review_text>
I was very disappointed. The acting by the principles was fine, but I think the only thing that saved this movie for me was the choreography by Bob Fosse. I think what really turned me off was the omission of a few great songs. The following tunes from the original show were left out - Near To You, We've Got To Think About the Game, A Man Doesn't Know. And Applegate's tune, The Good Old Days, was abridged. A new tune, There's Something About an Empty Chair, was added to replace Near To You, but it was very weak. I wish someone would remake this wonderful show as they've done recently with Music Man and Bye Bye Birdie</review_text>
I'm sorry, but this movie is clearly nothing more than and overdramaticized and historically inaccurate retelling of the story much more riotiously and enjoyably portrayed in the film "Dick." "Dick" is funny, this is not. I'm sorry, but Dustin Hoffman simply does not have the acting chops to stand up to someone like Kirsten Dunst (or that level of indefatigable cuteness).Just go rent "Dick" instead. You'll thank me, yourself, and those fine ladies who saved our country</review_text>
I'm surprised by all the praise this movie gets here at Amazon and beyond. There really wasn't much here I liked. The soundtrack was the usual "pap" you'd expect from a family friendly movie, though the sets were nice. It seems this movie was just miscast. Mel just doesn't do comedy all that well, at least for a lead role. Jame Garner, the reason I bought this seems more like a bystander. And Jodie is Jodie and I never bought for a moment she was her character.Although the cast is a powerhouse (on paper), sadly the chemistry never really works and the jokes are just cornball. An example: There was a sequence when Bret asks his friends (who are standing behind him) to whistle to reveal themselves to some bandits he was confronting; which as it turns out they are unable to do. Instead Jodie and James, blow madly, just like the movie.This movie reminds me a HELL of a lot like ''The Three Amigo's''; on paper you would think it couldn't miss, but on film it's painful to watch</review_text>
I imagine this movie might be funny if you're really into dog shows.  I'm not, so I couldn't tell you.  Mediocre at best.  "This is Spinal Tap" was better</review_text>
My main motivation in seeing this movie was to better understand the reputation of Echo Park, a little area nestled next to downtown Los Angeles. I moved to Echo Park in late 2004.It's depressing - the vicious cycle of drugs, dropping-out, and  domestic violence. And it's all here, told through the eyes of Latina teenagers. It was easy to see the woman's hand on the direction of the piece with the important roles that women played.I didn't care for the movie as a whole because it felt sluggish and uneven. I also found myself not caring about any of the characters. So-and-so gets shot, la la loo goes to jail. Whatever!As an aside, though, the evil neighborhood druglord was called Ernesto. It turns out my next-door neighbor in real-life is also called Ernesto. Luckily, it's just a coincidence</review_text>
I'm sorry, but this movie is clearly nothing more than and overdramaticized and historically inaccurate retelling of the story much more riotiously and enjoyably portrayed in the film "Dick." "Dick" is funny, this is not. I'm sorry, but Dustin Hoffman simply does not have the acting chops to stand up to someone like Kirsten Dunst (or that level of indefatigable cuteness).Just go rent "Dick" instead. You'll thank me, yourself, and those fine ladies who saved our country</review_text>
Michael Moore can be really funny at times, but most people should not take this goofball too seriously.  About half way through 'The Big One', I turned it off because I did not find it the least bit funny and I didn't know where Moore was going.  What is the point of putting in a pointless sequence where he is talking to the guitar player of Cheap Trick?  This is not one of his better films</review_text>
PRIVATE RESORT is the kind of movie that was geared towards young adult audiences in the mid-80s when sexual awareness and exposition were the hot ticket in theatres.  However, I'm sure this film is one that Johnny Depp, Hector Elizondo and Rob Morrow aren't proud to have on their resume.The movie's plot is slim, and neither Morrow or Depp have any screen presence in this early stage of their careers.  Elizondo tries gamely and pulls off a few laughs, but he's not at his best either.  Most of the film's laughs come from Leslie Hope as a slightly off kilter cosmic bimbo; Dody Goodman as a dotty old lady who knows karate and Tony Azito as a bumbling hotel security guard.  There's lots of slapstick, some of it works, most of it doesn't.  You can do better, folks</review_text>
If you've seen one you've seen them all. Uptight guy by chance meets quirky girl, she brings him out of his shell.Well, I bought this for like two dollars, and maybe it was worth it. I watch it like once a year. No special features on DVD worth mentioning.Ben Affleck is getting married, he has to fly down to the south from NY for the wedding. But things keep getting in his way. Forces of Nature. Also, he keeps running into, and can't seem to get away from, some weird chick (Bullock). Are these signs? Should he stop being so uptight, and go with this free-spirited chick? Or should he be an adult and get married and accept his Vanilla lifestyle?The acting in this movie is "meh", meaning Sandra has the same personality that she has in every movie; and Affleck sucks, as usual. The other small parts are well done, for the most part.The script is formulaic, and the cinematography at times is interesting. It's just another rom-com where the whacky girl brings the uptight guy out of his shell. The movie opens with a stripper scene, no nudity. There is also a pot-smoking scene in this movie. There is also a scene where Affleck strips at a gay bar. Just thought I'd throw that in, in case you're considering buying this for your teen daughter or something, and that kind of thing bothers you.You only need to buy this is you are a rom-com fanatic, or a big fan of either Affleck or Bullock. Otherwise this is completely forgettable.</review_text>
Ella Enchanted has been my favorite book for years and when I heard that they were going to make it into a movie, I was estatic. I marked the movie release date on my calander, got my tickets in advance, and waited on pins and needles on the way to the theater.The movie was a huge dissapointment. While I wasn't expecting the movie to be just like the book, I certainly wasn't expecting that. While the movie itself was funny and an overall good movie, I hated it because it was absolutley nothing like the book. The only common thread I found were the names of the characters and the fact that Ella was cursed from birth.I suggest that you go and read the book if you enjoyed the movie, it is far better with an increadible story line and an ending that still brings me to tears, despite the fact that I've read it over 100 times</review_text>
I was very disappointed after reading all the glowing reviews for this movie and then watching your average "bad guys on the run" movie.  Gee, Billy Bob Thornton plays a crazy bad guy who shoots people and he doesn't like cops at all; he even uses bad language!  A friend was watching it with me and he thought I was watching the Lifetime channel. This movie just plodded along down cliche boulevard</review_text>
While many of the details have been lost to time as well as the consumption of copious amounts of alcohol to numb the pain caused by the first 40 minutes or so of this celluloid nightmare, there is just enough in my memory to offer a carefully crafted, yet sharply vitriolic rebuke of this horror.In my more than four decades on this planet, there is only one film that caused such a level of disbelief, disgust and abhorrence that I actually walked out of a theater halfway through its showing. It was a film so onerous, pointless and unfunny, that it stands in the pantheon of some of the most colossal wastes of time, money and talent in the history of Western Civilization. That film is "Cabin Boy."To some, "Cabin Boy" may well serve as the cornerstone of an evening's entertainment, assuming the evening also features sock puppets and pirate hats made out of newspaper. Imagine watching someone pick at a zit for several hours then eat a sandwich. That's the kind of inventive, knee-slapping, laugh-out-loud fun you'll find in "Cabin Boy."Having some respect for Chris Elliott's work on the old Letterman Show on NBC, I was profoundly disappointed by this unspeakably inept attempt at humor. If it doesn't induce deep REM sleep, "Cabin Boy" will surely leave you either angry or depressed. One would venture to guess these were not the results Elliott intended.Letterman's genius-level cameo notwithstanding, "Cabin Boy" is about as funny as a prostate exam...without the "local" and the lube.</review_text>
After seeing some of the other Amazon reviews of this movie, and the fact that Jason Swartzman was in it (after having seen him for the first time in "Rushmore" - a wonderful film), I had to purchase a copy of this DVD for myself to view.  It's got a wonderful cast of fine actors, but I found this movie really dumb.  One critic on the DVD box claimed this was "Laugh Out Loud Funny."  Really?  What movie was he watching?  I strained a chuckle here and there, but that was about it for me.  The Lily Tomlin & Dustin Hoffman characters were particularly annoying as was the script.  I know this was supposed to be a satiristic movie, but I didn't find much to snicker about.</review_text>
I bought this DVD because a friend said it was one of the funniest films he had ever seen. We're still friends, but I'll never listen to one of his reviews again--our taste must not be compatible.My wife, daughter, and I seldom agree on anything but we unanimously consider this the worst movie we've ever seen. It's the only movie I've ever turned off before the end.On the plus side, watching most of this film has given me a new perspective on cinema. I used to think I knew bad movies. Now I know that most movies are at least pretty good, and it's only a very few that are truly bad. This is one of those very few bad films.Best in Show belongs to a genre of "comedies" that I find boring at best, but often cruel and mean. Other films of this type are "Waiting for Guffman", "Bottle Rocket", etc. If you enjoy watching pathetic people struggle then perhaps you'll appreciate this movie</review_text>
This was the movie that gave us The Brat Pack, a staple of a certain 80s cultural set.  The term Brat Pack was derived from an article writen by a journalist out one night with most of the men starring in St. Elmo's Fire on a boozy night of partying.  Since then the gals in the movie as well as a few others who weren't in the movie (Anthony Michael Hall, for example) suffered a bit of a ripple effect.  Here we will see all of them at their prime and at their peak of heart throb success on every teenage girl's bedroom wall.Out of all the dramedies of the John Hughes movies, this was the one I liked the least.  Maybe it was the fact that all the characters were so vain and self centered.  Maybe it was the fact that it was all so idealized seeing all of them trying to adjust to their lives after graduating college.  It was trying to be the next generation "Graduate" movie, and I didn't relate when my time came.  Maybe it had to do with the fact that I have been let down by many people and didn't have that network of friends in similar situations, and the isolation I felt during that first year adjusting to the outside world having left the nest of academia.  I guess I was just a little more bitter.  Plus, as my life was surrounded by work and little else, I didn't have all the dramas going on they did.That was kind of sad, the one scene where Rob Lowe goes back to his old frat house and they tell him they need someone like him to couch their team.  It proves you really can't go home again and there are some clinging to the past.  Not to mention embarrassing with that one gal who has managed to hold onto her virginity for so long and in one of the attempts to releive her of it Rob Lowe finds those enormous granny panties.This caputed more of a time in fashion and music than it did a mindset.  It's not a bad story, but the vain and self centered antics of the main characters left me cold.</review_text>
My main motivation in seeing this movie was to better understand the reputation of Echo Park, a little area nestled next to downtown Los Angeles. I moved to Echo Park in late 2004.It's depressing - the vicious cycle of drugs, dropping-out, and  domestic violence. And it's all here, told through the eyes of Latina teenagers. It was easy to see the woman's hand on the direction of the piece with the important roles that women played.I didn't care for the movie as a whole because it felt sluggish and uneven. I also found myself not caring about any of the characters. So-and-so gets shot, la la loo goes to jail. Whatever!As an aside, though, the evil neighborhood druglord was called Ernesto. It turns out my next-door neighbor in real-life is also called Ernesto. Luckily, it's just a coincidence</review_text>
I rented this on a whim and it brought back a lot of memories from my 1970s days in elementary school.  This video made its rounds in the public schools.  The songs are catchy and the film quality is good.But make no mistake, this is propaganda aimed at children.  I will not be showing it to my kids.Despite the freewheeling title, the message is that girls will find happiness only if they mimic boys.Case in point:  Atalanta, a princess, finds happiness when she competes with men in a footrace and when she rejects marriage so she can travel the world (on her father's horse).  She also designs and fabricates rocketships in her spare time.Juxtapose that story with another cartoon where a femine girl in a pink dress and curls is devoured by tigers when she follows the custom of "ladies first."  The tigers abide her request and throw her into a boiling cauldron.  The narrator advises us that the boiling girl makes a very tasty meal.Our "hosts", infant puppets voiced by Mel Brooks and Marlo Thomas, are revolting.  There should be a law against using Mel Brooks' voice for a baby.  Apparently, I repressed memories of these creatures, but seeing them again brought back the horror.  Needless to say, I fast forwarded through the disturbing puppetry.Overall, this DVD is fun for thirtysomethings but should be kept away from children</review_text>
This man is like Michael Bay.  Using high speed action sequences and terrible casting and script writing, the fact that Chris Tucker appears in this and almost every movie that the man makes signals a trend to do these as not so much movies as they are music video comedys only it's patheic and not funny, and that is also why the man who is now making X-Men 3 will cause that movie franchise to die a quick death at the movies.  The man is a joke</review_text>
Reality Bites seemed fresh when it was first released, giving voice to a generation - with the unfortunately derogative soubriquet of "X" - that was overeducated, underemployed, plagued by the flashy, trashy commercialism of MTV, and stunningly superficial in its wholehearted embrace of pop culture and rejection of serious moral or philosophical discourse it might have stumbled across in college.It was a good start because transitioning from the idyllic and unreal world of college to the crass, cruel arena of materialism can be tough, providing limitless opportunities for challenge and personal growth - the very stuff of real movies.  Instead we have a swan dive into a Pizza Hut commercial held together by a plot so shop-worn it would have been considered exhausted in 1930.Winona Ryder is winning as Lelaina, but one can only imagine the SATs of football players at a college where she is valedictorian.  Her "documentary" is appallingly narcissistic, reflecting the characteristic Gen X notion that - "if it's about me, it's art, and it's important."  Ethan Hawke does an excellent job as Troy, the very archetype of self-satisfied, supercilious entitlement.  We are expected to root for him, but it's hard to refrain from hoping he gets hit by a bus.Stiller, who directed - a talented fellow almost impossible to look at - plays Michael, the "anti-Troy."  Smooth, successful, and very much plugged into the contemporary franchising of Gen X culture - if culture is the right word - he's an executive at an MTV-ish corporation.  That he improves Lelaina's preposterous "documentary," rather than destroying its alleged artistic integrity, is the film's dirty little secret.Viewers surprised by who wins Lelaina's hand will also be stunned to learn that professional wrestling is fixed and Liberace was gay.  Indeed, when you strip away the thin veneer of pop culture references this is really a very traditional movie.  Janeane Garofalo is outstanding as always, and John Mahoney shines as the TV morning chat show host who looks sweet and avuncular on camera but is in fact, a bastard.  His performance says more about the likelihood of finding anything even remotely resembling reality in film - or on TV - than the rest of this film put together.In fact, reality is great, this picture would have benefited from some</review_text>
The Virgin Suicides starring Kristen Dunst, Josh Hartnett, Kathleen Turner and James Woods lacks depth and a convincing storyline. This film is directed by Sofia Coppola (Lost in Translation), I really tried to like this movie but I was fooling myself, you would think this movie would be a hidden gem because of the Coppola legacy but just because your father is Frances Ford Coppola doesn't mean you belong in the same category as best director of all-time. Sometimes magic does not stirke twice. How can all five sisters end up killing themselves, their homelife wasn't that unbearable, a lot of parents are religious, but that doesn't mean you'll wind up with thoughts of impending suicide. Kristen Dunst just gets on my nerves, her acting is the same in every film. Don't believe the hype, The Virgin Suicides is not a groundbreaking, poetic film</review_text>
The move is one of my favorite sci-fi films but this is the worst job of trasferring to DVD that I have seen. There are no special features and NO CHAPTER STOPS, this is as if they copied a video tape to a DVD. I could accecpt it being full frame but if I had known that it was this cheap a transfer I would not have purchased it</review_text>
Man, I don't know what the other reviewers of this movie were smoking, but it should be illegal!  This is, first off, a terrible DVD: 4:3 (full screen) format, with a dark, muddy picture.  Worse, the plot is typical, predictable, and poorly written.  Other than looking for glimpses of Teri Hatcher's body, sitting through this fiasco is a total bore.  I was also surprised at how bad Teri's acting was in this movie, since I've seen her do much better in things she was in previous to this.  That is probably the fault of the director, Erik Anjou, a third-rate director (at best!) who has done a total of two movies and one documentary.  Gee, I wonder why he isn't in more demand (NOT!)!I can enjoy "B" movies, and bad movies, but this one is just so totally non-involving that it is not even good enough to laugh at.  I can't imagine that this mess was released on DVD for any reason other than to cash in on Teri Hatcher's current popularity, and to suck the cash out of people who are anxious to see a younger (29 year-old) Teri Hatcher nude.Rent this, if you must, but, wow, there is no reason anyone should want to buy a movie this bad</review_text>
Almost unbelievably bad, except I saw the remake of 'Shaft,' which should have been a forewarning.  This is like a comic book for filmgoers.  No, not a graphic novel adapted to the screen.  More like a comic book for kids, that you'd be embarassed to own at any age.  Doubly offensive is the high quality soul music that is on the soundtrack, a travesty to the nth degree.</review_text>
Waste of money.  Waste of time.  Well-known cast.  Amateurish direction.  Plotless.  Politically correct to the point of being stupid.  The film's incessant attempts at humor fail.  Eric Roberts' character laughs-off his grave circumstance throughout most of the film.  He is self-important, Godless and emotionally false.  It's difficult to empathize with such an unrealisitic character.  The best performances in this film were given by Gregory Harrison and Lee Grant.  The best scene is Gregory Harrison and Eric Roberts' passionate farewell kiss.  Most authentic moment in the film: Lee Grant's reaction to her dying son being carried off.  Very difficult to watch through in one-sitting because it's so repetitive and vapid. You will wait and wait for something to happen and nothing ever does until the final moments.  If you choose to waste your time with this film, you'll be sorry you did</review_text>
this has got to be the WORST film I've ever seen. its not sad. Its not funny, jest over blow mellow dramatic garbage. I don't have any sympathy toward nick in this movie, because he does give you anything to work with or want to keep him. the actor is the worst of all. i cant tell if he's sad in some seens, or angry or jest retarded. I've seen some sad movies but this one jest sucks, I guess its aimed at a different time of homosexuals instead of the present. it probably worked better back in 96'. but this movie is SO SO SO BAD. its embarrassing. do not rent it or buy it or view it on television.NOTE'S: THIS FILM HAD  SOME GREAT TALENTA song from Olivia Newton Jon, and (one of my most personal favorites) Mila AND my favorite comedians Margaret Cho. She's to good but...why this film, she (and Mila ) are to good for some want to be tearjerker movie like this.</review_text>
Therese, Lux, Mary, Bonnie and Cecilia make up the five Lisbon girls, ages 13, 14, 15, 16 and 17. Cecilia, the youngest, lives in her sisters shadows because they are all older and of much more interest to their male neighbors. As a cry for help, she slits her wrists and lays down in the bathtub, she survived the incident. After a psychiatrist highly impresses upon the strict Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon that it would be benificial for Cecilia to be exposed to environments which have boys her own age, Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon decide to allow the girls to throw the one and only Lisbon party. Some of the neighborhood's boys are invited over and while the party is in session, Cecilia is pretty inanimate, sitting on the couch while her sisters flirt, talk and laugh. Midway through the party, Cecilia asks to be excused and Mrs. Lisbon - though somewhat reluctantly - allows it. Cecilia goes up to her room (on the second floor of a two-story house) and jumps out the window, landing on the spiked fence on the front lawn of the Lisbon house. In this way, Cecilia Lisbon commited suicide. Only four girls remain.The act which Cecilia committed did not go at all unnoticed. The father saw her immediately, the party ended there and all of the boys went home rather glum. Four of the Lisbon's neighbors, four young boys, suffered a rapidly growing obsession with the Lisbon girls, who were beautiful and a total mystery to the outside world. They got hold of Cecilia's diary and tried to explain why she committed suicide. The eldest decided Cecilia was a dreamer, and she did not think she would fall when she jumped out her window, she thought she would fly.With their youngest sister gone, the remaining Lisbon girls grow closer to each other, stranding themselves further from the outside world. When school starts again, they attempt to go on acting as if nothing happened, not ever mentioning their youngest sister. The run-of-the-mill awkward act is taken part by the rest of the school however. The usual profuse apology to the mention of the word "death" and the like.Trip Fontaine is the most popular guy in school, the object of desire to all of the girls at school... Except for the Lisbon girls, which is of no importance to Trip until he sets eyes on Lux. Trip cannot help but be enchanted by her flawless beauty. In the beginning, he is unsuccessful in his quest to even catch her attention for she bluntly shows she's not interested. But after his consistent courtship, Lux falls for his charming ways. Trip then attempts to convince Mr. Lisbon to let him and three of his football team pals take the Lisbon daughters to Homecoming. After Mr. Lisbon talks to his wife, he agrees to Trip's request, knowing nothing but Trip's sincerity and claimed honorable intentions, on the understanding that Trip have all of the Lisbon girls returned to the house by curfew.After Trip explains the situation to his football peers, he gives in to those who bribe him the most handsomely. Meanwhile, the Lisbon girls are picking out fabric for the dresses they shall wear to the Homecoming Dance. Though one pattern is used for all four dresses, each dress looks unique when concentrating on detail. Once they pick up the girls, they stop midway to the Homecoming in order to smoke, Lux being the only girl volunteering to smoke.They then drive to the dance. Trip and Lux sneak away and sneak swallows of alcohol. Another one of the Lisbon sisters and her date follow, but leave soon afterwards, not being as wild nor daring as Trip and Lux. At the time they all decided to meet back at the car so they could make the girls curfew, they are all there... Except for Trip and Lux, who at that time were alone in the middle of the football stadium field. Deciding they must make their own curfews, Therese, Bonnie, Mary and their dates leave without them. After fooling around, the intoxicated Trip and Lux fall asleep in the middle of the football stadium. Trip awakens in the middle of the night and leaves Lux there alone. When Lux wakes up early the next morning she is confused as to why Trip is not there. She takes a taxi home and her parents were worried sick (of course). But they take measures as far as pulling the girls out of school and stranding them inside the Lisbon residence.The girls, in a desperate attempt to hold onto a connection to the outside world, begin using morse code to interact with the four boys who so closely follow their lives. One of which boys lived across the street and the rest which came over daily after this in order to contact the girls. Soon following, the boys begin talking to the Lisbon girls via phone. One day, the girls invite the boys to come over once Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon are asleep. The plan being that the boys were to drive the girls somewhere, the boys hastily agree. They sneak over and Lux invites them to wait inside for her sisters and Lux goes to wait in the car. The boys wander down to the basement while waiting for Therese, Bonnie and Mary, verbally expressing their hopes for the night. But then they realize they have stumbled upon one of the sisters. She had hung herself. The boys, scared to death, run all the way home. Time passed, things changed, girls came and went... But no matter what, those four boys NEVER forgot the Lisbon suicides.Ultimately, the movie was nothing short of queer. When trying to sum up the story in a few lines (such as "Follow the lives of the Lisbon sisters and how they connect to their neighbors. A story full of obsession, gossip, lust, love, desire and isolation.") the story sounds quite unique and intriguing, but the story fell short of that for me personally. Partly because the Lisbon sisters really committed suicide for a reason not much deeper than isolation. The movie, in places, is also extremely flawed. I do not believe Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon could've removed their daughters from school for so long without their daughters being taken from them by social services. In many parts of the movie, they should've used upbeat music to fill the deafening silences. The whole movie was filmed in a style that I can truthfully say makes me rather bored. I would only suggest this film to, perhaps, people who like movies such as "Elizabethtown" which Kirsten Dunst is also in. But I personally disliked this movie which was not very tasteful and will not be watching it again in the future</review_text>
I get the story line but 5 grown women need to suicide!?  The one dare to have a boyfriend and not go home for the night.  Why would that kind of free sprite would kill herself!?!?  It is not matching the character</review_text>
I was shocked by the level of neediness and desire to blame others expressed by Christiane Northrup in this jumble of a book. At a time when I needed medical advice to decipher the overwhelming physical changes happening to my body; I turned to Christian Northrup as a wise healer who has had the privilege of medical training and a mature woman with the actual experience of menopause. A wonderful combination if Northrup had chosen to focus on menopause. Instead she is all over the map, taking swipes at everyone who has disappointed her in her life. If I wanted to hear my gal pals whine about the mothers, husbands, and daughters I could have shared a meal with any group of women struggling through the ups and downs of life. Instead, I sought the help of a respected physician and got quite a shock, as she rehashes all the real and imagined slights of her life. If you are a middle aged woman who has "stuffed your feelings" all your life, and need help speaking up for your youself; this book may be a big help to you in finding your voice. But if you are a woman who has stood up for herself while you matured, this book will shock you with its pettiness. I am quite New Age and believe in all the woo-woo stuff mentioned in this book; but when I turn to a physician for medical advice on a medical issue; that's what I expect. I can only hope that Northrup will re-read this book as some point in her life and decide to take it out of publication. I was embarrassed for her and returned it. I just don't buy it in more ways then one.</review_text>
I admit, I haven't finished this book.  A friend recommended it to me as I have been having problems with insomnia.  I was interested in reading a book about women's health issues and this one sounded intriguing UNTIL she started in with her tarot cards, interest in astrology and angels.  Granted, I am not a firm believer in just "the hard facts" but its really hard to believe anything this woman writes after it is clear that common sense isn't alternative enough for her!</review_text>
First of all, I am a Joy Division and New Order fan; therefore, I tried to like this.  Really, I did.Sadly, this film stinks.  The focus is not on the bands themselves, but on the obnoxious character known as Tony Wilson.  What a monster!  Either it was the actor's depiction or he does truly have a horrid personality in real life.Maybe I'm not British, but I did not find 24 Hour Party People to be very funny.  Only a few scenes made me grin.  The randomness added very little to the overall quality of the film.In addition, the camera work was very jerky.  Looked like it was done by a novice (and yes, I'm one myself, having made two movies)The only redeeming aspect has to be the scenes with Joy Division.  Too bad the members of this band are minor characters.  I can only hope that the biopic of Ian Curtis currently in production will be much, much better</review_text>
This movie is basically about 12 yr. old boys crying with each other.  When does that ever happen?  The dialogue is completely unbelievable considering the age of these kids.  What 12 yr. old worries about "..never getting out of this small town."?I guess if your childhood consisted of sitting around and crying with your friends, then you might enjoy this movie in some lame nostalgic sense.  I have a feeling Oprah would like this movie.</review_text>
I have been looking for a copy of this movie for a long time now because I wanted my kids to see it. I was very young when I first watched this film and it stuck to my mind somehow. Good thing amazon had it and they do make shipments to my country here in Asia.Daryl Hannah played a beautiful and believable mermaid. Tom was also perfect for the role. I can't say their chemistry on screen is as perfect as that of Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan, though, but it wasn't bad. I can't imagine any other actor for the lead role in this movie.I let my kids watch it finally together with my niece. We found ourselves teary-eyed in the end. It was just so touching, we couldn't help it. Even the theme song sang by Rita Coolidge was perfect for the ending. For those who wanna know, the title is "Love came for me".I'm glad I purchased the anniversary edition. I have a home theater and the dolby 5.1 surround sound was just what I needed. It would have been better if DTS was used but I'm not complaining.For those who are thinking of getting this, I hope you make the decision to do so. Tom Hanks is a certified great actor. This movie will soon be in line with the classics like "Gone with the wind" and "Breakfast at Tiffany's". It's already a collector's item. You won't regret it! Besides, love stories don't get out of style</review_text>
I have very mixed feeling about this tape.  When I bought it, I did not realize it was for new mothers.  I have Cindy's two previous workouts and love them both, so I purchased this without question.  Here are some random thoughts:--I enjoyed the different length workouts.  You don't always have 45 minutes to workout, even if you aren't a parent.--These workouts are lead by Kathy Kaehler, not by Cindy like her other tapes.  I found Kathy uninspiring and uninteresting.  Cindy does not seem as familiar with this workout as she is with the Radu ones.  She is more "window dressing" in this video.--The amount of repetitions for the movements varies greatly, which I found very annoying.--The warm-up and cool-down are very, very short, even on the 40 minute Workout "C".--The music will put you to sleep.  I suggest hitting the "mute" button on your TV and listening to your own music.If you are a new mother or beginner, this is a good tape to ease you into a workout routine.  However, I believe you will quickly outgrow it.</review_text>
Okay, it's not high art but this film has something to say all be it in a round about fashion.  It does make the viewer wonder about modern medicine and how it can possibly affect those who take it on a regular basis.  On the other hand, the film lacks true suspense.  I was hoping for an explosive opening scene when the baby is first born and instead was offered a yawn.  The baby itself is about as scary as fozzy bear and while there is some blood flow it is kept to a minimum.  The pacing is too slow at times and it just doesn't stand up that well today.  The actors who took part in this didn't go anywhere say for the father who went on to appear in the sequel.  Why there was a sequel is beyond me.  I recall how frightening the commercial was for this film when it first came out but I was only five at the time.  At the most this is a rent not a buy.  I guess good for it's time but perhaps a re-make would pump some needed life into the story.</review_text>
I bought this DVD because it features Alan Rickman. I also purchased it because of someone else's Amazon review (They sounded like they really knew what they were talking about). I am glad I bought it used, because if it were new, I would feel that I'd been cheated.The movie was about as suspenseful as waiting in the doctor's office. There was no sense of suspense, and I was about as thrilled and chilled as a lukewarm cup of tea (Mind you, I'm NOT the type who requires non-stop action and special effects to be happy).The dialogue throughout was tedious and trite; the scriptwriter should be on the unemployment line, as well as the director and the editor.The plot was, in some respects, totally illogical, and at other times nonsensical. Even previous scenes don't tie in neatly enough at the end. The plot is entirely unconvincing and implausible. The choices the characters make - whether restless, bored, frustrated - don't tie in the the normal patterns of logic and suck all realism away from the film (Like a greedy, unwashed vampire).The movie features a wealthy, bored couple. I was also bored. But I'm not wealthy.However! All the actors did their best within the limitations of this film. Polly Walker was very convincing as a sensitive, but hypercritical wife. In fact, I'd say she provided the best performance, and her character was the most three-dimensional and human. They should have provided more time to make the audience more sympathetic to her character.Norman Reedus was fairly genuine as the young man, although he seemed more creepy and psychotic than attractive. He failed to grab my empathy. Which makes the plot of the movie more implausible ... that a jaded, wealthy couple would have allowed him into their environment.Alan Rickman did his usual subtle work, but it was so subtle that I thought they might have not let him have his morning coffee before filming. His attempt at an American accent did not fly too well. Later in the movie, however, he becomes much more interesting.The end lacked passion and was not surprising at all; it was entirely predictable.For Rickmanistas, yes, you get to see Alan naked. So, just fast forward to the end of the movie and you will be happy.I have always admired Alan Rickman - I'm a big fan - but he would have been better in a more skillfully scripted & directed film.So, I give it two stars. *Yawn</review_text>
Maybe it's just me, but I really don't see the appeal of this movie. It's an incredibly small production (3 actors comprise nearly the entire film), with very low production values. Norman Reedus gives by far the weakest performance as the hitchhiker, but Alan Rickman and Polly Walker are not at their finest, either. (And I am an Alan Rickman fan just like anyone else who would even consider watching this movie.) If you are an Alan Rickman fan, chances are you've already seen your fair share of horrible and incomprehensible movies that leave you wondering why an accomplished actor would choose them. And Dark Harbor is just one more of these. Don't let the promise of a "nude scene" convince you to buy this movie - honestly, Alan Rickman is better appreciated with his clothes on. As far as the movie is concerned, the plot is unoriginal and not particularly engaging. It is a very dialogue-heavy film and the dialogue is not well-written enough to carry it off.</review_text>
I purchased my version of El Hazard from a zShop for 19 bucks and I am SO glad that I did.That said, the first series is worth watching for two main reasons: overt lesbianism and Jinnai. The former is self-explanatory while the latter (Jinnai) is without a doubt the best character in the series (despite the fact that he is the antagonist). You can't say that any of the characters are very deep or well developed, but throughout the first series Jennai is by far the most satisfyingly fleshed-out character, as well as the most ammusing and true to his nature. This superiority is all the more appearant when he is contrasted with story's main character who is shallowly developed and in no way engaging.And this is what makes the second series (all four dismal episodes) so tragic: they nerfed Jinnai. He could never have been called a genius in the first series, but he was decidedly intelligent, cool, pragmatic, supremely self-confident and an effective leader (even though he was also manic and delusional). In El Hazard II, as if in response to the world recoiling at the sight of a humorous though competent villain, they have turned Jinnai into a slapstick-idiot persuing his increasingly nebulous ambition with foolish abandon.I suggest purchasing El Hazard through...alternate means,... watching the first series and discarding the second. Let's face it: even lesbian humor gets old when the writing sucks and the characters are empty</review_text>
Having enjoyed LOST IN TRANSLATION, I thought I might like this one, which seems to have some sort of cult reputation-- why I can't fathom. The entire plot is self-serving, shallow, and unrealistic. I guess it's supposed to depict the horror of repressive religious values, and while I don't condone those, the film lacks clear characters or any motivation. A lot of people have buttoned up parents who don't get it, and it doesn't mean they kill themselves-- because they were grounded!?Since the writer-director gerw up in Hollywood, she may not be aware that you can't keep your kid home from school without a very good reason-- social workers and what not come after you. So the entire premise is false.Romanticizing mass suicide by having a bunch of soft focus young blondes do it-- after which they supposedly ascend to erotic eternity in the imaginations of their boyish peers-- could actually encourage the act. It's not caring, not real, and not responsible.But I guess that wouldn't bother the rich, overfunded daughter of a Hollywood genius out to make a name for herself.</review_text>
I get the story line but 5 grown women need to suicide!?  The one dare to have a boyfriend and not go home for the night.  Why would that kind of free sprite would kill herself!?!?  It is not matching the character</review_text>
I was unfortunate enough to have stumbled across this in 2004.  I was thinking it would be a good sit down and watch type of movie, but it was really lackluster.The acting is wooden, the script is very lame, and worst of all, the action isn't very exciting.  I expected a much better movie from director Richard Donner.  There is a battle scene, and there are action scenes, but they just aren't exciting.  When the action isn't exciting, you better have a good story.  The story here is alright, but certainly not enough to save the movie.I don't hate any of the actors, they are decent when they have something to work with.  Here they had nothing to work with, so they obviously didn't do too well this time.This really isn't worth your time.  I gave this to the thrift shop after I got it, and I feel sorry for the person who bought it there</review_text>
Chuck Jones continues to entertain new audiences with the Road Runner and Wile E. Coyote. Chariots of fur is an blend of his final cartoon with the duo. I found it to be very exciting. If you have Road Runner vs. Wile E. Coyote The Classic Chase from Warner Bros. Golden Jubiliee 24 Karat collection, this video might not be for you. The other five cartoons actually appear on that video; Zip N' Snort, Operation: Rabbit, Hook, Line and Stinker, Beep Beep, and Ready, Woolen and Able. Otherwise this is an very nice cartoon video collection for kids of all ages</review_text>
There's a reason why they talk about the "Voice of an Angel" -- it's because Charlotte Church certainly doesn't have the acting presence of one. Her acting debut "I'll Be There" is proof enough -- only the presence of its star got this tepid little drama into theatres, where it rapidly dropped out of sight. Rightly so.Seventeen years ago, Paul Kerr (Craig Ferguson) of the Love Rats had a fling with a groupie at a concert. Fast forward to the present: Kerr discovers that unknown to him, his ex Rebecca (Jemma Redgrave) gave birth to a daughter, Olivia (Charlotte Church), who is now a well-adjusted paper girl.The problem is, Olivia has been kept a secret from her dad. Rebecca is embittered, but Kerr wants to get to know his daughter, and similarly Olivia wants to get to know her father. Music seems to be the thing that will bring the angel-voiced girl and the burned-out rocker together, but Rebecca doesn't want her child to follow in her father's footsteps."I'll Be There" was hyped months in advance as being inspired by the life of actress Liv Tyler, who, despite being only in her twenties, has had an immensely interesting life. Well, maybe someday she WILL get a biopic, because "I'll Be There" is only similar in one way: It involves a rock star and his daughter. Otherwise, it is boring in about every way that Tyler's life is interesting.With a forgettable script, not much humor and a goofy premise, the movie doesn't have a lot going for it -- it reads like a disgruntled teenager's absurdist fantasy, scripted for Church to act out. And not a terribly interesting teenager, either. It gets increasingly ridiculous when Olivia decides to pursue music to bond with Daddy Dearest; it's an obvious ploy to show off Church's vocal skills.The best that can be said of Church's performance is that at times she looks sweet. As for acting talent, she is bland at best, but she does perform some good songs, and her voice is as pretty as ever. Just watch the songs and fast-forward her actual scenes. Redgrave does as good a job as she can, and Ferguson wrings some pathos from his performance as an aging rocker. His is the only memorable role in the film, and it's a shame that the movie didn't focus on him rather than the dull Miss Church.Miss Church appears to have chosen a role that glorifies her in the middle of an atrocious film -- also known as the Britney Spears approach. "I'll Be There," but I promise I'll get out as soon as I can</review_text>
Opera is intended to be seen - a true multi-media art. But a fascinatingly perfect stage setting aside, this is one production better heard than seen. Sonically, the performances please, but this rates as one of the more visually disturbing casts I have witnessed.A 58-year-old Plcido Domingo is simply unconvincing as a young soldier. Aprile Millo, as a well-fed version of the Ethiopian slave girl (in ridiculous black face), Aida, defies the costumers' best attempts to provide a waist line. And Dolora Zaijick mirrors a middle-aged matron more than the Egyptian princess Amneris.A fine performance by the ballet troup only draws attention to age and fitness disparities. Like an emperor, the Metropolitan Opera stands as a respected authority. Perhaps this is the impetus behind overenthusiastic curtain calls which prolong the end of each act, but the emperor has no clothes - or at least they need ironing.These are the type of miscastings which turn neophytes off to the idea of opera. Huge fans of these performers who can suspend disbelief may well be pleased, but those craving contextually appropriate performances will find this one age inappropriate</review_text>
Nicky Cage was not very good in this cinematic decomplishment, as he turns  in a horrible acting job in this dull and boring movi</review_text>
I was very gung ho when I found out that Disney was finally releasing the Davy Crockett TV show on DVD.  I grew up watching the two Davy Crockett movies.  HOwever upon actually seeing these DVDs I was very disappointed.  It is exactly the same as those two movies it is just split into five seperate episodes.  The Episodes: Davy Crockett, Indian Fighter; Davy Crockett Goes to Congress; and Davy Crockett at the Alamo are all the parts included in the movie Davy Crockett King of the Wild Frontier.  The episodes Davy Crockett's Keelboat Race; Davy Crockett and the River Pirates; were what made up the movie Davy Crockett and the River Pirates.  I for one am planning on buying the newer version that came out in 2004 that is just the two movies on one disc.  The only difference between this set and the new set is that there are couple of features on this set and that there are introductions to the episodes buy Leonard Maltin and it has two discs in a tin collector's box.  The biggest difference of all is that this set runs from between $37-$100 whereas you can buy the two movies on DVD for $14-$16.  I myself will go for the cheaper movie set rather than have to watch each episode sperately.</review_text>
AFTER VIEWING THE AVENGERS WITH EMMA PEEL, WHICH I DO EVERY EVENING AFTER THE DREADFUL NEWS, ENJOYING REPEATS AND REPEATS AS WELL, WITH RELUCTANCE I PLAYED THE HOSPITAL DVD.I THOUGHT IT WAS TERRIBLE. THE DIAGOGUE IDIOTIC.I COULD NOT HELP BUT LAUGH WHEN SCOTT ATTACKED DIANA.  EMMA PEEL WOULD HAVE THROWN HIM ACROSS THE ROOM.I HAD TO PLAY A FEW EPISODES OF EMMA PEEL IN THE AVENGERS SERIES TO CLEANSE ME OF THIS DISAPPOINTING AND TERRIBLE HOSPITAL DVD.THE LOVELY DIANA RIGG IS A GREAT ACTRESS AND AN EXTREMELY INTELLIGENT WOMAN, AND I WAS SADDENED THAT DIANA AFTER ALL THOSE WONDERFUL AND EXCITING AVENGERS COLLECTION, WITH HER UNRIVALED BEAUTY AND POSSESSING THE MOST BEAUTIFUL VOICE AND ABLE TO DO HER  OWN STUNTS TOOK ON THIS DISMAL ROLE IN THE HOSPITAL DVD.I SEE THAT THIS DVD WAS DATED 1971, THIS WAS ONLY 4 YEARS AFTER HER LAST AVENGER EPISODES DATED 1967.  IN HOSPITAL, I BELIEVE SHE WAS 33 YEARS OLD.OH WELL, I WILL CLEANSE MYSELF OF THIS HOSPITAL DVD AND DEVOTE AN EVENINGR TO A FEW EPISODES OF THE AVENGERS WITH THE LOVELY DIANA RIGG AS EMMA PEEL.FINALL, JOHN STEED WOULD HAVE BEEN SHOCKED TO SEE HOW EMMA REACTED TO GEORGE SCOTT THE DOCTOR. CAN YOU IMAGDINE IF JOHN STEED APPEARED IN THE HOSPITAL DVD TO COLLECT DIANA RIGG AND RIDE OFF INTO THE SUNSET AS THEY DO AFTER AN AVENGER EPISODE.PERHAPS THEY WILL ISSUE HOSPITAL 11, AND BRINGR IN JOHN STEED AND A FEW OTHER GREAT ACTORS OF THAT SERIES.ROBERT LYONSRENO, NEVAD</review_text>
Nicky Cage was not very good in this cinematic decomplishment, as he turns  in a horrible acting job in this dull and boring movi</review_text>
Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..</review_text>
The ideas behind 15 minutes aren't bad at all. Take one Robert DeNiro, put him in New York, mix him with some American-dream hunting Eastern Europeans on a killing spree, and try to provoke some emotions, and have a sly dig at the American justice system. Lets see...nothing happened...only repulse.If, like everyone else, you plan on watching this film because DeNiro is in it, you will be dissapointed. He puts in a tired performance, almost as if he knows the film is a load of B.S. The attempt to be hard-hitting goes horribly wrong, instead it's just repulsive over the top violence, and its pointless...naked prostitute gets hacked to pieces, why? There are ways to create provoking films with such violence but they have to have meaning, such as 8mm (the horrible subject of snuff movies, hard-hitting meaningfull film), 15 minutes is far from meaningfull. We all know there are some deranged psychopaths out there doing just that, but when converting it to a film, it needs a deeper meaning, otherwise it turns into melodramatic Hollywood [...].If you like brain-dead gore and violence, lack of plot and cringing melodrama. Go ahead</review_text>
The setting of this film is in the late 70s, just before adult movie theatres were driven out of business by the invention of the VCR and the subsequent explosion of pornographic VHS tapes.  Burt Reynolds plays a porno director who has the effrontry to try and be "artistic" in his craft.  Heather Graham plays his psycho-starlet, and Mark Wahlberg plays a porn star who is....well.....let's just say, endowed.Wahlberg's character quickly becomes a huge hit and encounters success he would have never dreamed of. Wahlberg's character seems to be a sort of oblique allusion to John Holmes, although I don't know if the film-makers would admit as much.   At any rate, he becomes arrogant and begins to believe that he is loved for factors other than his "package."  This hubris leads to his un-doing as the world of porn coalesces with the world of drugs and LOTS of shady characters.This sounds like it would be the framework for a good movie.  Well, it could have been, but all the way through there seems to be something missing.  There are times the film "seems" to try and convey a message, but I'm not really sure.One thing I do know is that I quickly remembered why I've never cared for Wahlberg.  He has all the screen presence of a bowl of yogurt.   Also, I was expecting a LOT more skin than what the film delivered.  Given the context of the film, one would think that it would be an excuse to parade miles of topless women.  That's simply not the case.In the end, however, the biggest problem of this movie isn't Wahlberg or the lack of nudity.  The difficulty is that it's just plain boring.  I have more than a passing interest in the history of porn, and yet this flick failed to grab me</review_text>
An EXACT copy of Ang Lee's wonderful &quot;Eat Drink Man Woman&quot;.  Frankly what annoyed me here was I watched this one first.. I just finished watching Eat Drink.. it took me about 15 minutes to realize I was watching an exact copy of something I'd already seen a couple years ago. Anyway, I was annoyed because while I could predict events in Eat Drink because I'd seen Tortilla Soup, Eat Drink was clearly the better movie -- so unfortunately it spoiled some of the pleasure of Eat Drink for me. If you haven't seen either, see the better of the two (exact same stories): Eat Drink Man Woman</review_text>
Having been a teenager once, I can certainly understand the inner turmoil and angst teens experience.  However, in PUMP UP THE VOLUME, the movie's attempt to martyrize teens and make all adults look like uncaring morons only serves to underscore why so many adults look with disdain on teens.  The teens in this movie seem to have little respect for authority and their assignation as to being tortured and misunderstood is vanquished in their juvenile behavior.  Even our hero (well played by Christian Slater) cannot communicate with people on a one to one level; he instead decides to become some kind of salvation to his teens by using his pirated radio shows to cause some kind of uprising among them.  As a proponent of truth, he is a vapid antithesis of truth: he fakes masturbation to arouse the youths; he doesn't use his real name or voice; and on a call with a potential suicide victim, he treats the caller as someone who isn't serious and never really offers any kind of consolation.  The suicidal teen says he is lonely and we automatically assume he is lonely within his familial structure, but isn't he just as lonely with the peers who mourn him after his demise?  The adults are played almost as caricatures and the teens as misunderstood heroes.  Sorry, folks, been there done that...living at any age requires a commitment to better yourself and do what you feel is right.  Questioning authority without any viable alternatives, as none of these teens do, merely escalates the generational gap, and movies like this are merely attempts to exploit the so called misunderstanding of youth</review_text>
So I bought this movie because some of the reviews said that the acting was terrible but the dancing was amazing.Well, anyone who thinks that the salsa dancing in this movie is amazing, awesome, good, or ok, has never actually SEEN salsa dancing!!I am a salsa dancer, and this movie was HORRIBLE!!!  I have seen amazing dancing, and good dancing.  This was TERRIBLE dancing!  And there was hardly any salsa!It was 80s dancing to salsa music!  That's IT.  The only time there was actually salsa dancing was when the main character was training with the club owner.  Other than that, it was just 80s dancing to salsa music.  That's it.If you want to see salsa dancing, I DEFINITELY DO NOT recommend this movie.If you want to see horrible acting, and old 80s dancing, then I recommend this movie...There was only one thing that I liked about this movie.  The appearances made by Tito Puente and Celia Cruz.  That was great to see, but not worth buying the movie for....Oh, and the story line?  What was it again????Yeah...I love movies, good ones and bad ones.But this one???  The WORST movie I have seen so far...To the best of my knowledge, there aren't actually any movies with really good salsa dancing.Hopefully, someday, there will be</review_text>
I rented this movie from Netflix recently, expecting a wonderfully campy, cheesy horror film. WRONG. Its just an hour and a half of boring film.The plot is lacking, the characters are annoying, especially Duane.Its simply a ridiculous film</review_text>
this has got to be the WORST film I've ever seen. its not sad. Its not funny, jest over blow mellow dramatic garbage. I don't have any sympathy toward nick in this movie, because he does give you anything to work with or want to keep him. the actor is the worst of all. i cant tell if he's sad in some seens, or angry or jest retarded. I've seen some sad movies but this one jest sucks, I guess its aimed at a different time of homosexuals instead of the present. it probably worked better back in 96'. but this movie is SO SO SO BAD. its embarrassing. do not rent it or buy it or view it on television.NOTE'S: THIS FILM HAD  SOME GREAT TALENTA song from Olivia Newton Jon, and (one of my most personal favorites) Mila AND my favorite comedians Margaret Cho. She's to good but...why this film, she (and Mila ) are to good for some want to be tearjerker movie like this.</review_text>
This movie made me sick to my stomach. Here we have a woman like Nora Ephron, a woman with professional job skills and talent and when she marries, she turns into a needy, desperate women whom evidently believes her own self-worth is determined by having babies, one after another. I ususally love all of Meryl's movies, but I could not stand seeing her turn into a needy, always pregnant &quot;homemaker&quot;. If I were a man, I would have run awary screaming, too</review_text>
I never cared much for the soundtrack aside from a few tracks. this Film was wack the Acting,Directing. but the Story Line was cool. in fact if someone knew how to put this together with a stronger Cast this Film would have been interesting.this Film flip flopped Time Periods&it hurt it's cause.I will give Prince Props though for being a Black Film Director back at a time when it was really rare&truth be told in 2004 it ain't that much better on a whole</review_text>
I was unfortunate enough to have stumbled across this in 2004.  I was thinking it would be a good sit down and watch type of movie, but it was really lackluster.The acting is wooden, the script is very lame, and worst of all, the action isn't very exciting.  I expected a much better movie from director Richard Donner.  There is a battle scene, and there are action scenes, but they just aren't exciting.  When the action isn't exciting, you better have a good story.  The story here is alright, but certainly not enough to save the movie.I don't hate any of the actors, they are decent when they have something to work with.  Here they had nothing to work with, so they obviously didn't do too well this time.This really isn't worth your time.  I gave this to the thrift shop after I got it, and I feel sorry for the person who bought it there</review_text>
I didn't enjoy the film.  I also didn't enjoy the original play by Shakespeare.  King Lear is one of my least favorite Shakespeare plays.  I don't consider it particularly creative to remake a play that has already been done, and to add nothing of value to the original.  You can set it wherever you like, in medieval Japan or on the Moon, what's the difference.  It's King Lear, a downer of a play, there's nothing great about Ran just as there's nothing great about Lear, and it takes up three hours of your time.A moron named Lear, or Hidetoro, or whatever his name is, relinquishes power in his kingdom and turns the power over to his oldest son.  The youngest son warns him that it is a bad idea because the sons will be disloyal to their father.  He is right, of course, and Hidetoro Lear gets treated shabbily.  He's wanted dead or dead.In this treatment of the annoying plot, he loses his mind.  He has a faithful follower or two.  They overact.  There is nobody to root for in this depressing and ridiculously overrated downer of a play.  Lear Hidetoro is an absolute jerk.  Am I supposed to care what happens to him?  Why?  Because he used to be a powerful king, and a cruel one?  You may as well cry over Saddam Hussein.Look at this movie with fresh eyes.  Look at Shakespeare's King Lear with fresh eyes.  This stuff simply is not very entertaining, and is not very good.  The hell with King Lear.  He's an annoyance</review_text>
Michael Moriarity is my hero! He is just one of the coolest actors in my opinion. He has done such great B-movies as this, Q, and It's Alive 3: Island of the Alive. How awesome is he?? Anyways, I think that this movie was hilarious! I think a lot of people take this movie too seriously, thinking that it is going to be your typical movie. But you shouldn't because not only is this a B-movie, but IT IS supposed to be funny. My favorite part is when "the stuff" started bubbeling out of the ground and that old hick guy just starts eating it. Who would do that?? I just started laughing by butt off when that happened. So if you watch this movie, just sit back and enjoy it for what it's worth, don't be too critical on it.What I learned from The Stuff: Dairy products are evil! Especially if they come from with in the earth!If you like The Stuff, I recommend: Watching other B-movies, such as Island of the Alive 3, Zombi 3 and 4, etc</review_text>
This movies rates right up there with "Schindler's List" . . . in terms of unapologetic propaganda.  Fortunately, Ted Turner showed some remorse for this hatchet job by making "Gettysburg," and the even better "Gods and Generals."If you want to see a real, accurate depiction of the War For Southern Independence (aka, The Civil War), watch "Gods and Generals" or "Gone With The Wind," and stay away from movie garbage like "Andersonville."Also watch for the extended version DVD of "Gods and Generals" coming for the Christmas season of 2005.</review_text>
Please think this DVD is recorded in 1986. More worse, this is recorded as a documentary. Sound quality is worst. After I bought this and DVD of &quot;Company&quot; (same, worst sound quality DOCUMENTARY), I suspect the word &quot;concert&quot; or &quot;soundtrack&quot; in DVD title</review_text>
I will not watch the movie "Andersonville" until they make a movie called "Elmira"(the camp in Elmira, N.Y., the worst of the Union prison camps had 35% death rate)</review_text>
Note: If you don't want to know how the movie ends, don't read this. (I'm giving you fair warning now, so don't complain about spoilers later). The only reason I'm mentioning the ending and the "big secret" is because I'd like to spare you from the huge disappointment I experienced when watching this movie.                        When I first walked into the theatre to see this, I couldn't have been more excited; after months of waiting, I'd finally get to see the movie whose preview had given me chills every time I saw it! The movie started out wonderfully: great acting, scenery that could go from gorgeous to terrifying in a matter of seconds, and, at times, almost unbearable suspense (that Shyamalan really knows how to scare!)The story takes place in a small town in the 1800's. At first this town seems like the perfect place to live: the people are friendly, the houses are cozy, and the scenery is beautiful. Despite the peaceful setting, however, we get the feeling that something sinister lies beneath the surface of this sweet little community, something that frightens the villagers and keeps them from  being completely at ease. Every now and then, they glance fearfully at the forest surrounding the village; nobody ever ventures into it, and a guard is stationed every night to watch over it. Pretty soon, we find out why: according to the village elders, there are dangerous, hostile creatures lurking in the woods that will kill anyone who dares enter their domain. These creatures are supposedly unidentified monsters who are so bloodthirsty that the color red is forbidden in the village (it attracts them). For years, the villagers and the monsters have had an understanding: as long as the villagers stay out of the forest, the monsters will not harm them. At one point,however, one of the creatures enters the village at night, leaving the villagers to believe that their uneasy truce may soon come to an end and more of the creatures will attack. While all this is happening, we (the audience) still don't know what the creatures look like and half the suspense comes from wondering what they really are. It was halfway through the movie when all my hopes for the story came crashing to an end: There are NO MONSTERS IN THE WOODS.  When one of the villagers revealed a monster costume and said the shocking words "It's all a farce", I still couldn't believe what I was hearing; it was all I could do to keep myself from screaming right there in the theatre! After months of anticipating this film, of expecting a truly scary thriller, and of trying to guess what the monsters really are, THERE ARE NO MONSTERS! Disappointed doesn't even begin to describe it. It got worse, though. The next big surprise was the reason the villagers created the story of the "monsters". The villagers aren't really living in the 1840's; they're living in a modern-day wildlife reserve. Supposedly, the leaders of the village used to live like normal modern people, but when tragedy struck their families, they decided the real world was too much for them and moved into a wildlife reserve to start a new (if extremely delusional) life. The story of the monsters in the forest was created to terrify their children and keep them from wandering too far and discovering the truth. They even had the village retard dress in a costume and wander around occasionally to scare the other children and make them believe the monsters were real! When the retarded boy died in the woods (still wearing the stupid costume), the leaders, rather than mourning him, remorselessly saw it as another opportunity to lie to their children by telling them he was killed by one of the creatures. I basically went from sympathizing with the characters to being repulsed by them. What parents could lie to their children and deliberately terrify them like that? I don't think I've ever been this disappointed in a movie before; not only was it completely misleading, but the plot was pitiful and the adult characters were pathetic (I'm sorry, but I have no other word for people who are perfectly happy to live a lie and deliberately frighten and traumatize their children to continue living it). Many fans of this movie have said that those of us who didn't like it "don't get it". I assure you, I did get it, and I didn't like it anyway. I'm no fan of slasher films and I didn't expect this to be one, but I also don't appreciate false advertising or almost totally unsympathetic characters. The two stars are for the cast and the filming. Better luck next time, guys</review_text>
Michael Moore filmed this propaganda,partially financed by the United Auto Workers, to distract attention from the real reason GM was forced to shutter plants - the Japanese auto invasion, made possible by  GM's unhealthy cost structure. The  company was burdened with exorbitant UAW wages, something union friendly Michael Moore does his best to conceal. So Roger Smith becomesthe reason for the plant closings. Years of losses at GM have shown Moore's twisted arguments to be exactly what they were then - phoney  UAW sponsored lies to  shift attention away from theprimary role played by the UAW in the death spiral of the automakers. Moore and others pretend GM management had dropped the ball, but GM lost tens of thousands of engineers and salaried staff, let go long before any unionized line workers felt any pain. ALL of GM's problems are the result of the lack of profits resulting from the UAW albatross - slow redesign cycles, lack of money for research, you name it.  Moore will never mention how the UAW has screwed the consumers for the past 70 years andhow now that consumers have a choice, they find the better value in Asian autos. Nobody wants to pay a UAW worker to bolt on a fender while making more than their family doctor. The UAW has fixed labor prices for long enough. Enough is enough and Mooreis shown to be the stooge of the unions with this preposterous piece of slanted fiction he laughingly calls a "documentary."</review_text>
I would have given this film 0 stars if possible.  This film was long, boring, and painful to watch.  If you like Jane Austen films or other BBC period films, do not be deceived by this one; it is nothing like those types of films</review_text>
I was unfortunate enough to have stumbled across this in 2004.  I was thinking it would be a good sit down and watch type of movie, but it was really lackluster.The acting is wooden, the script is very lame, and worst of all, the action isn't very exciting.  I expected a much better movie from director Richard Donner.  There is a battle scene, and there are action scenes, but they just aren't exciting.  When the action isn't exciting, you better have a good story.  The story here is alright, but certainly not enough to save the movie.I don't hate any of the actors, they are decent when they have something to work with.  Here they had nothing to work with, so they obviously didn't do too well this time.This really isn't worth your time.  I gave this to the thrift shop after I got it, and I feel sorry for the person who bought it there</review_text>
This movie is laughable today. It's very dated, and it shows. It's not worth your time. The acting is so-so, but felt forced (like William Shatner style). The storyline is okay. By today's standards, it appears like a low budget flick</review_text>
This romantic comedy was charming, funny, and clever. I recommend it to anyone who doesn't have a problem with heavy British accents. (If you do, try it with captions). It was fun, funny, and a nice pick-me-up when one needs a lift</review_text>
I was not into this movie at all.  My mother recommended it to me but it was lame all the way through.  A middle-aged man decides he wants to do something different with his life, so he takes a dance class.  Ofcourse there's a fine dance instructor, a crush is pursued, a wife gets jealous, hires a detective, and *gasp* his crush is found out.  The movie was too predictable and it just wasn't for me.  Not a bad movie, just not my cup of tea.  Richard Gere was cute as usual, which was the only thing that made me watch it to the end, besides wanting to know what a correct quick step looked like since "So You Think You Can Dance" never had contestants who mastered it</review_text>
Using this product requires that you agree to turn over the keys to your computer. If you refuse an upgrade, Amazon can delete all of your previous purchases without giving you a refund.This is a quote from Cory Doctorow, who wrote about the Terms of Service for Amazon Unbox (Amazon Unbox to customers: Eat !@#$ and die):Amazon says it respects your privacy, but this clause tells the real story. Click "I agree" and you've just signed away permission for Amazon to wiretap all of your viewing habits, and to search your entire hard drive continuously and report back on all the software you've installed. The entertainment industry can produce a blacklist of legal software that it just doesn't care for -- say, software that lets you take screenshots, or screen-movies -- and refuse to allow your movies to run if you've installed it. In other words, this clause lets Hollywood specify how you must configure your PC.Section 3c. Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you.Surprise! If you delete our software, we delete your movies! Imagine if selling your old DVD player gave Jack Valenti permission to come over to your house and take away all your DVDs, too</review_text>
Off-hand, I can't think of a worse movie. (And I think Nicolas Cage has done some truly awesome work in other films--hey, he's making a buck, here.) That's all. 1/32 star, if possible</review_text>
This film is evocative of the quirky, madcap Robert Altman at his best and worst.  We got it because we have a Bud Cort fan in the family, and just to see him makes it worth it.  But the story is strange, resolution less than satisfying.  If you're really a big Altman or Cort fan, then you must see it.  Just be aware that THIS IS NOT A WESTERN!  (I had it confused with John Wayne's &quot;Rooster Cogburn&quot; and the Dennis Weaver's &quot;McCloud&quot; and kept waiting for it to start, thinking I was seeing more previews.)  The storyline combines an oddball who lives in unauthorized apartment in the basement of the Astrodome who is trying to fly, with a murder mystery and detective story.  This is one of Shelly Duvall's early roles -- don't miss her upside-down false eyelashes</review_text>
This movie was awful. That's all I can say about it. It killed the book, which happens to be one of my favorites. When I got this movie after reading the book, I excitedly stuck it in my VCR (yes, VCR-- no affordable DVD Players at the time), I was expecting so much more than what I received. I know movies have to cut out a lot from the books to fit them into 2-hours, but I've never before seen a movie cut out the main hero! Now, that's just ridiculous! If I were the author, David Baldacci, I would be furious that my story had been so badly butchered. Clint Eastwood had to be the star, so he twisted the whole plot around to make Luther Whitney the hero, when in the book Luther Whitney is gunned down half-way though. In the movie, the book's hero Jack Graham is totally non-existent.My advice to you if you're looking to buy a good movie: look someplace else. Read the book. *sigh* If only the movie would've followed the book a little more closely... It might have been a blockbuster hit. Too bad.</review_text>
This movie had many of the ingredients to make it truly great, including a phenomenal cast, lead by Cate Blanchett, and great scenery and cinematography. The actors playing Elizabeth, Cecil, and Walsingham spoke and acted admirably, each phrase spoken with such honesty and feeling, but the words themselves rendered the performances useless. The director and the author of the script greatly misunderstood the characters and the material. They should have read Elizabeth the First's biography by Elizabeth Jenkins. It is useless to say a movie does not need to be historically accurate but has only to entertain: had the author and director been more historically accurate, they would not have created the unbelievable character they created in Elizabeth, who is in turn hysterical, defeatist, overbearing, childish, tyrannical, who never shows her core intelligence, her great love of her people, who had a private core described by her motto "Semper Eadem", be always one. Elizabeth ruled with her advisors, she was not totally ruled by them. She would not have put up with Norfolk screaming at her across the council table, nor would Burleigh have allowed it. Cate Blanchett's wonderful acting and presence were pearls thrown before swine, wasted on a character portrayal that totally lacked any integrity, much less truth. How could the director think that the woman he was trying to portray was any kind of real woman? The ending had me blushing with embarassment for one and all. We are laughably given William Cecil as wimpy and ineffective, and Walsingham as the mastermind behind the throne. One of the reviews said that the director inspired Rush to play Walsingham much like the Hindu god Krishna. I suggest that he should have first read some English history</review_text>
A work of fiction is a great thing, but to take the life of a famous historical character and potray it as accurate is wrong.  Why not just make up a story with no historical basis</review_text>
I'm glad someone knows enough about English History to recognize the pure fiction of this film.  But in addition to points made about historical inaccuracy, I also had to object to the ridiculous portrayal of Mary Tudor.  Over-zealous and fanatic (as was a common religious stance in those times - promoted by both sides of the Protestant/Catholic conflict), she was not insane as the film makes her in the opening scenes.  And throughout the film, there was this emphasis on milking the passions for all they are worth - no objectivity whatsoever.  I was sorely disappointed!If you want to get to know Elizabeth and the period in which she lived, I would recommend the superb BBC series, Elizabeth R with Glenda Jackson.  And if you want even further background, look to the BBC again in the Six Wives of Henry VIII with Keith Mitchell.  Tidbits can be gained as well from the movie Mary, Queen of Scots (although a few historical inaccuracies can be found in it - for example, Mary Stuart and Elizabeth never met, although it was Mary's great desire) and even another title, Anne of the Thousand Days.  Those two more theatrical representations fulfill the desire for the more dramatic while still coming closer to the history of the times.  This film just doesn't cut it</review_text>
In terms of both format and style - and despite its superficially modernist tendencies - "Rent" has its roots firmly planted in the grand old operatic tradition.  Yet, it suffers from the weakness common to most modern musicals in which the characters sing virtually nonstop throughout the entire production - which is that it makes it hard for the audience to connect with the characters.  In more traditional musicals, the long stretches of spoken exposition between song-and-dance sequences serve as an opportunity for the audience to get to know the characters as recognizable, flesh-and-blood human beings.  This is less of a problem with a florid romantic fantasy like "Phantom of the Opera," which seems a natural for this type of approach, but with material like "Rent," which is small in scale and intimate in scope, the constant singing serves as a distancing device for the audience.  I know that this play (and, perhaps now, even the movie) has generated a passionately loyal fan base who considers "Rent" practically sacrosanct and therefore beyond criticism, but to someone, like myself, coming cold to the work, "Rent" adds up to much less than the sum of its parts.The story, a modern day update of "La Boheme" set in Greenwich Village, starts on Christmas Eve, 1989, and ends on Christmas Eve, 1990.  This was at the height of the AIDS epidemic, and, indeed, many of the film's characters - primarily gay men and former junkies - are struggling with the disease (AIDS being the modern equivalent of the consumption used in the original story).  There's also a wheezy subplot involving a real estate company that wants to evict the starving artists (one is tempted to call them "deadbeats") from a building in order to further their diabolical scheme of re-developing a city block."Rent" - with its noble "performance artists" doing battle against the Big Bad Corporate Bullies - feels less like a relic from the `80's than one from the `60's.  Though intended to be the heroes of the piece, the artists and bohemians often come across as nave, painfully self-absorbed, and annoyingly self-righteous, an attitude epitomized by one of the characters rigging a local ATM machine so that his buddies can withdraw unlimited amounts of money from it using his dead boyfriend's name (the heavily allegorical "Angel") as the password (this is somehow supposed to be seen as admirable and a tribute to the spirit of the dead man).  Anything`s better than actually working, I suppose, and becoming a tool of corporate America.  When one of the men finally takes a dreaded "job" ( a mere sinecure, I might add) so that he can actually pay the rent he owes (horrors!), he acts as if he is selling his soul to Satan, and has to have two of his lady friends accompany him to the interview for moral support and to offer him assurances that he will still be able to live with himself even after he has soiled his hands with the dirty mammon from an honest-to-God paycheck.  I wonder why it never occurs to any of these characters that the capitalist system they loathe so deeply is also helping to produce drugs that will one day lead to a possible cure for the disease that afflicts them.With the exception of newcomer Rosario Dawson, the filmmakers have retained most of the original Broadway cast members for the movie, and even though their acting isn't all that impressive, some of them do very well indeed at singing and dancing.   In his direction, Chris Columbus has broken away from the confines of the original production, but he never manages to bring us into the world of the people we're watching.  Despite the constantly tracking - sometimes even spinning - camera he has chosen to employ, the film still feels stagy, over-stylized and artificial in almost every scene.As to the libretto by the late Jonathon Larsen, only one tune strikes me as truly memorable, while the rest all sound like repetitive musical doodling.  One of the problems, too, with having so much of the conversation sung rather than spoken is that the lines are sometimes so utilitarian, pedestrian and prosaic - when they aren't pseudo-intellectual drivel on the order of "the opposite of war isn't peace; it's creation" - that they become unintentionally funny when set to music.  It's not for nothing that the Sharks and the Jets didn't actually sing out most of their confrontations.There are, admittedly, some very moving passages in the last half hour of the film as the disease finally begins taking its grim toll on several of the characters, but those moments of quality are completely undercut by one of the silliest copout endings I have ever seen in a motion picture.  In that one crucial moment, the movie descends to the level of low comedy and farce, taking any pretensions to seriousness right down the drain with it.I don`t question for a moment the basic humanity and sincerity of the people responsible for "Rent" (or of its many devoted followers), but it`s hard to get too worked up over a story whose premise seems to be that people - especially "sensitive" artists - should be allowed to live on other people`s properties for free</review_text>
Three problems with this film:1. PACING - The film's pacing doesn't vary.  It's very boring.  As a matter of fact, this wouldn't be a problem if the film were much more tense (e.g., "Speed"), however this film lacks the high-action intensity to pull off such a slow expository speed.2. EFFECTS - Too many sequences of this film rely on color and light superimpositions, and there is an overabundance of high-speed imaging.  The scene changes that employ erratic barrages of images desensitize the viewer from the thrilling "horror" scenes.  Furthermore, they fail to make enough sequential sense of the film's plot to really mean much to the film as a greater whole.  The upshot: the film relies too heavily on the art of editing, to the point where plot twists are no longer interesting.3. TRIVIALITY - The plot's conclusion quails in the face of the "so what?" question.  The viewer is left with a sense of, "I sat through the film for THAT?"  In light of points (1) and (2), this obnoxious bit is the icing on the cake.Don't waste your life.ALon</review_text>
Interesting premise, but the plot is like swiss cheese.This review will just be a point by point of all the major things that I found so implausable that I couldn't just suspend disbelief and enjoy the ride. Spoilers alert.I wasn't able to make the leap to believing Sarah's sudden turn towards malicious opportunism as soon as she saw the cash. When questioned about what she would do if she found some hypothetical millions, she insists with chirpy disinterest that she would certainly turn it in. Just one scene of her looking longingly at a brochure for a holiday she couldn't afford would have established some repressed dissatisfation with her life situation, but her general demeanor seemed to suggest not only comfort, but satisfaction.Why did Hank decide he would burn the money instead of return it if it turned out someone legitimately owned it? Surely it wouldn't be too difficult to anonymously return it without being implicated in it's disappearance.The first murder, after the old guy regained consciousness, why did Hank not try to negotiate with or threaten the old guy to keep quiet about his brother assaulting him? For Hank, finishing the job his brother started didn't seem like an absolute last resort, it seemed like he took the murder lightly.When Hank got home apparently he volunteered information to his wife about what he'd just done. What? Like he knew she'd be understanding about it or something? Hi honey, I'm home, by the way I just killed a man to protect the money. Wtf?When Jacob shot Lou to protect Hank, why didn't Hank just give the tape back before it got to that point?The shotgun impact on Lou's wife was cartoonishly ridiculous, sending her flying three feet into the air when the blast didn't even hit her at an upward trajectory.And the final ridiculous flaw. Jacob taking the fake FBI agent's gun, and instead of just shooting himself before his brother had time to react, he hands it to his brother, and charges him with the responsibility of killing him, setting up the final emotional crescendo of the film. Supposedly the explanation was that it wouldn't look like the fake FBI agent shot Jacob if the shot was fired at point blank range, but why not? Why couldn't forensic investigators at the scene believe an altercation could have transpired where Jacob charged at the gunman from behind when he was about to shoot the sheriff, wrestled with him, and wound up taking a point blank shot to the head? It really makes no sense.One inspiredly believable moment I will give them film credit for is Hank's difficulty in finding the bullets in the sheriff's office and loading the gun. A lazier writer would have just had him find the gun loaded.If the major plot developments were fleshed out in more detail to be made believable this could have been a great film. As it is, it's a frustratingly flaw-ridden glimpse of what could have been and a waste of time to watch.</review_text>
The problem with this film is I read the book.  I was disappointed simply because `Be Cool' is an obvious showcase for the musical talent.  The overly long dance sequence with John Travolta and Uma Thurman is a prime example.  Somewhere the bulk of the story was lost--and there are some very--very good characters appearing in the film that would've been more intersing if somebody would've said, "HEY, don't forget the book!"  But being true to the original source is not Hollywood's strong suit.  "Be Cool" provides some popular music, some known faces, but without John Travolta, the movie would never have been made.A few laughs are provided.  A couple ironic scenes show up, but there's too little to sustain a full-length feature.  Basically, the project is a disservice to everyone involved.  Some of the characters are so thin--face it--poor Christina Milian as Linda Moon, is reduced to being a voice that sways when she sings--a clich.  The Rock does the best he can but again, `He's a gay bodyguard;' he's the  brunt of insulting jokes offered up by a Raji, his boss [Vince Vaughn], who, in the book, is far more sinister--but in the film he's an idiot.Of course Chili is Chili. Travolta does a very nice job, and Chili's obviously the smartest guy in the room.  Uma Thruman's performance is, well, not funny--not serious, not intense--not much-- at best, she made me shrug.  I do like what Harvey Keitel did with Nick Carr, but there's just not enough, and all the negatives reflect completely on the director.  Enough said there.My advice, watch `Get Shorty'again, or read `Be Cool.'</review_text>
Waste of money.  Waste of time.  Well-known cast.  Amateurish direction.  Plotless.  Politically correct to the point of being stupid.  The film's incessant attempts at humor fail.  Eric Roberts' character laughs-off his grave circumstance throughout most of the film.  He is self-important, Godless and emotionally false.  It's difficult to empathize with such an unrealisitic character.  The best performances in this film were given by Gregory Harrison and Lee Grant.  The best scene is Gregory Harrison and Eric Roberts' passionate farewell kiss.  Most authentic moment in the film: Lee Grant's reaction to her dying son being carried off.  Very difficult to watch through in one-sitting because it's so repetitive and vapid. You will wait and wait for something to happen and nothing ever does until the final moments.  If you choose to waste your time with this film, you'll be sorry you did</review_text>
PRIVATE RESORT is the kind of movie that was geared towards young adult audiences in the mid-80s when sexual awareness and exposition were the hot ticket in theatres.  However, I'm sure this film is one that Johnny Depp, Hector Elizondo and Rob Morrow aren't proud to have on their resume.The movie's plot is slim, and neither Morrow or Depp have any screen presence in this early stage of their careers.  Elizondo tries gamely and pulls off a few laughs, but he's not at his best either.  Most of the film's laughs come from Leslie Hope as a slightly off kilter cosmic bimbo; Dody Goodman as a dotty old lady who knows karate and Tony Azito as a bumbling hotel security guard.  There's lots of slapstick, some of it works, most of it doesn't.  You can do better, folks</review_text>
I love this film.  It's epic storytelling on a grand scale and timeless viewing.  I was thrilled to see it being released on DVD , UNFORTUNATELY it seems there was little if any restoration on the print used.  I have only viewed sections of the film so far but EVERY frame I have seen has surface dirt or scratches.  In one section there are long scratches down the entire side of the picture.  I was so looking forward to seeing something close to a pristine print which is what a film of this calibre deserves.  I'd have given 5 stars if it had, so the minus three is for the appaling print .  One of  the worst I've ever seen</review_text>
Fresh Horses, on paper, would have seemed to have been a perfect hit script. You had Molly Ringwald, with her porcelain skin and delicately curly red-blonde hair. You had Andrew McCarthy with his boyish charm but also the male strength beginning to come through. You had a romantic triangle. You had the "class divide". The Brat Pack was loved by millions. How could this fail?The problem really does seem to come down to the actors themselves. There's very little "energy" at all to this story which is supposedly about passion overcoming logic. Molly is a 16 yr old girl in rural Kentucky. When her stepfather begins fondling her, and her mother does little to help, Molly tries for the only escape she can find - marrying the older bad-man-in-town, Viggo Mortensen. She claims she never slept with Viggo - only used him for escape. Then Viggo's father began fondling her, and now she wants out of this house as well.To get momentary relief from her homelife, she hangs out at a friend's home, which is a 24 hour party. Here she runs into Andrew. Andrew is a very serious student who has just gotten engaged to his high-class, wealthy girlfriend. The girlfriend rambles on and on about china patterns, having children and living the perfect life. Andrew goes with the flow until he sees Molly - and is instantly in lust. Molly leads him to believe she's 20, single, and interested in him. It takes maybe 3 days before he's sleeping with her. To his credit, he does tell his fiancee promptly, and breaks off the engagement.You'd think everything was wonderful now, right? However, Andrew learns from friends about Molly's lies. He decides to keep seeing her anyway. However, he doesn't want to introduce her to his family, and has no intention of marrying her. He says he loves her - but his feelings seem to be more related to sex. At one point he even gives her a wad of cash to buy her off.There's a telling scene near the end when Andrew thinks Molly has been publicly stripped by her husband. Andrew storms off to their house to have a talk with Viggo. Andrew is deliberately rude - laughing at Viggo's artwork and putting him down. But it's Viggo who is the calm one here. When Molly shows up, Viggo points out that Molly's been doing all this lying and scheming so that Andrew would be a Knight in Shining Armor and ride off with her. He asks Andrew - if you're saying I'm not good enough for her - it seems that you think you're too good for her, right? Andrew finds himself agreeing - that he won't take on Molly himself. He wants to get Molly away from Viggo, but then is going to abandon her to her own means. How could he figure that Molly would be better off with nobody at all, vs with Viggo?Fast forward to a year later, and Molly has in fact found herself a "wealthy college boy" to take care of her and is taking classes again. She's happy, and Andrew is sad. I suppose you have to give them credit for a not-typical Hollywood ending to the story.The landscapes are often gorgeous, and the various details of high class, low class, city, country are all played nicely against each other. So the problem really comes down to the main actors. Molly and Andrew maybe have gotten too used to playing ensemble roles where each person just has to be a stereotype without a lot of depth. You really get a sense of shallowness when you're watching this movie. Andrew has an entire life including a long-term romance, that he's set in. In just 3 days he's thrown it all away for Molly - but you never get any real sense that he cares about her. Molly was supposedly taking some quite desperate steps to find safety in her life - including seducing and lying to Andrew in order to convince him to rescue her - but she never seems to care much either.Intriguingly, only 2 people really seem to have depth in this movie. One is Ben Stiller, Andrew's best friend. It's ironic because Ben's character IS shallow and cares more for himself than for those around him. Even so, Ben really seems authentic as someone who isn't used to having to worry about others - but who really does try his best, many times, to get Andrew to wake up to reality. The other is Viggo Mortensen. You only glimpse Viggo once until the end of the movie - he's just referred to as a "rough guy" who has done many bad things. When you actually encounter Viggo (after Andrew has in essence broken into his house to confront him) you're prepared for the worst. However, Viggo is very patient, very well spoken, and quite intelligent in his commentary. He doesn't thrash Andrew for sleeping with his wife. Instead, he lays out the situation and makes both Andrew and Molly face their failings. Molly deliberately lied and used Andrew as a tool of getting a better life. Andrew, for his part, knew he'd never actually rescue Molly but led her on repeatedly to have time with her.Some have said this is the worst movie ever. Many sections of it can be very painful to watch. However, I do find glimmers of meaning - especially in the ending discussion with Viggo. Even there, though, you would think this would be a moment of great soul searching for Andrew and Molly. Instead, both seem to think, "Yeah, I guess that's true. Oh well, see ya." I don't mind gloomy movies at all - in fact I really appreciate them sometimes. However, if a movie has no depth of character or quality acting, it just makes the whole experience fall flat.</review_text>
This is an extremely dry anime.  The manga version by Masamune Shirow is filled with bits of humor.  Not so for the anime.  The character Batou was especially funny in the manga, but, for reasons unknown, he is the driest character in the already humorless anime version.Expect long scenes filled with monotonous talking.  These really make the movie crawl.  One minute there's action, next you're listening to Matoko or Batou go on and on about existentialism.  Seriously, these little talks, take up 3/4 of the movie.The visuals are awesome, no question about that.  Even so, they do not fulfill the need for SOME kind of thread of a story.  Altogether, not much actually, HAPPENS during the movie.If you must see it, rent it first to be sure you want it</review_text>
This movie could've been something, had they gotten some real actors, a script and a director. Well, they didn't, and this movie is an embarassment to mankind</review_text>
Ella Enchanted has been my favorite book for years and when I heard that they were going to make it into a movie, I was estatic. I marked the movie release date on my calander, got my tickets in advance, and waited on pins and needles on the way to the theater.The movie was a huge dissapointment. While I wasn't expecting the movie to be just like the book, I certainly wasn't expecting that. While the movie itself was funny and an overall good movie, I hated it because it was absolutley nothing like the book. The only common thread I found were the names of the characters and the fact that Ella was cursed from birth.I suggest that you go and read the book if you enjoyed the movie, it is far better with an increadible story line and an ending that still brings me to tears, despite the fact that I've read it over 100 times</review_text>
Off-hand, I can't think of a worse movie. (And I think Nicolas Cage has done some truly awesome work in other films--hey, he's making a buck, here.) That's all. 1/32 star, if possible</review_text>
this must have seemed like a great idea at the time,"cast culkin against type as a killer child and show his range as an actor". the problem is his range is all the way from a to b.this movie never explains how or why the boy turns killer and asks us to except one too many "chance" happenings. in the end all we get is this "thriller"(and i use the term very loosely)that thinks just the idea of culkin as a killer is thrilling</review_text>
While many of the details have been lost to time as well as the consumption of copious amounts of alcohol to numb the pain caused by the first 40 minutes or so of this celluloid nightmare, there is just enough in my memory to offer a carefully crafted, yet sharply vitriolic rebuke of this horror.In my more than four decades on this planet, there is only one film that caused such a level of disbelief, disgust and abhorrence that I actually walked out of a theater halfway through its showing. It was a film so onerous, pointless and unfunny, that it stands in the pantheon of some of the most colossal wastes of time, money and talent in the history of Western Civilization. That film is "Cabin Boy."To some, "Cabin Boy" may well serve as the cornerstone of an evening's entertainment, assuming the evening also features sock puppets and pirate hats made out of newspaper. Imagine watching someone pick at a zit for several hours then eat a sandwich. That's the kind of inventive, knee-slapping, laugh-out-loud fun you'll find in "Cabin Boy."Having some respect for Chris Elliott's work on the old Letterman Show on NBC, I was profoundly disappointed by this unspeakably inept attempt at humor. If it doesn't induce deep REM sleep, "Cabin Boy" will surely leave you either angry or depressed. One would venture to guess these were not the results Elliott intended.Letterman's genius-level cameo notwithstanding, "Cabin Boy" is about as funny as a prostate exam...without the "local" and the lube.</review_text>
Whenever I'm asked what is the worst movie I have ever seen, I quickly respond, "Cabin Boy." It is like a long, meandering, and entirely pointless joke one might hear from an obnoxious coworker. I would describe the plot, but there is none. I watched the entire movie waiting for the punchline, but it never came. It was written by a former staff writer for David Letterman, which is the only conceivable reason that Letterman would agree to appear in such a monstrosity. Even he later joked about how awful the movie was. Chris Elliott plays the only character he has ever played--the annoyimg dumb guy loser. His limited acting talent, combined with a nonsensical plot, unfunny dialogue, and an absurd tendency to confuse silliness with humor, truly make Cabin Boy a cinematic experience everyone should miss</review_text>
this is another story that I don't know if I like it or not because Amazon.com never sent it too me.  this has happened about 4/5 times.  While usually I have no problem getting movies, sometimes I do.  sending them e-mails doesn't seem to work.  If they didn't have the best prices for movies, I'd leave</review_text>
Ken Russell is a gifted director, as his erratic career has proved, but even the great Vanessa Redgrave can't save this one. "The Devils," a gaudy, loud attempt to blend period detail with stark surrealism, went painfully awry. Grisly images of plague victims, quack cures, peculiar enemas, and Oliver Reed being burned at the stake were doubtless meant to provide realistic detail--unfortunately, they are merely stomach-turning. A stocky, wild-eyed Oliver Reed is sadly lacking in erotic appeal as Father Grandier, the womanizing priest of a seventeenth-century French town, and most of the other characters are so unlikable that one wishes the entire town had been burned at the stake. Gemma Jones is one bright spot as Grandier's innocent love interest, and Ms. Redgrave gives her all to the thankless role of Sister Jeanne, but the film as a whole is unpalatable and disturbing. Not for the faint of heart</review_text>
yeah, ok, Ice Cube is a bounty hunter and Mike Epps is a criminal who ends up teaming up with him to defeat the badguys,am I right on that...right. the story is great but not that great. so many holes and so many stupid supporting characters doesnt make up for the seemingly endless movie with a taste in your mouth that sits there and then makes your mouth all icky, thats what it was like for me folks. god I almost fell asleep at that photo shootout and then the other one where at the end with the boat and superlame climax. put some thought into your head as you are about to watch this. for Cube and Epps and Eva Mendes fans only. and if you wanna see an old lady in a raincoat like coat with a thong bikini on it, then this is the film for you</review_text>
The first half hour of this 90 minute movie is actually quite good.  In fact, it is enthralling and has an interesting twist in that we don't know the real fact behind whether a young woman was violated by her boyfriend while unconscious.  According to the rumor (the rumor being a school experiment conducted by three roommates) she was, however, but we the audience don't know that.  However, the young woman is quick to think she has been raped.  Why there is no attempt at a physical exam, is unexplained, especially since the young woman involved has the reputation of being a professional virgin, however it turns out she isn't, so that's why the movie lasts longer than 30 minutes.  Fortunately, we're not dealing with unwanted pregnancies, either, so this doesn't turn into a soap opera.  However, we do have the dreamboat "hero" who dreams up the rumor about her being raped, and who exhibits unlikeable traits throughout. But that's true of the three leads - the roommates are all unlikeable, being insufferably full of themselves.  The last half of the film, 'dreamboat' takes the turn as lead character, and it's his story we're following, whereas his female roommate had the first half of the film, and basically it's her introduction to the audience of all the characters. Turns out 'dreamboat' and the young woman victim have a history together; which means issues they have to work out, and everyone else (in a way, the entire student body and its faculty and local law enforcement) is sucked into their story and mutual thirst for truth, though the characters don't have the same truth in mind - it's about vengeance; not justice.  And vengeance when it's not the comic book variety, isn't fun for an audience, it's just distasteful.  In other words, the man and woman should have been shut up together in a room so they could have worked it out for themselves, and left the rest of us alone.  So from a brilliant first half-hour - and btw how does the roommate penniless art student have the dollars for all that tech equipment? - we degenerate into a constantly weaving pattern of lies and deceptions that seems more pointless than clever.  There is merely too much story, so it becomes ridiculous.  A basically good premise is ruined.  If you are a fan of any of the stars involved, it might be worth viewing, if only once, but the film as a whole will probably leave a vile taste in your mouth.  Perhaps that's the ultimate message on a film about the dangers of spreading GOSSIP, or in this case deliberate lies, is that what goes around comes around, and also it will leave you feeling sick to your stomach.  I almost recommend you watch the first 30-45 min then quit midway, but anyone will watch all the way thru at least once, just to be sure where this is headed</review_text>
this is another story that I don't know if I like it or not because Amazon.com never sent it too me.  this has happened about 4/5 times.  While usually I have no problem getting movies, sometimes I do.  sending them e-mails doesn't seem to work.  If they didn't have the best prices for movies, I'd leave</review_text>
Reality Bites seemed fresh when it was first released, giving voice to a generation - with the unfortunately derogative soubriquet of "X" - that was overeducated, underemployed, plagued by the flashy, trashy commercialism of MTV, and stunningly superficial in its wholehearted embrace of pop culture and rejection of serious moral or philosophical discourse it might have stumbled across in college.It was a good start because transitioning from the idyllic and unreal world of college to the crass, cruel arena of materialism can be tough, providing limitless opportunities for challenge and personal growth - the very stuff of real movies.  Instead we have a swan dive into a Pizza Hut commercial held together by a plot so shop-worn it would have been considered exhausted in 1930.Winona Ryder is winning as Lelaina, but one can only imagine the SATs of football players at a college where she is valedictorian.  Her "documentary" is appallingly narcissistic, reflecting the characteristic Gen X notion that - "if it's about me, it's art, and it's important."  Ethan Hawke does an excellent job as Troy, the very archetype of self-satisfied, supercilious entitlement.  We are expected to root for him, but it's hard to refrain from hoping he gets hit by a bus.Stiller, who directed - a talented fellow almost impossible to look at - plays Michael, the "anti-Troy."  Smooth, successful, and very much plugged into the contemporary franchising of Gen X culture - if culture is the right word - he's an executive at an MTV-ish corporation.  That he improves Lelaina's preposterous "documentary," rather than destroying its alleged artistic integrity, is the film's dirty little secret.Viewers surprised by who wins Lelaina's hand will also be stunned to learn that professional wrestling is fixed and Liberace was gay.  Indeed, when you strip away the thin veneer of pop culture references this is really a very traditional movie.  Janeane Garofalo is outstanding as always, and John Mahoney shines as the TV morning chat show host who looks sweet and avuncular on camera but is in fact, a bastard.  His performance says more about the likelihood of finding anything even remotely resembling reality in film - or on TV - than the rest of this film put together.In fact, reality is great, this picture would have benefited from some</review_text>
If this is the generation I am supposed to belong to, I want to disown it.  Ben Stiller's directorial debut centers on four friends recently graduated from collage, and are now trying to find their way in the world.  The movies messege is that we are a lost generation, but that is not are parent's fault (where this movie tries to lay the blame).  The kids in this movie are just lazy, more or less.  And they spend their free time trying to make meaning out of their lives.  Indeed, Troy (Ethan Hawke) even tries to ratinalize stealing a candy bar by saying society ows him.  Winona Ryder plays waify Lelina, who makes a documentry out of recorded footage she has of her friends.  One day she meets Michael (Ben Stiller) who is their age but has made a good career out of the TV industry.  Ethan hates him for his honest approach to life, and so the battle for Lelina's love begins.  I really wasn't too impressed with this movie, it just made it seem like my peers are just wallowing in self pity for the sake of being the cool, tortured artist; when they should get off the couch and go get a job</review_text>
Sat down and saw this one on televion.Only good service was that now I know buying the DVD would be a waste of money.What was actually achieved by the British is portrayed as an American achievement. Slanders the U-boat men portraying them as heartless marauders. Other than allied Propoganda pieces, There are no incidents of U-boats machinegunning people in lifeboats.The movie itself I have little respect. Basicly Plotless and  unrealistic. Action scenes unbelievable. Characters Two Dimensional.This film Awful.</review_text>
Man, I don't know what the other reviewers of this movie were smoking, but it should be illegal!  This is, first off, a terrible DVD: 4:3 (full screen) format, with a dark, muddy picture.  Worse, the plot is typical, predictable, and poorly written.  Other than looking for glimpses of Teri Hatcher's body, sitting through this fiasco is a total bore.  I was also surprised at how bad Teri's acting was in this movie, since I've seen her do much better in things she was in previous to this.  That is probably the fault of the director, Erik Anjou, a third-rate director (at best!) who has done a total of two movies and one documentary.  Gee, I wonder why he isn't in more demand (NOT!)!I can enjoy "B" movies, and bad movies, but this one is just so totally non-involving that it is not even good enough to laugh at.  I can't imagine that this mess was released on DVD for any reason other than to cash in on Teri Hatcher's current popularity, and to suck the cash out of people who are anxious to see a younger (29 year-old) Teri Hatcher nude.Rent this, if you must, but, wow, there is no reason anyone should want to buy a movie this bad</review_text>
I agree with David Thomson when he says few audiences in the West would be content to view an American epic composed solely of battles and their contexts. Kurosawa was a keen businessman and his reputation in the West was entrenched with "Kagemusha" and "Ran", he knew what (American) audiences think of as heroic and mystical about "historical" Japan: Kurosawa's art takes a great deal on its impetus from what Americans (or Westerners) imagine about Japan. He was not popular in Japan (where they thought his stuff was particularly hokey and outmoded, hence the suicide attempt). I am not saying that the work is rubbish - there is no "ugly" shot in either "Ran" or "Kag" - merely that there are more "authentically Japanese" films out there to choose from.</review_text>
"Four Brothers" is yet another nail in the coffin of John Singleton's increasingly moribund moviemaking career.  The director - who burst upon the scene in 1991 with the vibrant and gritty "Boyz n the Hood" - has here mounted a film so burdened by implausibility and contrivance that it makes one wonder if the once-promising filmmaker will ever be able to get back on track again.  The story, reeking of artificiality, features Mark Wahlberg, Tyrese Gibson, Andre Benjamin and Garrett Hedlund as four troubled young men raised by the same foster mother.  When she is killed in a convenience store robbery, the quartet launches into action, seeking revenge against the perpetrators and becoming slowly convinced, through their investigation in the neighborhood, that the killing might not have been as random in nature as they had been initially led to believe.The main weakness of this film is that it gives us virtually no reason to care about any of the characters.  By not showing us any scenes between the boys and their foster mother (except for one embarrassingly bad Thanksgiving dinner fantasy sequence that looks as if it were conceived by a first-year film student), we are forced to take their relationship totally on faith, rendering the boys' thirst for revenge arbitrary at worst and academic at best.The acting is uniformly flat, with the characters little more than wafer-thin stereotypes, and even the action scenes come across as surprisingly mundane and second-rate given the Singleton pedigree in this area.  The boys' running around from venue to venue in their Detroit neighborhood, brandishing guns in full view of the populace and screaming for information about their mother's killer, is ludicrous on the face of it and often reduces the film to the level of cheap low comedy burlesque.With nary a single moment that rings believable or true, "Four Brothers" is by-the-book filmmaking from a director who has proven that he has the wherewithal and talent to do so much more.</review_text>
I knew I was in trouble with FOUR BROTHERS when I saw that Josh Howard (of SPORTS NIGHT fame) was scowling hard, trying to be a tough Detroit cop. Not believable for a nanosecond. And then it got worse when Marky Mark said, "Why don't you two cops get some doughnuts and coffee?"The rest of the film veers along in that kind of lame and clichd rhythm. Almost every scene in this thing is a howler. And watching it, I remembered I hadn't forgiven Tyrese Gibson for the travesty that was 2 FAST 2 FURIOUS. Still, Tyrese is better than Garrett Hedlund, who looks like he's a refugee from THE OUTSIDERS.But the movie's not a total wash; after all, it's got a GREAT soundtrack</review_text>
I got this film because I'm from Detroit where this takes place. It's a pretty typical revenge flick. Four brothers want to find their adoptive mother's killer. Usual smartass remarks, guys talking BS, fights, shootouts, blah, blah, blah. I guess these kind of movies will always be made and when made well they can be fun to watch. This script was mediocre at best. Give me a Clint Eastwood or Bruce Willis film any day over this tripe.</review_text>
The Virgin Suicides starring Kristen Dunst, Josh Hartnett, Kathleen Turner and James Woods lacks depth and a convincing storyline. This film is directed by Sofia Coppola (Lost in Translation), I really tried to like this movie but I was fooling myself, you would think this movie would be a hidden gem because of the Coppola legacy but just because your father is Frances Ford Coppola doesn't mean you belong in the same category as best director of all-time. Sometimes magic does not stirke twice. How can all five sisters end up killing themselves, their homelife wasn't that unbearable, a lot of parents are religious, but that doesn't mean you'll wind up with thoughts of impending suicide. Kristen Dunst just gets on my nerves, her acting is the same in every film. Don't believe the hype, The Virgin Suicides is not a groundbreaking, poetic film</review_text>
I was expecting much more from this video. It did have kids doing poses, but it was hard to find the 13 year-old. Some of the circle games looked like they might  be fun.   I wanted to show  it to my third grade class, but I don't think it would hold their interest.  All in all I felt I was watching someone's home video of their family doing yoga</review_text>
For that matter it can be written for any party candidate that wants the truth of his/her dirty secrets covered up. I feel that it's the most insulting film to be released. It hides the fact that we as citizens, and our government don't really care about who we stick in office. If the party lines up with what we believe in screw the fact he had to cover something up. I can't fathom why we continue to fall for this all the time, and believe me I don't feel it's right to air it all over the news either. I feel that it comes down to the man, and if he does have the values his/her party believes in then he will do the honorable thing, and own up to his/her mistake. This movie is just another nail to drive into the justification that it's alright to cover things up, and there are no absolutes, or rights or wrongs. Wht happens when we tick off the wrong person who's rich? Do we wait until then to change the moral? That's Pathetic, and so is this movie</review_text>
This is much more interesting as a visual chronicle of 1982 New York (there are generous aerial views, lots of location shooting, etc.) than as a horror movie, even a cheesy one.  The special effects are used extremely sparingly, with the word "special" being a definite overstatement.  Some amusing performances somewhat redeem the proceedings, but not by much.  In the end, "Q, The Winged Serpent" is watchable and certainly not horribly bad, but it's hard to imagine this being anybody's favorite horror movie or even guilty pleasure.  To end on a positive note, the DVD features a clean, sharp print of the film.</review_text>
The recent disappearance of Spalding Gray has made me realize what I don't like about this film: its narcissism.  It's Gray's defining characteristic.  After a while, despite Jonathan Demme's fabulous direction (he makes the  best of a limited repertoire) it just gets boring</review_text>
I read the book when it was first published and then a friend had a son diagnosed with leukemia and went through the same thing as the Mom in the book. Fortunately he had a lot of advocates that pushed him to ignore the insurance company and his son finally found a donor match but it was too late. So I feared that this movie would not be up to the book. My fears were unfounded, the casting was brilliant and I loved this movie, even though it is tough to watch, I still catch it in reruns on the satellite occasionally and "must watch". That is how good it is</review_text>
The opening strip scene is reminiscent of Barbarella - too bad those aren't Basinger's legs though. Nerdy scientist falls for galactic beauty as presented by Kim Basinger. I have never understood Ackroyd's characters. And keeping in form, he is once again as unfunny as mud. Basinger tries so hard - too hard - to rescue this film, but that's no small task considering the ineptness of this way silly film. OK so she munches on batteries, and thinks she has to cook everything in the kitchen at mealtime. She seems a genuine Betty Crocker given that her favorite foods are nuts and bolts. Jon Lovitch also tries to prop up Ackroyd and this weak script. However, his contribution seems way overstated to me. He doesn't have much to do. Funny are the scenes inwhere the teenage girl eventually decides that her step-mother is not like other people. Basinger's character has a magic purse with an annoying creepy critter in it who tells her what to do. Think, Jar-Jar Blinks. I suppose it's OK as a backdrop for housecleaning. But that's it. Flat and mechanical</review_text>
This movie is basically about 12 yr. old boys crying with each other.  When does that ever happen?  The dialogue is completely unbelievable considering the age of these kids.  What 12 yr. old worries about "..never getting out of this small town."?I guess if your childhood consisted of sitting around and crying with your friends, then you might enjoy this movie in some lame nostalgic sense.  I have a feeling Oprah would like this movie.</review_text>
Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..</review_text>
Okay, it's not high art but this film has something to say all be it in a round about fashion.  It does make the viewer wonder about modern medicine and how it can possibly affect those who take it on a regular basis.  On the other hand, the film lacks true suspense.  I was hoping for an explosive opening scene when the baby is first born and instead was offered a yawn.  The baby itself is about as scary as fozzy bear and while there is some blood flow it is kept to a minimum.  The pacing is too slow at times and it just doesn't stand up that well today.  The actors who took part in this didn't go anywhere say for the father who went on to appear in the sequel.  Why there was a sequel is beyond me.  I recall how frightening the commercial was for this film when it first came out but I was only five at the time.  At the most this is a rent not a buy.  I guess good for it's time but perhaps a re-make would pump some needed life into the story.</review_text>
I am so disappointed that it did not have any closed caption or subtitle for the deaf.  I had to return it</review_text>
Unless you enjoy movies that are not funny, not scary, and have the worst actors this side of rodeo clowns, DO NOT WATCH this series of horrible flicks.  Putrid!  Not even "so-bad-it's-funny". Absolutely the worst films in the history of mankind!  Heed my warning!  SUCKS!!</review_text>
What does WILD THINGS 2 have going against it from the get-go:A) No Denise Richards  B) No name actors  C)Being a crappy direct-to-video sequel  D)No Denise Richards NAKED . . .What is wrong with WILD THINGS 2 after the fact:A)A script that tries to overcompensate its idiocy with more twists than a corkscrew  B)ONE sex scene -- A (weak) threesome, one of the few things even linking this to the original C)Sexy actresses who star in a sexy movie but decide not to be naked (leaving us with a body double and naked-from-behind shot) . . . Wait let me play that again!If I seem to be dwelling a little too much on the sexuality aspects of this film maybe its because this is an EROTIC THRILLER.Did I mention no Denise Richards?</review_text>
This straight-to-video's modest budget is attested to by the fact that while most of the action is supposed to take place at a large state prison, this prison only seems to house about 12 inmates. The plot is that old but reliable one about a man posing as a prisoner so he can go "undercover" and solve a crime. The crime in this case is not especially interesting and it's resolved in much too pat a fashion. However, leading man Tommy Lee Thomas looks good with his shirt off, (though he seems too small to be throwing his weight around), and there's a torture scene, (modeled on the one in "Lethal Weapon"), in which he's hanged by his wrists and zapped with electric shocks. Mr. Thomas' performance may not be of Oscar caliber but he does know how to yell.</review_text>
I read the book when it was first published and then a friend had a son diagnosed with leukemia and went through the same thing as the Mom in the book. Fortunately he had a lot of advocates that pushed him to ignore the insurance company and his son finally found a donor match but it was too late. So I feared that this movie would not be up to the book. My fears were unfounded, the casting was brilliant and I loved this movie, even though it is tough to watch, I still catch it in reruns on the satellite occasionally and "must watch". That is how good it is</review_text>
Admittedly the film is clever and the acting is good and it has it's moments of entertainment, BUT overall it's long and pretty boring.  It seems it would have been better suited as a play, which apparently it was originally.  I had just finished re-reading Romeo and Juliet when I rented this, thinking I was still in a Shakespeare mood, but this didn't do it for me.  I suppose if I had just finished reading or watching Hamlet, it would have been better.  My favorite parts are Oldman's silent scientific discoveries, completely amusing.  Couldn't wait for the movie to end, honestly</review_text>
I was very gung ho when I found out that Disney was finally releasing the Davy Crockett TV show on DVD.  I grew up watching the two Davy Crockett movies.  HOwever upon actually seeing these DVDs I was very disappointed.  It is exactly the same as those two movies it is just split into five seperate episodes.  The Episodes: Davy Crockett, Indian Fighter; Davy Crockett Goes to Congress; and Davy Crockett at the Alamo are all the parts included in the movie Davy Crockett King of the Wild Frontier.  The episodes Davy Crockett's Keelboat Race; Davy Crockett and the River Pirates; were what made up the movie Davy Crockett and the River Pirates.  I for one am planning on buying the newer version that came out in 2004 that is just the two movies on one disc.  The only difference between this set and the new set is that there are couple of features on this set and that there are introductions to the episodes buy Leonard Maltin and it has two discs in a tin collector's box.  The biggest difference of all is that this set runs from between $37-$100 whereas you can buy the two movies on DVD for $14-$16.  I myself will go for the cheaper movie set rather than have to watch each episode sperately.</review_text>
When a movie producer in 1998 foregoes available spectrum of colors and technology opting to feed his audience grain-black, white and jittery gray, the result had better be good. That fraction of members of the technicolor-drunk general viewing audience who will even stipulate to watch such a thing do so at decided perils of time and money, push Play alongside Mr. Benefit-Of-A-Doubt and strain to see if it works. Thus begins the argument of effect and more specifically, that of color. The problem with a black and white movie is that very few movies that resort to that, despite some grand intention, DO NOT WORK, or, in the alternative, DO NOT WORK AS WELL. Citing two examples - SIN CITY which is near-tolerable acting paired with an absurd choice of black and white, tantamount to robbery, and GOOD NIGHT AMERICA which is all and about the same. The dilemma with black and white productions is that regardless of how well it comes together, there seems always a thread of an argument in the back of one's mind that if one must resort to black and white to make one's point, one might be better served as a charcoal artist. Color is the medium of life. From a budgetary perspective, black and white films save money as the 'challenges' of color, which, in a good feature, can be excessive, are thus eliminated. Yet complications arise - for instance - I wasn't sure if that was blood or motor oil dripping from that guy's hand. Similarly, the entire cast in SIN CITY could have been wearing hot pink, in shades of course, and we would never know. Yet of course this is no excuse to dislike a movie - or is it? One wonders, however, that, if PI production would have had more money, would they have opted for color? Moot point. It's done.Notwithstanding the obvious that I don't prefer black and white movies and incidentally don't know lots of people who do, PI, although a courageous artistic attempt with significant merits ranging from creative camera work, clever symbolism and high-octane guts, seems to lanquish for other reasons. Despite PI's visceral intensity which is delibertaely hot-wired throughout, spinning out scenes that sizzle the nerves, after Max's third or fourth headache it gives up the ghost. As as result, the movie stays earthbound, weighted down by a mediocre revolving-door plotline (obsessing man chases number grail looking for key to life while beset by outside forces including the recycling feeds of his own troubled mind), unremarkable narrative with a gem here and there, failing repetitive effect and thin, uninspiring 2-D support cast, leaving the movie wanting for depth and intelligent character interplay. Unresolved imagery and scenes lent the impression that this creative endeavor was a bit out of control and ad-hoc which is no fatal flaw in and of itself but in this case was signficantly detractive. Despite a reasonably decent stockpile of cinematic victories the battle wasn't won. The themes inspiring PI have excellent potential however this movie trafficked the runway like an antiquated flying machine - airborne one second, belly down the next. As a fine creative exercise, the creators are praised for their effort and bravery - PI is as bodacious as a skunk engaging rush-hour traffic and commands the watcher's attention until that undefined moment when boredom sets in. Contains subterranean theme seedlings which likely served as brain fertilizer for the subsequent more advanced spin-off -  "A Beautiful Mind"</review_text>
The Forgotten starring Julianne Moore and Domnic West is a slow, tepid, and hard to grasp film. The previews for this film were better than the actual movie, I guess that's a bad sign that the movie isn't going to be great (I'll try and remember that next time). The only reason I am giving The Fogotten 2 stars is the scene with Alfe Woodward, you'll know what I mean when it happens, the scence is scary and comes out of nowhere, very intrguing spurprise awaits. Anyways The Forgotten is a movie you should see once and that's it, happy viewing</review_text>
Nicky Cage was not very good in this cinematic decomplishment, as he turns  in a horrible acting job in this dull and boring movi</review_text>
a typical altman film. made to please himself not an audience. i don't know how he keeps getting financing. no one sees them except family and friends. additionally. it suffers from soft focus, out of focus, photography that will drive you nuts! after awhile you don't give a damn whether they have a wedding or not</review_text>
I have to disagree with the reviews above and say that I watched this movie on dvd having watched it as a kid twenty years ago. Unfortunately I couldn't find anything about this film I remember enjoying. It's a cross between The Blob, The Thing and a really crap detective movie. Moriarty's character is pretty smooth but the film culminates in a farce reminicent of an 80's kiddy movie. This film is definetly not for intelligent adults and you'll lose interest halfway through I guarantee it. No suspense, few laughs, and way to hokey to watch twice. If you love this movie you need to get out more.</review_text>
Michael Moriarity is my hero! He is just one of the coolest actors in my opinion. He has done such great B-movies as this, Q, and It's Alive 3: Island of the Alive. How awesome is he?? Anyways, I think that this movie was hilarious! I think a lot of people take this movie too seriously, thinking that it is going to be your typical movie. But you shouldn't because not only is this a B-movie, but IT IS supposed to be funny. My favorite part is when "the stuff" started bubbeling out of the ground and that old hick guy just starts eating it. Who would do that?? I just started laughing by butt off when that happened. So if you watch this movie, just sit back and enjoy it for what it's worth, don't be too critical on it.What I learned from The Stuff: Dairy products are evil! Especially if they come from with in the earth!If you like The Stuff, I recommend: Watching other B-movies, such as Island of the Alive 3, Zombi 3 and 4, etc</review_text>
Horrible family you care nothing for, and nobody you'd want in your own, and that's saying a lot since every family on earth is dysfunctional.  Even the nutty grandmother makes you want to slap her.  Hell, I really want to slap everyone on the cast, crew, and the writers.  I bought this for 5 bucks, and it wasn't worth 5 cents.  These people are unsympathetic, unbelievable, and totally made up.  The women wear too much eye-liner and spend most of the film rolling their eyes at each other and showing their midriffs.  I bought the movie because of Johnathan Schaech (based--okay--on his pretty face and his presence in That Thing You Do), but he's not even in it that much.  He's better looking than all the girls in it too--including the phony poser lesbian with the fabulous midriff when Alyssa dumps her.  I fast forwarded through this after the first half, pausing occasionally to hear dialogue that made Dumb and Dumber look like  Hemingway.In summation, if you like this movie, you have been dumbed down by the evil Hollywood machine, and I suggest you check out good foreign films like A Good Marriage and beautiful scandals like Valmont immediately.  There is no excuse for liking unmoving, plastic dreck of this nature.</review_text>
While a wonderful story, this movie ruins it with two child actors who make the movie painful to watch.A bit hard to understand why the child of two English parents would speak like she's from New Jersey!I couldn't watch the end of this it was so bad.Recommend you see another version.</review_text>
Nicky Cage was not very good in this cinematic decomplishment, as he turns  in a horrible acting job in this dull and boring movi</review_text>
The details are all fine if you don't know the middle east - but are not well researched and inconsistent.  I won't bore you with the list.All the big picture takeaway is that the middle east and big oil are a complicated business with many parties that have a big stake.  Tell us something new.The overall storyline does not have much else going for it - I was expecting more intrigue, a more synthesized story line.  A disappointment.</review_text>
Just rented this dvd and was quite surprised.  Normally, I'm a big George Clooney and Matt Damon fan.  However, in this film, their talents were underutilized and did not make up for the poor script, editing, and direction which made this film quite dull to watch.While the idea behind the movie is good, it could have been more entertaing, dramatic, or suspensful.  As another reviewer remarked, I was quite tempted to shut it off after 45 minutes and watch something else.  But, I did suffer through to the end, where the film just sort of ends and leaves viewers hanging..</review_text>
RKO filed for bankruptcy in the mid-1930's and was on the verge of finally getting back on their feet financially by 1940. I suspect that someone from their cost accounting group wandered into the studio commissary in 1939 and found it full of under-contract actors and production staff goofing off and eating studio food. They rounded up this group, stuffed the whole bunch onto an unused sound stage (with a leftover southwestern set) and got them singing and dancing to songs from a Rogers and Hart Broadway show (which they had an option on but had deemed unworthy of feature film treatment).The result was released as "Too Many Girls" (1940), financially practical because with almost everything already paid for (insert fixed cost here), the additional expense of actually producing something boiled down to a little electricity and some black and white film stock.No good reason to track this one down, it's pretty witless as a comedy-with the miscasting making for funnier moments than anything else in the film. Everyone except Ann Miller is too old to be playing college students and they try to pass Hal Le Roy (one of Hollywood's most effeminate actors) off as a college football All-American. I generally like this kind of stuff and will sit through anything to watch Ann Miller; so if it totally turned me off it is unlikely to appeal to most viewers.Mostly it is notable for what happened off camera as Lucy and Desi made their first connection.Some of the musical numbers by Rodgers and Hart were bearable; "Heroes in the Fall" and "Pottawatomie". Trudy Erwin dubs Lucy's only song. Francis Langford does most of the other numbers.Mildly wild heiress Connie Casey (Lucille Ball) returns from finishing school in Europe with an unusual request to attend her father's alma mater in New Mexico-Pottawatomie College. "You mean a lot to me, Pottawatomie. You hit the spot of me, Pottawatomie. I love Pottawatomie with all my anatomy. So every tot of me, that is begot of me, will go to Pot, Pot, Pottawatomie".Lucy was almost 30 at the time and even with "extreme" soft focus and minimal close-ups can't remotely pass for 18.Her father suspects that she has a boyfriend at the school and hires four Ivy League football stars to monitor the behavior of the new freshman. The four eventually end up playing for the school's hapless football team, which in a matter of a few days has changed its schedule to include games with big time programs like Nebraska, Columbia and Tennessee. There is a grand celebration at which the student body sings the following less-than-immortal lyrics: "You're a ham-better scram-Notre Dame, We'll make Williams wail, Army-you too Navy, Boo Hoo to Purdue, Georgia Tech day you'll dread-you're a wreck, Look at Brown turn blue, We'll make a bumpia out of Columbia, In a quota Minnesota's got to go, You'll see U of D, We'll have all the alphabet to shout out." (reviewers note: the U of D is the University of Detroit which was once a football power).The scale of this thing is ultimately its undoing as Broadway ensembles of 15 are replaced with a cast of hundreds (remember all those people sitting in the RKO commissary drawing paychecks for doing nothing). On risqu Broadway the girls who are still virgins wear beanies; in the film they wear them to signify that they have never been kissed (it is amusing to watch these aging and jaded RKO starlets trying to pass for ultra-chaste teens).There is a corny and unconvincing romance between Lucy and Richard Carlson; whose brand of wooden acting would eventually work to his advantage in 1950's science fiction films like "It Came From Outer Space".Then again, what do I know? I'm only a child</review_text>
An EXACT copy of Ang Lee's wonderful &quot;Eat Drink Man Woman&quot;.  Frankly what annoyed me here was I watched this one first.. I just finished watching Eat Drink.. it took me about 15 minutes to realize I was watching an exact copy of something I'd already seen a couple years ago. Anyway, I was annoyed because while I could predict events in Eat Drink because I'd seen Tortilla Soup, Eat Drink was clearly the better movie -- so unfortunately it spoiled some of the pleasure of Eat Drink for me. If you haven't seen either, see the better of the two (exact same stories): Eat Drink Man Woman</review_text>
This is absolutely no improvement on the poor VHS video tape.A travesty.I subtract all stars for the terrible transfer, menu, and options.</review_text>
So I bought this movie because some of the reviews said that the acting was terrible but the dancing was amazing.Well, anyone who thinks that the salsa dancing in this movie is amazing, awesome, good, or ok, has never actually SEEN salsa dancing!!I am a salsa dancer, and this movie was HORRIBLE!!!  I have seen amazing dancing, and good dancing.  This was TERRIBLE dancing!  And there was hardly any salsa!It was 80s dancing to salsa music!  That's IT.  The only time there was actually salsa dancing was when the main character was training with the club owner.  Other than that, it was just 80s dancing to salsa music.  That's it.If you want to see salsa dancing, I DEFINITELY DO NOT recommend this movie.If you want to see horrible acting, and old 80s dancing, then I recommend this movie...There was only one thing that I liked about this movie.  The appearances made by Tito Puente and Celia Cruz.  That was great to see, but not worth buying the movie for....Oh, and the story line?  What was it again????Yeah...I love movies, good ones and bad ones.But this one???  The WORST movie I have seen so far...To the best of my knowledge, there aren't actually any movies with really good salsa dancing.Hopefully, someday, there will be</review_text>
The Pick-up Artist is a dangerously bad film. There is absolutely no chemistry between Robert Downey and Molly Ringwald. Molly Ringwald may have been of the most iconic 1980's female actresses, and she certainly proves her worth here. Ringwald looks too much of a virgin to me when her character wasn't supposed to be. That marks the moment when the film had lost its believably element. The real joke in this film has to be Robert Downey. His acting is insanely moronic. I often have to wonder if he wears a lipstick. I am pretty sure Robert Downey can make a great drag queen if he chose to. From the start to the end, I was annoyed. I couldn't see how Dennis Hopper and Danny Aiello got interested in this film and lend their hands in it. Harvey Keitel gives a fair performance, but I believe he is much tougher than that. Comparing Harvey Keitel's performance in Bad Lieutenant, Reservoir Dogs, and Mean Streets to The Pick-up Artist, it is enough to make an apparent observation that Harvey Keitel should have applied his talents to a more different film than this. A smaller film that he did rightfully apply his talent was Rising Sun, and he pulled that one off better than he did in this film. Why did they have to call it The Pick-up Artist? Could they give the movie a better title such as The Player</review_text>
Shameless rip-off of "Jungle Taitei" ("Kimba the White Lion") by Tezuka.  Any anime lover can tell.  (Similarities in characters, scenes, and story lines are unbelievable.)  Disney's response?  "Never heard of Kimba."  Oh, purleese.  I'm kicking myself for paying Disney for this piece of swindle</review_text>
I wouldn't recommend this movie, unless you have nothing else to do for the night and want to watch it alone. Due to a high content of bad words, screaming and violence, it's kind of embarrassing watching it with someone else. Some people really enjoyed it, and that's not me, and that's not the other two people I know who watched it. Some violent parts are a bit hard to believe, but I guess that's what the story is about. This movie is a bit of a hollywood-style suspense, with rather cheesy college scenes that are common to comedies.There's one good idea in this movie and that's how life develops as it goes along, and one action or inaction changes how life plays out. But this is no where near original, even the Simpsons had an episode like that.So, this movie is definitely not on my best movies list.</review_text>
This video did not live up to my expectations.  I have a five-year-old Chihuahua who is somewhat afraid of people and lunges and bites when strangers get too close.The description of the video promised a simple behavior modification program to help deal with his aggression.  Instead, Ian Dunbar simply says that behavior like this in old dogs is very difficult deal with, and focuses on puppy socialization in the video.Well, that's great if I had a puppy, but I adopted an older dog, and I need help now.I don't recommend this video for owners of older dogs with biting problems.  If you have a puppy, it might be somewhat helpful, but there are better books</review_text>
I picked up the book at a yardsale without knowing much about it, and absolutely loved it! It is so smart, funny, and heartbreaking, without ever being sappy. So, naturally, I was curious about the movie too. I figured that because Ephron had written the screenplay too, not much could go wrong. And while the story line followed the book more or less, the movie turned out terrible. I could not have been more disappointed!! First of all, Jack Nicholson is completely miscast, because he essentially plays himself (as usual), not the *interesting* guy that Mark is supposed to be. He is the opposite of charming, funny, tender, lovable, i.e. somebody that the character of the wife (Rachel) would fall so deeply in love with and trust so completely. You suspect all along that he is a cad; therefore, Rachel's utter shock at his betrayal doesn't make sense. Besides, he is too old for the role! Meryl Streep is annoyingly twitchy, but much better in her role as Rachel. Still, she can't carry the movie alone, and her love scenes with Nicholson are flat; there is no spark there. I wonder how happy Ephron was with the movie adaptation of her novel, and whether she really did write all the scenes. The wedding scene, where Rachel has doubts about marying Mark and spends what feels like 5 hours in a room alone agonizing, while the wedding guests wait, is out of place, not to mention boring, not to mention heavy handed. A total dud</review_text>
A slow, loggy movie about a philandering husband (everyone was guessing this was Watergate reporter Carl Bernstein in the Nora Ephron novel on which the movie is based; he was Ephron's husband). Jack Nicholson plays the husband and Meryl Streep the wife, and both are uncharacteristically bland. There is hardly anything to the story: they marry, she gets pregnant, he gets restless and wanders. We finish watching knowing and caring as little about all this as when we started. Very dull</review_text>
This movie is very mildly amusing for about ten minutes.  Yes, it is slightly interesting to see the Cannes environment, but not enough to watch this film. It could be a cure for insomnia, though.  Fans who are looking forward to seeing their favorite actors in a satire will be disappointed.  You can count in seconds the amount of time any famous actor is on the screen, and it's really just very boring. All those fans of Johnny Depp: be particularly warned. He may have co-star billing, but blink and you'll miss him</review_text>
This movie is the story of a gay Cuban writer who eventually makes it to the U.S. to escape the persecution he's suffered in Cuba. And that's about all that can be inferred from this movie. There are large chunks that are spoken in a different language. But there are no English subtitles so you have no idea at all what's going on. This disrupts the already choppy flow of the movie so that it has almost no cohesiveness at all. Whatever the message of this movie is, whatever it's trying to convey, it's lost in the plotless story</review_text>
I will not watch the movie "Andersonville" until they make a movie called "Elmira"(the camp in Elmira, N.Y., the worst of the Union prison camps had 35% death rate)</review_text>
This movie made me sick to my stomach. Here we have a woman like Nora Ephron, a woman with professional job skills and talent and when she marries, she turns into a needy, desperate women whom evidently believes her own self-worth is determined by having babies, one after another. I ususally love all of Meryl's movies, but I could not stand seeing her turn into a needy, always pregnant &quot;homemaker&quot;. If I were a man, I would have run awary screaming, too</review_text>
Talentless people and garbage music  torture you in this turkey-in no time flat,you'll be driven to pure insanity as you run screaming "MAKE IT STOP!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!" out into the yard.Do not spend money on this product unless you want to wind up beating your head against the wall and babbling nonsense</review_text>
Note: If you don't want to know how the movie ends, don't read this. (I'm giving you fair warning now, so don't complain about spoilers later). The only reason I'm mentioning the ending and the "big secret" is because I'd like to spare you from the huge disappointment I experienced when watching this movie.                        When I first walked into the theatre to see this, I couldn't have been more excited; after months of waiting, I'd finally get to see the movie whose preview had given me chills every time I saw it! The movie started out wonderfully: great acting, scenery that could go from gorgeous to terrifying in a matter of seconds, and, at times, almost unbearable suspense (that Shyamalan really knows how to scare!)The story takes place in a small town in the 1800's. At first this town seems like the perfect place to live: the people are friendly, the houses are cozy, and the scenery is beautiful. Despite the peaceful setting, however, we get the feeling that something sinister lies beneath the surface of this sweet little community, something that frightens the villagers and keeps them from  being completely at ease. Every now and then, they glance fearfully at the forest surrounding the village; nobody ever ventures into it, and a guard is stationed every night to watch over it. Pretty soon, we find out why: according to the village elders, there are dangerous, hostile creatures lurking in the woods that will kill anyone who dares enter their domain. These creatures are supposedly unidentified monsters who are so bloodthirsty that the color red is forbidden in the village (it attracts them). For years, the villagers and the monsters have had an understanding: as long as the villagers stay out of the forest, the monsters will not harm them. At one point,however, one of the creatures enters the village at night, leaving the villagers to believe that their uneasy truce may soon come to an end and more of the creatures will attack. While all this is happening, we (the audience) still don't know what the creatures look like and half the suspense comes from wondering what they really are. It was halfway through the movie when all my hopes for the story came crashing to an end: There are NO MONSTERS IN THE WOODS.  When one of the villagers revealed a monster costume and said the shocking words "It's all a farce", I still couldn't believe what I was hearing; it was all I could do to keep myself from screaming right there in the theatre! After months of anticipating this film, of expecting a truly scary thriller, and of trying to guess what the monsters really are, THERE ARE NO MONSTERS! Disappointed doesn't even begin to describe it. It got worse, though. The next big surprise was the reason the villagers created the story of the "monsters". The villagers aren't really living in the 1840's; they're living in a modern-day wildlife reserve. Supposedly, the leaders of the village used to live like normal modern people, but when tragedy struck their families, they decided the real world was too much for them and moved into a wildlife reserve to start a new (if extremely delusional) life. The story of the monsters in the forest was created to terrify their children and keep them from wandering too far and discovering the truth. They even had the village retard dress in a costume and wander around occasionally to scare the other children and make them believe the monsters were real! When the retarded boy died in the woods (still wearing the stupid costume), the leaders, rather than mourning him, remorselessly saw it as another opportunity to lie to their children by telling them he was killed by one of the creatures. I basically went from sympathizing with the characters to being repulsed by them. What parents could lie to their children and deliberately terrify them like that? I don't think I've ever been this disappointed in a movie before; not only was it completely misleading, but the plot was pitiful and the adult characters were pathetic (I'm sorry, but I have no other word for people who are perfectly happy to live a lie and deliberately frighten and traumatize their children to continue living it). Many fans of this movie have said that those of us who didn't like it "don't get it". I assure you, I did get it, and I didn't like it anyway. I'm no fan of slasher films and I didn't expect this to be one, but I also don't appreciate false advertising or almost totally unsympathetic characters. The two stars are for the cast and the filming. Better luck next time, guys</review_text>
In case you're wondering, the aforementioned 'suckers' are anybody who paid to see this movie..and i dont mean just in a theater...i count myself in because it cost me $3.79 at my video store! Looking back, i should have given that money to a homeless person, then went home and stared at a wall while playing suspenseful music! I would have gotten the same effect of watching this pretentious piece of garbage!This GUY SUCKS!! Seriously, his talent level should place him as a writer for the SCI-FI channel...maybe he could write a few decent outer limits or twilight zone episodes??..but he is in over his head when it comes to big-budget movies...and where the F did the budget go? Has the the price of 'monster suits' (signs anyone?) increased to the multimillion dollar range? My guess is he pocketed half of it and the other half went to the unwitting actors who's agents suckered them into this sham of a film. If you read the 'quotes n trivia' on Amazon's link you will find that (a) Kirsten Dunst bailed out on this sinking ship (good thinking girl) and (b) Sigourney Weaver had nightmares after she read the script...obviously she had already committed..SPOILER....Short summary of the INCREDIBLY unfeasible plot: A bunch of people from the city who have had deaths in the family do the logical thing and go live in a wildlife preserve (although we see no animals in it), undetected by authorites , long enough to raise children, whom they traumatize into never leaving the village by dressing in monster suits and other scary tricks. Anyone ever seen a Scooby-Doo episode? Then 1 guy stabs another and they send a BLIND girl (with 2 guys we never saw before who wimp out immediately) to go get medicine through the forbidden forest (how she is supposed to acquire multiple-stab wound effective medicine is up to her)..but the 1st guy she meets gets it for her no problem and helps her back over the wall into the park! And the cult lives on...seriously..thats the plot.I've read that he stole this plot from the book 'running out of time'...not to mention the scooby-doo thing, or his camera style which he takes from hitchcock...this guy is a hack folks</review_text>
This film has some good actors in it but the plot is pretty shaky and hard to follow at times.  It is not comparable to other great Westerns made during the sixties.  Eli Wallach is good but confusing--who and what is he after?   The color is good and it sounds like a Sergo Leone picure but it isn't.  What a shame!!!  It could have been made better--less comedy and more plot and of course --action and suspense!!!!  Buy or rent on your own if you dare----I wouldn't</review_text>
If you've seen one you've seen them all. Uptight guy by chance meets quirky girl, she brings him out of his shell.Well, I bought this for like two dollars, and maybe it was worth it. I watch it like once a year. No special features on DVD worth mentioning.Ben Affleck is getting married, he has to fly down to the south from NY for the wedding. But things keep getting in his way. Forces of Nature. Also, he keeps running into, and can't seem to get away from, some weird chick (Bullock). Are these signs? Should he stop being so uptight, and go with this free-spirited chick? Or should he be an adult and get married and accept his Vanilla lifestyle?The acting in this movie is "meh", meaning Sandra has the same personality that she has in every movie; and Affleck sucks, as usual. The other small parts are well done, for the most part.The script is formulaic, and the cinematography at times is interesting. It's just another rom-com where the whacky girl brings the uptight guy out of his shell. The movie opens with a stripper scene, no nudity. There is also a pot-smoking scene in this movie. There is also a scene where Affleck strips at a gay bar. Just thought I'd throw that in, in case you're considering buying this for your teen daughter or something, and that kind of thing bothers you.You only need to buy this is you are a rom-com fanatic, or a big fan of either Affleck or Bullock. Otherwise this is completely forgettable.</review_text>
Unable to see the movie. Received the original shipment, and later a replacement, and both had the same defects and we were unable to watch the movie</review_text>
I simply spent time watchnig this French response to a Chaplin-style but non-silent motion picture.Maybe, it was a top at the timing of the making.</review_text>
shouldn't a "masterpiece" of comedy be ... i don't know ...   funny</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
After purchasing this I have only been able to watch it once. Audrey Hepburn is my favorite all time actor/actress and she (Joanna in this) is brilliant as always. However, Albert Finney's roll (Mark), charactor and performance is in stark contrast. The further the movie goes the more I disliked Mark and was angry that Joanna was putting up with him. Mark's charactor is over the top and unbeliveable. Five stars Audrey, minus four Albert</review_text>
Nighly stylized movie that uses Sky Captain CPG with an Equilibrium theme.In the future, a blood disease creats a world of normals and hemophobes. I'm good with that part, and Mila Jovinovitch rocks as the comic book hero `Ultraviolet'. What doesn't rock is her ability to create weapons out of thin air. There is no explaination how, and the dumbass drones after her don't have the same ability. Personally, I wonder how a lowly rebel could have more at her disposal than a government funded ARMY of top notch killers!The whole film is shot in CG touches a la Sky Captain and The World Of Tommorrow. This supposed to be about her being a rebel and rescuing a human child with a protein in his blood that can cure the world's `vampire' problem. In reality, it is simply an outlandish style of cinematography.Normally, I would have given this a 1 star. Poor piece of film. Period. BUT, after the Resident Evil series, I felt MJ did a very nice job here. Thus the 2 stars.Do not buy, but wsit until it is on cable, which I did. Even then, I got it on Starz, and used DVR time</review_text>
I remember when this ran on ESPN2 during the week between Christmas & New Year's back in 2000. I'm a huge fan of the microgenre of football movies...but this one stays at the bottom of the barrel.Pettine Sr. seems like a class act & worthy of the respect "local legend" high school football coaches deserve. His son, Pettine Jr, coaches at the rival school but lacks the charisma to make this documentary work.  Maybe the footage of him not seeming like a dolt didn't record right & thus we have no reason to root for him or his program at the finale. Rather than having a bittersweet moment at the ending after the dad plays the head-to-head season finale against the son, Pettine Jr seems kinda clueless giving the old guy a half-hearted handshake.  So much for paternal respect & love.Had the potential to be great w/the setup. But don't let the glowing summary trick you...there's no emotional payoff to speak of for "The Last Game."  Football, after all, has driven grown men to tears on numerous occassions. Your time would be better spent watching Brian's Song, Rudy or the NBC series "Friday Night Lights." Even reruns of MTV's "Two-a-days" about Hoover of Alabama would be superior if you prefer the doc/reality TV style</review_text>
Jet Li as a contrac killer? Come on! The reason why this movie isn't that famous is because it pretty much sucks. It's just a shootem up bang bang type of movie. No realy kung fu here</review_text>
It's about time for someone to make a strong pitch to Hollywood for a new version of "Fahrenehit 451".  Although I appreciate what Truffault was trying to accomplish back in the sixties, the movie just does not hold up well in 2007, particularly when shown in a high school classroom.  Advancements in CGI could transform Bradbury's novel into a very frightening and exciting thriller.  My students spent more time laughing at the adaptation than appreciating it thematically.  That being said, the book gained value exponentially to them because the movie didn't satisfy their understanding.  Lose the wires on the jet packs!</review_text>
Quite disappointing if you are expecting a film true to the book. Hopefully they will remake the movie soon, because the technical capabilities back in 1966 did not do the novel any justice</review_text>
I couldn't get past the very stylized dialogue which seemed to coming from the same source although different actors were speaking.  The characters are cliches through and through and does anyone really speak the way the people do? Mamet appears to have never left Manhattan and has no clue to writing non urban roles or a script with enough nuance to delineate his characters perspective.  To be honest I didn't finish the entire film, but instead checked the TV Guide for reruns of Northern Exposure for the real thing</review_text>
...But it gets one star for the brief moments that Ricky Jay has in the film and another for portions of Alec Baldwin's performance.  Overall this is a stinker.  Mamet is not a good director.  He should stick to writing</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
Overacted. Boring. Horrible movie. The only likable character was Cat.</review_text>
So not at all what i was expecting.I had heard a lot of good things about this movie over the years and when i finally sat down to watch it,i was terribly disappointed and confused.</review_text>
i had never known that there was a movie made about the life story of one of my very favourite singers patsy cline.well they needn't have bothered as it was a very much by the numbers story something definetely not above anything that you would see as a midday movie on any weekday.i liked both of the main actors,jessica lange and ed harris.the problem for me was that there was no attempt at conveying any real depth to the characters.whilst i appreciate that there has to be some element of fiction in most bio-pics anyone watchimg the movie and not having heard of patsy cline would be none the wiser for her motivations and driving forces.the only saving grace for me was that patsys singing was used in the movie to at least try to convey the quality that others saw in her singing</review_text>
I have no idea why I saw this movie in the first place, perhaps it was because The Jungle Book is a fascinating story. However I was realy dissapointed not only is the film boring but it is very silly(in a stupid way).The action scenes were terrible. I recommend this movie to 6 year olds who dont care about the quality of movies.</review_text>
the young actor is great in this movie, but the film itself is non-exciting and a bit boring.**</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
I saw this movie about two weeks ago and I can't believe how disappointed I am for this. I was expecting fireworks; instead I got a truckload of bad karma on my head. Not only that but it maybe the most over-the-top film I ever saw and it will be on my list of the worst movies I ever saw. To begin with half of the characters die in this film and I was like 'What is the meaning?' then there's the film's signature moment in which Sinatra wakes up from his nightmare and they do it in such a matter that they put his face right at the camera. Again I said to myself, 'What's the point?' And then there's the chilling climax which would be totally ripped off a year later by the Kennedy assassination-from the scoped rifle right down to James Gregory's character getting shot in the head. In one of the documentries to this DVD director William Fredkin says that there is no doubt this movie caused Lee Harvey Oswald to kill President Kennedy because 'Oswald realized that he was Raymond Shaw.' If he's right that raises the question: Did he do it by his beliefs or did someone push him over? Then Fredkin ends his obseravation by saying that the release of "The Manchurian Candidate" and the death of President Kennedy are the two events that made the 1960's what it is and why people today (including me) are still obessed with that decade. In conclusion, I think this was a big disappoinment. And this movie is on the list of AFI's 100 greatest films? Please.</review_text>
This movie is watchable, but barely. Its not on the same level of the other chainsaw versions....and see leatherface as a....never mind, youllhave to see for yourselves. We have a yound Renee Zellweger in this one.</review_text>
For any of you teachers out there who plan to watch this in your classroom with your students:  BEWARE!!  First of all, I've heard of taking "liberties" with a book but this is ridiculous! Sex between Farmer Jones and the neighbor farmer's wife is not in the book, but sure is shown in the movie.  I was shocked to see them rolling under the sheet as the headboard was "knocking against the wall". Utterly revolting and embarassing for me and my students.  I expect better from Hallmark Entertainment, Family Home Entertainment, etc...Second, there is a "no rating" statement on the DVD - I'm angry about this and don't appreciate being taken advantage of. There was no warning about adult situations. It's a shame that one can't be truthful in advertising.  Buyer Beware</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
To begin with the movie Tootsie is classified as a genre of romance and comic.This movie is produced in New York. The protagonist is Michael Dorsey and he is the most important character in the film.The situation of this movie is of a man that is a talent actor but for reasons of money he decides to dress like a woman.For the reason that he cannot continue woring in the job he has and that his manager tell him nobody would hire him because he is unemployed  by that time. So there is where Dorothy appears and he starts working as a women is a soap opera in televison where he becames so famous. He gets the job here but he did it without having the intention of hurting anyone and also anyone in the place knew that he was a man dresses like a woman.In addition he falls in love with one of the woman that works with him in the soap opera. Thre is only one friend that knows what he is doing. He has one problem and is that his bestfriend falls in love with him but he didn't treat her well for the reason that he is in love with the other woman.The characters of this movie are really good actors evryone seems to knoe what they are doing.THe way the character acts in the movie is ok and the decision the man takes to wear  women's clothin instead of try to find a job in the way he is seems to me very intelligent. Because he could only accept that he was unemployed but no he decides to do something so that he could work. The stes in the movie are really well done and I like the part where the father of the woman that acts in the ospa opera gives a ring to dorothy without knowing thta she was a man.The lightnoing is was ok in every scene you could see everything ok and well iluminated. The costumes the actors used where a little diffrerent form he ones we use right now but eventhough they were not the same they look ok.Furthermore th emusic they put inspires the movie to look more interesting, there were not that much music but it was ok. This movie could be reall in life because  sometimes when people dont have jobs or they got fire they do everything they can to have a job.I will really recommend this movie to my audience because itis interesting to see how his man do all that work with enthusiam and it really leave us a message of life.</review_text>
I think when many say they knew after 15 minutes who the killer was, they're actually saying they guessed who the killer was and just happened to be right.Think about this for a moment: What was the motive? That was something I never figured out. The killer didn't have a motive. That's what threw me off. But I guess some would say a crazed killer doesn't need a motive. But come on! Even the deranged killer in 7even had a reason for killing. Even Norman Bates had a reason for killing.It could be the reason was explained but I just missed it because the movie was so terrible. I don't know. I really don't want to have to watch the whole movie again to figure it out.I know if you have a lot of high profile actors in secondary roles, one of them is the killer for sure; but you're thrown off by the fact that you have Andy Garcia, D.W. Moffett, and Sam L. Jackson. So all 3 are fair game</review_text>
I rented this, and once downloaded it stated that my client license was up.  Tech support couldnt help me, and instead just refunded my money.  It was nothing but a waste of time</review_text>
this is pure drivel!!!!!clearly there was some kind of argument behind this film;like the director wasnt given enough money to make it,so he thought,you know what,im going to spite the film company by making a hideousely awful film,that'll show them.the &quot;plot&quot;,if i can re-tell it without vomiting,is thus:a plane is struck by lightning,and kills all the pilots..............i kind of lost what was going on after that......the ending,if there actually was one,was that whatever predicament they were in,they got out of.where can i begin?????clearly no one involved with this project has any knowledge of basic physics,as they'd have pointed out that this ISNT POSSIBLE!!!!!!!!!im a little bit rusty on my physics,but isnt it called a faraday coil???if not then forgive me,my minds a little indestinct,but the main point is a bolt of lightning wont pass through a plane. &quot;what about the glass,it passed through the glass window!!!&quot; you bark smugly,well thick glass used for this wouldnt allow electric current to pass through it.think about it people,you ever been hit by lightning indoors??have you ever heard of this happening in real life before??NO,BECAUSE IT CANT!!!!!! well done,you're learning.anyway,enough of the banter,the film struggles from then on in.for some bizzare reason the plane operated by a laptop,the cable(??!!) for which has broken.it only works by some guy holding it with venom.factor into this some wierd pregnant woman type nonsense,some shouting passengers/helpful people arguing rubbish,a hint of romance between a &quot;criminal&quot; and a &quot;female human being&quot;,and you have this godawful tripe of a film.some wonderfully hilarious moments.guy says &quot;i skipped bail&quot;,&quot;are you a criminal?&quot; she asks!!!!!! well of course he is you stupid fool,he just told you!!!! any time there was &quot;turbulence&quot; the camera was wobbled about a bit,and the &quot;actors&quot; moved around unconvincingly.the terrible news report segments,where hilarity prevailed every time.the bit when the dog jumped out the car,that was brilliant!!!!he pushed it over a bit then it was half dead...then later he gave the oxygen mask,great!!!!! all the scenes involving the radar room,they were something else!!!!the ending also,the rubbish CGI aeroplane,what a laugh!!!!i could go on and on and on,pointing out rubbish but funny things about this film,but i think ive said enough.in short,dont come to watch this if you want a coherent engaging film.but if you enjoy laughing through mind-bogglingly bad trash,then this is definately for you!!!! i laughed nearly all the way through it,so at least it was entertaining.1 out of 5</review_text>
The Next Generation is basically a remake of the original Texas Chainsaw Massacre, in fact up to an hour into the film the plot is practically identical, though different characters and locations are used.  The original was a little overrated in my opinion and this "remake" is quite frankly terrible.  Bad acting with the exception of Renee Zellweger and Matthew McConaughy who do their best with a terrible script and several B movie actors.  The only major differences from the original are that Leatherface now dresses as a woman, which was fairly amusing but hardly essential, and a tacked on conspiracy theory.The conspiracy theory of a secret society only surfaces in the last half hour and is absolutely ridiculous, I won't explain it, theres no point, watch it yourself if you want to know how stupidly the film ends.  I would sooner suggest avoiding this film completely though, even die hards admit its awful, I only gave it 2 stars because I reserve 1 star for the very worst of the worst (yes even worse than this!)</review_text>
This movie is far from being anything great. Some of the characters don't make any sense what so ever with the original cast. Leatherface's role has been mocked. People spend too much time focusing on the other people rather than build up Leatherface. The first TCM is a classic. And the second TCM is great as well. But Leatherface: TCM III, The Next Generation, and the TCM remake have all made the Texas Chainsaw Massacre franchise a laughing stock. I really hate new directors coming into the horror scene just to mess it up. The only thing they do these days is make crappy remakes and fill horror movies up with CGI. Enough is enough.</review_text>
I thought from the description that this could be an interesting film and gave it a shot. It was terrible. First because of the camera shake, I don't know about you but I can't sit trough a film with continuous camera shaking. Needless to say I didn't make it through the whole film, but from what I saw the main actor was irritating to watch</review_text>
This is one of the most boring films I ever watched. There is nothing erotic in it. The whole story is perverted with a poor, innocent but very stupid woman submitting to the sadist fantasies of various "lovers" she is introduced. I put inverted comas in lovers because none of them have a single tender erotic moment with her, but instead they brutally beat her and rape her in the presence of others, who seem to be totally oblivious to the proceedings</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
I agree with most of the reviews here that the movie is just so bad. The director had the wrong idea of an art film, methophors and strange incoherrent ending is not the only thing you need to make an art film. I was pretty intrigued by the lead's obssession with the Hunky Swimmer but it just did not end the movie satisfactorily ... Can anyone explain like when did he have the rubber suite, whats with the garbage dump ending, it is just too pointless !!! I felt cheated of 90 mins of my life</review_text>
If you crave a gay-themed film full of brooding obsession, gloomy (and very well done) night photography, the occasional graphic sex scene, and METAPHORS so obvious even a high school film class could catch them, then this just might be your cup of tea. Howewver, if you are looking for a film that sustains its running time and subject, then you are out of luck.To be fair, Portugese director Joo Pedro Rodrigues has made some daring choices here. Dialogue is minimal--this might as well be a silent film with sound effects. He's working one of the great themes--the boundary between dream and reality and the dangers of ignoring that boundary. There is the further theme of sexual oppression triggering further oppressions. And yes, there is more than a little boundage mixed in. (This is no 50s MGM musical.) It looks good--night photography, lots of backlight and black surfaces, either dull or glittering. Sergio (played by Ricardo Meneses, a garbageman in Lisbon, drifts further and further into his obsession with a hunky young swimmer (and Sergio is pretty hunky himself). While not obsessing, he drifts from one random sexual encounter to another. Finally, he goes off the beam completely (I won't go into all the details in case you decide to see it).The problem is the same that so many self-consciously arty films, from Greed to The Unbearable Lightness of Being, share--their metaphors are too obvious (here, among others, it's human and animal behavior--Sergio's best relationship is with his dog and he lapses into canine behavoir periodically) and they are just too long. O Fantasma would make a pretty good 40 minutes festival film--at 90 minutes, it just drags, particularly the ending with Sergio wandering interminably in a landfill in a rubber bondage suit. (Come to think of it, kind ofan echo of the equally tedious final sequence of Greed.) I admit it--I really haven't the patience for films that scream out how ARTFUL they are and have little or nothing except style, attitude, and angst. Style and attitude--think Fred Astaire--can be a winning combination. Unfortunately, in spite of lashings of kink and plenty of existential hysteria, this is not a winning film. Basically, it's a bore</review_text>
This picture is a mess of misused metaphors and confused imagery from start to finish.  I was left scratching my head wondering who these people are and why they behave the way they do. Forgive me for expecting the film to provide any answers.   First the good news - if you like beautiful boys, Ricardo Meneses as the twisted Sergio is one of the most gorgeous creatures to ever stand naked before a lens.   Despite the hopelessly confusing script, his acting (such as it is) is amazing, especially if you take into account his age (18) and experience (his first film). It's too bad he had to be "discovered" by a director who thinks nothing of making his audience beg for each scrap of insight, and pretentiously expects the viewer to read their own interpretation into whatever nonsense he sees fit to set up as his next scene. I wanted to give it the benefit of a doubt, so after sitting through one screening of this erotically charged but confused tangle of a movie, I sat through it again, this time with the directors commentary on. Cheating, I know, but after shelling out all that money for the DVD I was hoping to gain some idea of what the hell was going on. I emerged from watching it the second time half in love with the beautiful young actor Ricardo Meneses, but with only a fraction of the respect I had for the director, Joao Pedro Rodrigues, after my first screening. And that wasn't much.Sergio is a garbage collector for the city of Lisbon. He works a graveyard shift with an assortment of other oddballs, and in between collecting garbage he has a series of sexual escapades that seem impossibly jaded for one so young. While other boys his age are swimming or surfing, he's dressing up in a full-body suit of latex, having anonymous sex in men's rooms (including the most explicit act of fellatio I have ever seen in a non-pornographic movie) and exploring S & M adventures with any willing male he can find. Just so you know how kinky he is, in one scene he masturbates in the shower while strangling himself with the shower-massage cord. You really have to wonder where all this imagination comes from, until you realize that the writer-director has been harboring some pretty extreme sexual fantasies about his friendly neighborhood garbage men. Sergio has a female co-worker who is in love with him, but she's busy having sex with the foreman, and Sergio's only interest in her is to tease her sexually and then play cruel jokes on her.  He finally meets a man who doesn't succumb to his charms, because he's obviously straight. This was not the first or last thing in this film I didn't get; when I was that age, and almost as pretty as Sergio, I understood that some guys just couldn't be had, so I shrugged my shoulders and moved on.  Not our Sergio.  He takes obsession to unheard of heights, especially for an 18 year old.  He stalks the young swimmer, goes through his garbage, and steals his torn old swimsuit. Of course unrequited sexual obsession in films is not exactly new - remember Reflections In A Golden Eye? In that film, made in 1967 and still considered by many critics to be one of the ten worst bombs ever made, the male object of Marlon Brando's desire was almost as pretty as Ricardo Meneses, but that film had the advantage of a script that was at least coherent at times.  In one of the first of many explicit sexual encounters in O Fantasma, Sergio, while walking his dog, comes upon a policeman handcuffed and gagged in the backseat of a patrol car.  He proceeds to masturbate the cop to orgasm, leaving him tied up in the car and then running off to work, where he spends the rest of the night sniffing his hand and licking the residue.  I was hoping that the director's commentary would maybe explain how and why the cop is tied up in his own squad car, but his sole comment on the soundtrack is, "You don't understand in the film why the cop is handcuffed". Excuse me, Mr. Rodrigues, but I didn't understand it in the audience, either.Sergio's only tender scenes are when he takes care of the dog, a mascot of the sanitation workers.  In one scene, Sergio is busy cleaning the dog dishes and doghouse with a hose, when he turns and sees the foreman standing in the door.  He pushes past, their faces register some indications of conflict, and then the foreman shuts the door. The director's commentary on this action is, "The door closes, and you know what will happen, but you don't see it".  Uh, no, I'm afraid the relationship between Sergio and foreman is the least developed of all the underdeveloped relationships in this film, so what will happen next is anybody's guess. Not that I really cared; Sergio is the only character in the script whose personality is even partially explored, and all we ever really learn about him is that he's sexually compulsive and kinky to the max.  The picture goes on endlessly, with Sergio refusing to let go of his obsession for the young surfer / swimmer, until he has the most excruciatingly slow breakdown ever recorded in a movie.  At the same time, what little there is of coherence also breaks down.  The director's commentary infuriated me even more when toward the end, after spending most of the commentary praising the cooperation, beauty, talent and maturity of his young lead actor, he proclaims, "It is cruel to say it, but he wants to continue acting, and I think he will not act again. I will not use him in my next film...it's like his body has been used up". I haven't had the benefit of seeing anything else by Mr. Rodrigues, but if given the choice of viewing Mr. Rodrigues' next film or Ricardo Meneses next appearance I think I'd opt for the beautiful boy any day. After botching the attempted kidnapping of his beloved obsession, Sergio takes off to spend the balance of the film wordlessly running. The final scenes treat us to a guided tour of the sights, sounds (and by way of commentary) smells of a garbage dump. As Sergio wanders through the dump clutching a live rabbit he finds among the garbage ("I saw the rabbits there" says the director on the commentary, "so it's believable") the director, grasping for a final metaphor, remarks "He is like a cross between a bug and an insect" a comment that seems to me to be a cross between the idiotic and the insipid. He then ends this drivel after the slowest twenty minutes of film I've ever sat through by more or less telling us he didn't really know how to end it - like I hadn't figured that out a full ten minutes before the end credits started running. As Sergio continues to stumble on into the dawn before the final fadeout, the director says, "I could bring him back to the city, but that would not make much sense". The idea of a scene that might not make much sense didn't prevent him from filming the other 90 minutes of this drek - I dare say he should have gone for it.</review_text>
As I recall, 1967 was not the most prolific year for movies and Point Blank,in my opinion, would be one of the worst films I have ever watched.  Notwithstanding the very violent nature of the film, the acting by such notables as Lee Marvin, Carroll O'Conner and Angie Dickinson continually appear to search for conviction with their dis-jointed and nonsensical dialogue.Flashbacks, San Quentin, the San Francisco skyline cannot save this film from the trash heap of celluloid history. If your a Lee Marvin fan, better to watch "The man who shot Libery Valance" twice, than waste your time on Point Blank. Your disposition will be better for it</review_text>
Ok so Claud was never a great actor and this was not his best work, Yes the "martial arts" are weak at best, but I still own this movie and watch it just to see Raul Julia go over the top.Why do they still call me a warlord? And mad? All I want to do is to create the perfect genetic soldier. Not for power, not for evil, but for good. Carlos Blanka will be the first of thousands. They will march out of my laboratory and crush every adversary, every creed, every nation! Until the world is in the loving grip of the Pax Bisonica. And peace will reign and all humanity will bow to me in humble gratitude.</review_text>
I ordered this the night of the Oscars. I will assume the mad rush to make as many dubs as possible was the reason for this atrocious copy. There wasn't even a booklet or insert of any kind included in the packaging. It looks like a bad VHS transfer. I should have returned it, but it would've been more trouble than it was worth.I thought the movie was everything it was cracked up to be - but unfortunately, in my case, I have to add: buyer beware.</review_text>
This review is for the Criterion Collection DVD edition of the film.Sweetie, written and directed by award winning filmmaker, Jane Campion best known for the film "The Piano" is the story about a young couple in a distant relationship. One day the womans mentally ill sister Dawn "Sweetie" breaks into their house and lives with them. She is not on her medication and creates havoc. When her father visits after his wife leaves him, he tries to calm her but is unsuccessful.It is never mentioned what kind of illness Dawn has. I thought the film was too graphic and recommend eaisliy offended people not watch it.The DVD has some great special features. There is a theatrical trailer, behind the scenes photos, audio commentary by director Jane Campion and director of photography, Sally Bongers and screenwriter Gerard Lee. There are interviews with lead actresses, Genevieve Lemon and Karen Colston. There is a 1989 conversation between Campion and film critic Peter Thompson made after the success of her short films.Finally, there are 3 of her short films made as a student. The first film, An Exercise in Discipline: Peel, is about a man and his son and sister out for a drive. The son has trown orange peels out the window and his father stops the car and demands he pick them up. The second film, Passionless Moments; is a series of short scenes about various situations. The third film, A Girl's Own Story, is about schoolgirls who do various activities.This film is ok but is not appropriate for children</review_text>
If a "suspense" filmed was played in the woods, and it didn't actually contain any suspense, would a bear watch it?The previous sentence makes about as much suspense as the reason behind making "Domestic Disturbance", the newest `thriller' starring John Travolta, Vince Vaughn and Teri Polo.Let's talk for a few minutes about Mr. Travolta. Can anyone name an actor who has received more chances in his career and squandered them? I think that Travolta has now surpassed Richard Dreyfuss as the comeback/ lose it again king. After a brilliant comeback engineered by his longtime admirer Quentin Tarantino in "Pulp Fiction", Travolta appeared in a number of films that were interesting and proved interesting choices. "Face/Off" and "Broken Arrow" highlighted a string of hits that ultimately allowed Travolta to join the $20 million club. In the last few years, every film Travolta has appeared in has failed miserably. "Lucky Numbers"? "The General's Daughter"? That film was a hit but can anyone even remember one significant scene from it? "Swordfish"? Interesting, but a flop. "Battlefield Earth"? Why does he keep making this trash? It has to be the paychecks. I can't see any other conceivable reason. John, baby, how long before the studios realize that these films aren't making any money and they stop hiring you? John, baby, how long before you need another comeback vehicle?Frank Morrison (John Travolta) is a divorced father who makes wooden boats. He doesn't get a lot of business, but the business that he does get gets a great deal. He doesn't charge his customers enough to make a profit. Frank does this because HE IS THE GOOD GUY. His son, Danny (Matthew O'Leary) has a lot of problems accepting his mom's (Teri Polo) new relationship with Rick Barnes (Vince Vaughn). He gets into a lot of trouble and lies to everyone. A couple of days after his mom and Rick get married, he stows away in Rick's car and witnesses him murdering a business associate. The police don't believe him however. After a little soul searching, Frank believes his son. He may lie to everyone, but he doesn't lie to Frank.Directed by Harold Becker ("Sea of Love"), "Domestic Disturbance" is a suspense film without any suspense. From the moment Danny stows away in Rick's car and WATCHES HIM MURDER Ray (Steve Buscemi), which we also watch, we know who the good guy is and who the bad guy is. To make matters worse, Frank instantly believes his son, which means that the film boils down to a cat and mouse game between Frank and Rick. A boring cat and mouse game. When you know the identity of the villain, a huge percentage of the suspense is flushed down the toilet. When Frank believes Danny early on, the rest of the suspense is flushed down with it.The film would've been greatly improved by showing Danny in the backseat of the car, watching everything, the pain and suspense registering on his face, while the audience sees nothing. Then, when Danny tries to convince his dad, the police chief, his mom, that Rick is a murderer, at least we haven't seen the act, and we would require some convincing as well.Because the filmmakers chose to show us everything, the next logical step to provide some suspense would be to have Frank doubt Danny, his son. However, after a very brief segment, Frank believes Danny, causing us to watch a battle between Frank and Rick, which isn't very interesting.Each of the actors, including Travolta, are serviceable in their roles, but because the film robs us of just about everything in the first fifteen minutes, the remaining ninety become an exercise in tedium.Skip "Domestic Disturbance". It isn't even worthy of a video rental. Go to see the far superior and very different "Amelie" or "The Man Who Wasn't There". Your money will be much better spent.</review_text>
Bernard Hermman's score is magnificent.  This was a major let down for me considering it was directed by Truffaut.  Lacked any real suspense and edge.  Boring camera work for the most part.  Some nice editing touches here and there but overall pretty lackluster.  The acting was fine...I guess.  It was just a pointless story I felt that really didn't go anywhere.  And what was with that crummy ending</review_text>
Man oh man...I love documentaries and character studies.Crumb, Capturing the Friedmans, The Thin Blue Line etc...But THIS...my god, the mind boggles at the level of pretentiousness of the folks who claim to "love" or "get" this horrible mess.Over an hour and a half of two crazy women who are essentially shut-ins rambling on about nothing at all in what looks like an abandoned shack surrounded by vermin and garbage a foot deep.The two women in question are "Big Edie" and "Little Edie", the aunt and cousin of Jackie O respectively.Let me sum up the whole 100 minutes for you;Little Edie: I hate it here. I had to leave New York to come here and take care of my mother.Big Edie: I was fine. I used to have a lovely singing voice.Little Edie: But I missed out on my big chance to make it.Big Edie: Oh well. You missed out.Little Edie: I miss New York. I hate it here.Big Edie: Did you feed the cats?Little Edie; YES!!! I fed them!!!Big Edie: I used to have a lovely singing voice.Now imagine this being repeated over and over again for 100 minutes.Do yourself a favor; Before you let anyone talk you into seeing this piece of dreck just go sit on skid row for 2 hours and listen to the rambling of the hobos and mental patients.You'll save the money and get some fresh air at the same time.Horrible.Just plain horrible</review_text>
Dolph Lundgren (Universal Soldier, Blackjack) plays a man who is hired to take out a primary target and helping him is his old partner, Gina Bellman. Soon things heat up as the two security guards working at the building they are at start to get fiesty and one of them takes drugs and sees spiders and stuff. The 2 are also in a heated romance and get caught in a deadly cat and mouse game of double cross as the agency they are working for want them dead. Another Dolph Lundgren stinker vehicle though Lundgren can't act if his life depended on it. He couldnt pull of He-Man and The Punisher, he can't pull off anything else. Gina Bellman is hot but her acting is horrible as well as the rest of the cast. There's nothing like being hired to kill people and then have sex. Directed by Russell Mulcahy (Highlander). Bottom line is this actioner is a borefest</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
It's always a pleasure to see Fred's legwork, but his relationship with Hepburn is completely implausible due to huge age difference and weak plot</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
I am completely befuddled that anyone with any love for the book could enjoy this movie. It is merely a monument to Hollywood's stunning inability to read or to understand the simplest moral tale. In Dumas's book the Count learns that he cannot play God--dispensing punishments to the evil and rewards to the good--because of the complex ways in which the wheat and the tares are intertwined in this earthly life. He abandons his project of perfectly just revenge and accepts a new love as a gift from a mysteriously merciful God.Hollywood gives us instead: Triumphant Revenge.</review_text>
Save your money or give it to charity. This is one of the worst films for a long time. The characters are one-dimensional, you don't care who they are and when they die, you're indifferent. The direction and the screenplay are lame and the acting comes right out of a telephone directory.I was so bored with this film that I can't even bring myself to write anything else about it</review_text>
I just rented this movie this weekend because so many people had been telling me that it was great.  But I felt kind of let down after watching it.  It starts of well by giving the characters a brief introduction, but we really don't get to know any of them that well, except maybe Kurt Russell, so who really cares who dies?  There's no real build up to the huge wave hitting the ship; everything is fine, then the captain tells everyone to be quiet and listen, Richard Dreyfuss looks outside, and the wave hits; it's not all that intense.Then the rest of the movie is the main characters trying to find a way to get outside the ship.  But it gets kind of repetetive and boring, because they just go from one room to another.  It's like they get into one room, someone says "Here, this is the only way out."  Someone else says that maybe there's another way, but the other person says there isn't, then the water's coming, so they have to get out of that room quickly.  When they make their way into the next room, it's the same thing over and over again.When they finally get off of the ship, they get into a raft and the entire ship goes down right after they get off.  Then a guy shoots a flare, helicopters come, and the movie's over.So basically, this movie gets boring and repetetive and you just keep asking yourself when it will be over.  This is one movie I know I won't be buying</review_text>
All the promos made me think that this would be a really great Sci-Fi story with beautiful babes all over the place.  Well, there WERE some beautiful babes but the anticipated provocative poses by sexy ladies, never materialized.  Has the art of "posing" been lost by modern girls?  Maybe all the good directors have retired or died!  What a pity...Why, I couldn't even muster a stiff upper lip as I played this DVD through to the end.In spite of my being a certifiable "dirty old man". [:-)</review_text>
I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
We all know that Tamilee has that body.  Didn't expect her to be the only body in the video.  I am more for a group atmosphere.  So in that regard, I pass on this video.  Maybe next time Tami...</review_text>
I too wasn't very impressed with Jarhead.  I thought half way through that Jarhead seemed more like an insider movie for those who actually experienced the Marines, and perhaps other branches of the military.  For those of us who haven't I just don't think there was enough direction to keep a lot of us interested.  As someone else mentione.  I too thought it was going to be a more modern version of Full Metal Jacket, but afte the first few minutes it was obvious it wasn't..</review_text>
There are moments in this inconsequential 2005 comedy when I can see a bright future for Jennifer Aniston's light comedic talents, even though this movie does not stretch her much beyond her likeably insecure "Friends" persona. She plays Sarah Huttinger, a likeably insecure New York Times obituary writer going home to Pasadena to attend her younger sister Annie's wedding. Sarah is picture-pretty, 33 and engaged to a nice, unflappable guy named Jeff who accompanies her. At the same time, she's unhappy about her career and wondering why she always feels out-of-sorts with her well-to-do family. A ray of light comes from her only kindred spirit in the family, her feisty, tart-tongued grandmother Katherine, who tells Sarah about her late mother's pre-wedding tryst in Mexico that gives rise to questions about Sarah's paternity.All the domestic shenanigans that ensue would probably be enough to fill this comedy's blessedly brief 96-minute running time, but screenwriter Ted Griffin hangs it all on the idea that Sarah's family may have been the inspiration for the Robinsons in Charles Webb's 1963 novel, "The Graduate", which of course, is the basis of Mike Nichols' classic 1967 movie. The tie-in must have sounded like a creative idea on paper, but something happened on the way to the screen that has taken most of the comic invention out of it. In fact, there is a pervasive lethargy throughout this movie, and director Rob Reiner is unable to overcome it because Sarah's dilemma of choosing between adventure and predictability never feels that emotionally resonant. The dialogue never feels sharp, perceptive or funny enough to pull off the inevitable comparisons with the earlier film. Moreover, the story is set rather arbitrarily in 1997 to make the timelines make sense with the stars' ages.Beyond Aniston, a strong cast has been set adrift. Playing Katherine like an even more embittered variation on Aurora Greenway, Shirley MacLaine crackles with aplomb as the possible inspiration for Mrs. Robinson, even when her lines are not as snappy as she thinks they are. As the aging but still magnetic Benjamin Braddock doppelganger, a high-tech mogul named Beau Burroughs, an overly sedate Kevin Costner barely registers in a smallish role. When he does, there is an insinuating, almost creepy quality in the way Beau's relationship with Sarah evolves. Until the end, Mark Ruffalo has little to do as Jeff but wait patiently for Sarah to resolve her personal dilemma. Richard Jenkins and Mena Suvari have even less time to make an impression in the underwritten roles of Sarah's passive father and bubbly sister, respectively. The 2006 DVD provides the original theatrical trailer (which gives away most of the plot) as its sole extra</review_text>
maybe i'm spoiled by big-budget sci-fi films, but i thought this movie kind of stunk. it felt and looked like a TV movie and wasn't scary, at all. the best/funniest part was how no one could remember the one lady's name or face, and everyone described her the same way--"the one with the glasses." "Oh, her--haven't seen her." LOL</review_text>
M. Night Shyamalan's "The Sixth Sense" is a noteworthy example of how the technique of misdirection can be employed in cinema.  However, the mere use of misdirection does not guarantee that a film will wind up being any good.Psychologist Malcolm Crowe (Bruce Willis) returns home one evening after receiving an award for his work with children.  A former patient awaits him there and shoots him in front of his wife.  Time passes and Crowe tries to put the incident behind him by immersing himself in a new case.  Crowe takes on a new patient named Cole Sear (Haley Joel Osment) who claims that he is able to see dead people around him."The Sixth Sense" created a sensation upon its release as filmgoers relished its twist ending.  Yet, if the truth be told, the ending will not come as a surprise to fantasy and science-fiction fans or to those who are actually paying attention to the events unfolding onscreen rather than sitting back and just going along for the ride.  The entire success of "The Sixth Sense" hinges on whether you are able to figure out the ending ahead of time and unfortunately Shyamalan's use of misdirection just does not mask the final revelation effectively enough.  From the beginning of the film, one knows that something is amiss and the twist becomes more and more obvious as the story continues to unfold.  The acting is first rate with Willis, Osment, Toni Collette, and Olivia Williams turning in great work.  Willis in particular turns in an interesting performance that is a departure from his more action-oriented roles.  However, even with all the quality acting on display, you just cannot shake the feeling that the "The Sixth Sense" is essentially just a drawn-out "Twilight Zone" episode when all is said and done</review_text>
Totally disappointed!!!I love Woody Allen, love his filmsBUT - dvd-s are coded for US market and are not possible to be viewed on our European dvd -stotal waste of moneyyou should have warned me on thatBarbara Kalas, architect from Croatia</review_text>
The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha</review_text>
I'm an animation fan, and when this came up recommended to me I was eager to check it out. While the animation was fine (although a tad creepy), I found the story off-putting. Its basically about a bunch of dysfunctional people on drugs in a depressing future where there are a lot of people doing drugs a.k.a substance "D."  I found  this film depressing and annoying. I particularly found the 'blur suit' to be distracting to watch. It almost gave me a headache.1 star. Did not like</review_text>
This movie is NOT for you if you cannot handle movies just being flat out weird.  Sure, there are plenty of plot holes, Reeves is in it so don't expect an academy award.....however the plot is very interesting (again filled with tons of holes) but I watch a movie to be entertained, not to be a film critic or to analyze everything.Overall, if you like weird movies like "Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas" this movie is for you, if not and you like to be a nerd about movies and analyze every little detail about how "true to life" it may or may not be.....well just skip this one</review_text>
I'm sorry...I really, really tried to get into this movie and just couldn't.  It was just plain boring.  Normally I love these types of movies but not this one.  I just kept waiting and waiting for the 'point' or for something to make the last hour and a half of watching it worthwhile.  Never happened.  I would recommend renting this one first just to make sure</review_text>
i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money</review_text>
If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well. I have been collecting JET Li movies both HK and US Release Version for quite some time now. I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way REST OF THE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO</review_text>
I bought this DVD for my daughter who is from China and though I think Xiao Foo is adorable, I am disappointed by Big Bird's behavior. Not only does he seem frustrated every time the slightest thing does not go his way, but he tells Barkley at one point to "sic" the Monkey King and then later, again frustrated, tells the Monkey King to put his dukes up (as if to fight to resolve the issue). I am appalled by this.  Big Bird is also somewhat demeaning to the Chinese people he encounters--they don't understand him because he is speaking English and rather than explain the language barrier, he just gets upset. I love Sesame Street, and although I will keep this DVD to hear Xiao Foo sing in Chapter 7 (our daughter just loves her), I feel I will need to use Big Bird's behavior as an example of how not to act</review_text>
I was just waiting for this one to come out on DVD. Voila! It's here and I rent it. God, oh God, oh God - this film had so much potential and super actors, but the story was so full of holes, I could've drained my spaghetti in it! Not one single question regarding the plot of the film was answered!!! Not a single one! Since I refuse to watch it again, I now have to go to bed asking myself if I didn't perhaps miss something.Let's go on the record here: Acting - superb (Michael Caine's still got it); filming - superb; suspense - superb; action -superb; plot - as weak as my overcooked spaghetti. Everything was there but the plot. Like having my palate whet, without ever tasting the dish. Frustrating, hmmm</review_text>
Most of the time I love French films. 400 Blows, Breathless, etc. This one caught my eye so I bought it. Waste of $$. Horrible. I never did really get the plot becuase there was not much of one. It was just like a homemade movie with really bad sound. I looked around the room and the other two people watching it with me had fallen asleep.</review_text>
Pleasant movie but nothing special, a very ordinary story. Audrey Hepburn's charisma is what puts some life to the movie. Some subtle humour though</review_text>
As curious as I was about this movie it had me dazed. The 'Good Shepherd' always struck me symbol for Christianity. Shepherds look after their flocks so the sheep can be killed and eaten. What's good about that? Fortunately, sheep don't have the intelligence to be paranoid. With Bourne Identity movies under his belt, Matt Damon has a good pedigree to play spy movies. Is this one a killer or dead on arrival? With a budget of $85m, we've got Oscar-winning actors, writers, cinematographers, and more stars than flocks by night ever get to see. Pet project of actor-turning-director, Robert De Niro, "The Good Shepherd" tells a story of the CIA from its early days, weighing in at just under three hours. The scene before the opening credits is the one which the whole movie revolves around once that's miss you won't get it. This is a shame, because it's a tantalisingly mysterious and artistically shot.This movie is told from Damon's point of view, its scope is epic, and covering the years from 1939 before the CIA was even a speck in President Truman's eye, to 1961 and the Bay of Pigs. We see the founding years, the London Blitz, post-war reconstruction in Berlin, and increasingly intricate machinations as the Cold War gathers pace. Angelina Jolie doesn't feature in much of the movie, but when she does, she' get into character very well. It's enough to make you wish she would put down her excellent humanitarian work long enough to take on more of the challenging parts for which is so eminently capable.Robert de Niro (got to love him), in the director's chair, is sadly the weakest link. Although he handles it professionally, almost magisterially, he lacks the experience to slowly build momentum, convey gradual moral decay, or make this the Godfather standard-bearer of CIA films. He's done a fine job - just bitten off a bit more than he can chew. What he deserves credit for is attempting a classic depiction of one of the world's most important institutions and pulling it off with considerable dignity; if not quite the artistic flourish that he would have aspired to, given that his mentors are people like Francis Ford Coppola (who is the executive producer). With sufficient dedication, it is easy to imagine De Niro pulling off an Oscar for direction in a future film: his grasp is very broad, and all it needs is a little tweaking.</review_text>
this movie was awfull.  supertroopers was awsome and beerfest was even better, so i suppose they can be forgiven for this cinematic abortion</review_text>
I am bewildered at the praise and adoration that is heaped on this terrible movie.  To give an adequate measure of just how bad this movie is, it is only fair to review/describe it on several different levels.First, as Mike Judge films go, this is the bottom of the barrel.  Office Space was hilarious in its simplicity, where the subtle sarcasm and deadpan rips on pop culture were well-timed, sufficiently developed, and acted out with talent.  In Idiocracy, the jabs at society and our 'dumbed-down culture' (regardless of how appropriate and accurate) are a dime a dozen, with the vast majority of them falling way short of genuinely entertaining humor.  I actually appreciate and am amused by the subject matter and the setting, but beyond that, this movie leave a LOT to be desired.Secondly, as comedies go in general, this movie stinks.  I realize that Judge wanted to, on some level, create a commentary on the self-destructive path that our culture is on, and I'll even admit that the first 15 minutes were very promising.  Wilson's character is funny in the same way as Livingston's character in Office Space...he is a subtle simpleton who relishes in his blissful ignorance and laziness.  However, beginning with the introduction of Rudolph's character, the movie begins its downhill plunge.  She is not only NOT funny, she is downright annoying on screen.  She over-acts in most of her scenes, leading most viewers in suspense as to when she'll go away.  Her character, amongst countless others (including Dax Shepard at his quasi-retarded worst and Terry Crews in a role that would make even the most avid Randy Savage fan cringe with his over-the-top-yet-still-not-believable machismo), is one of the weakest supporting characters I have ever seen.  I found myself silently condemning the casting director throughout this movie...not to mention counting down until it was over.  I think that this is where Judge's latest offering falls [way] short:  in Office Space, Livingston is surrounded by an amalgam of genuine (albeit nerdy) characters who not only are tolerable, but in most scenes are actually as integral to the humor as the protagonist.Wilson is talented, but even his drawling wit and everyman charm wear thin in this stinker.  In addition, his agent should be shot for signing him onto this one without a better supporting cast.VERDICT: Don't waste your time.  Re-watch Office Space if you're looking for some Judge humor that actually elicits laughs</review_text>
What a waste of time, money, and talent. If its Murder you want well this one has plenty of blood and guts to fill the bill. Sorry I wasted my time viewing such trash</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
This movie,   the story of a shocking long-ago murder entwined with the story of a modern woman who is investigating it,  is only worth watching to see the scenes leading up to the past crime.   The modern day portion of the movie is very tedious.    Elizabeth Hurley's and Sean Penn's characters are laughable caricatures.    Anita Shreve's writings never disappoint,   read the book instead.</review_text>
I didn't even open this copy of Gothic.  As soon as I realized it wasn't letterboxed I immediately returned it.  I've seen the movie before - I love Ken Russell, but I wont' watch it if isn't in letterbox</review_text>
This was a critically lauded film, so when I went in, I had high expectations.  Roger Ebert himself called it a masterpiece.  I saw it, and it was certainly interesting, but I immediately forgot about it right after I left the theater.  There really isn't much depth here.  It's more reminiscent of getting a quick rush from something, then after it wears off, you don't even remember how you felt afterwards.  I remember a scene where a cow is blown up, but other than that, it's hard for me to remember anything about it.  It ultimately was very ordinary, and not a really deep film about war.</review_text>
Very bizzare movie! Not for kids or anyone who is prudish!Can be an erotic movie if you choose to see through the bizzare nature of it</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
VE2 has a ton of potential, but it just doesn't work out.  Brandy Davis is both cute and sexy, of course, but Playboy's Testing the Limits is a much better showcase for her, um, talents.  Not to be mean, but most of the film's other women just aren't that attractive, and many of the sex scenes are actually irritating because of the obnoxious soundtrack.  Contrary to a previous reviewer, the massage scene is fairly ordinary.  The girl-girl stripper scene is the most disappointing, however.  It starts really well, with the straight girl gradually overcoming her shyness and enjoying the stripper, but even the unrated version then fades to black without any real action.  The only scene worth watching at all is blue-collar vignette, with two girls and one guy hooking up. Stay away from this one</review_text>
Jeunet shot himself in the foot with this nonsense. I admire his attempt to create something cutting edge though. Personally I didn't see the whole film, I walked out before the ending. Audrey Tautou is probably one of France's least talented actresses. Yes, I know we all loved her in Jeunet's single sucessful film Amelie which is probably the only film of hers that most American's have seen but please, the girl can barely act, has no presence and no joie de vivre. Since Amelie had it's success Tautou has appeared in no less than a dozen terrible movies, the foreign shelf at Blockbuster is lined with them.I can hear the howls of dissent from the readers of this review right now,  angrily clicking their disapproval of my review but I've studied film at NYU and have seen virtually every French film good or bad since before the Nouvelle Vague. Trust me on this one, this is a crummy film. a worthy effort at being cutting edge by Jeunet perhaps, but still a crummy film</review_text>
A poorly-conceived, poorly put together mess.  Don't bother</review_text>
Jeremy Brett was by this time indeed &quot;the dying detective,&quot; but  his real-life condition in no way helps this tedious and undramatic  rendition of one of Conan Doyle's more tasteless Holmes stories. The  original features some of Holmes' worst and most insensitive treatment of  poor Watson, but since this series made such a thing of their friendship,  the adapters have a heck of a time getting around it. Stick with the Brett  episodes from the mid-80s, when he was fresh in the role and the  adaptations were true and intelligent</review_text>
This movie started off about as refreshing as you could get. Sure, there were "Lifetime channel" moments and such but for a horror movie at least it didnt just dump a bunch of hapless teenagers in the woods for them to be hacked one by one.The atmosphere was eerie and convincing.  The cave shots were well done, the tension was building ever so slowly and it was somewhat un-nerving when you just knew that something bad was brewing.  So, the first part of the movie was thumbs up all the way.  Unfortunately, like sooooooo many other horror films it resorts to silly blood spatters and totally unbelievable situations and it gets old rather quickly.  The creative tension that got me hooked was quickly replaced by absurdity. Too much ketchup, too many frantic scenes of the "monster guys" jumping around, and of course...the completely silly "tough" chick that Kung-Fu'ed her way through most of the monsters like they were invalids. That alone killed it.... the main characters were disposing the bad guys too easily and some of the ways they killed them was laughable.  I was angry at this movie not so much because I wasted my time but because it had a lot of potential and seemed to run out of ideas so they went the "Gorefest" route and completely chickened out of making what could have been a classic if it was done right.Remember how perfectly the original Alien movie slowly but surely built wicked tension and it never released you from that tension?  Remember how uncomfortable that movie made you feel for almost the whole running time?  This film started that way.... it was very creepy and made me feel uneasy. Just like Alien.  However, Alien never let up and did NOT turn into a pointless gore-fest like this movie did.  Too bad, it really is.Not Recommended... but rent it, dont buy it if you have to see i</review_text>
I watched this movie last evening and I have to say that I have never seen weird, confusing movie since 12 Monkies.  I'm still confused.The plot is pathetic and mindlessly confusing, it's all about lucid dreams and Tom Cruise seeing how many times he can flick his hair in a minute while the cameras on him.  The film is basically all a blur from start to finish, it's a dreadful mix of sci-fi nonsense and obvious fake romance.  Why on earth would someone want to remake a foreign film with this kind of plot anyway.  Don't buy this film on DVD or you'll be wasting your money.  I'm sorry if you've found this review uninformative, but since Vanilla Sky is really about nothing whatsoever it's very hard to go into much detail.</review_text>
I watched Anger Management on the plane. Since there is nothing else to watch, and the flight is more than ten hours, you usually watch whatever is on T.V. I thought that this movie as a whole was pretty bad, though there are some funny parts. There is some offensive language. Overall, it's a bad movie and is not worth watching.</review_text>
Peter Segal's "Anger Management" is a film with nothing going for it.  It is best described as boring, annoying, and devoid of laughs.Mild-mannered Dave Buznik (Adam Sandler) is sent to anger management counseling after an unfortunate misunderstanding.  He immediately develops a problematic relationship with Buddy Rydell (Jack Nicholson), the self-help expert leading the sessions.  As the two men spend more and more time together, Buznik starts to wonder if his counselor is the one who should be undergoing counseling."Anger Management" just does not get as much mileage out of its premise as it would like.  It is essentially a one-joke film that wears out its welcome very quickly.  Sandler and Nicholson are saddled with a script that fails to produce even a snicker.  Furthermore, the parade of cameos throughout the film add nothing to the story and just feel like a lame attempt to squeeze in as many recognizable faces as possible into the proceedings.  Truth be told, "Anger Management" is one of those projects that was green-lighted because of the talent involved and not because of its quality.</review_text>
The Unbox video version of this film for Tivo is useless. Only after purchasing it did I discover that this film can only be downloaded to a Tivo a certain number of times in a certain time period. For more than the cost of the DVD, I'm restricted in when, where and how I can watch this movie. Nothing like being treated like a criminal by the movie studios.I will not purchase another Tivo Unbox film.</review_text>
The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha</review_text>
i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money</review_text>
More predictable than an old TV Land episode of Bonanza and much less entertaining, this story of an anti-government rancher and his three sons, one the upstanding sort who seeks to work for good within the system, one an idealist, and the middle son, Tristan, played by Brad Pitt, a tormented man who seeks to find peace within nature's anger. At least that's what I think he was doing. The fact is I never was a fan of this movie, not back in the 1990's when my best friend loved it (and predicted Julia Ormond would be a superstar--sorry, Gina, if you ever read this, I just couldn't resist working that in there, ha-ha) and not upon the occasion of a recent second viewing. I don't think there's anything to really recommend this movie to anyone. It's not spectacular in its setting, it's not revolutionary in its by-the-numbers story, and I found then and still find now that it is highly melodramatic and boring. To each his own, I know some love this movie, but from where I sit, this film is a would-be epic that never rises above fluff</review_text>
I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..</review_text>
The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha</review_text>
As a big fan of Ralph, I was looking forward to The End of the Affair.  Maybe my expectations were too high, but this movie is dreadful.  Ralph is a brilliant actor, but not even his flawless acting can't compensate for the nonsensical plot and the horrific casting of Julianne Moore.  What happened to Moore?  It is NOT hard to learn a British accent.  From the sounds of it, Moore didn't even try.  She sounds so American she fails to convince anyone she has an ounce of English in her.  And if that weren't bad enough, the plot is as unconvincing as Moore's accent.  She's an adulteress, but miraculously heals a young boy's facial disfigurement and brings Ralph back from the dead. Even the priest admires her--adultery and all! Her husband does not know the meaning of jealously and lets Ralph live in the house even though he knows of the affair.  Still amidst the unbelievable, the plot is so predicatable.  She coughs a few times here and there.  So we know (before anyone in the movie figures it out) that she's dying.  We also know why she &quot;ends&quot; the affair long before its &quot;revealed&quot; to Ralph. And by the way, what was with all the nudity?  Totally unnecessary and vulgar</review_text>
This is certainly the WORST movie that Elvis had anything to do with, unless you count the final televised which can be just as disturbing and difficult to watch at this "ATOMIC" bomb. I enjoyed SEEING the sweet little Anissa Jones, John Carradine, Dabney Coleman, and Vincent Price, but beyond that this movie is absolutely unbearable. Please avoid even VIEWING it. Bottom of the trash can, literally</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
THE FIRST HALFIf they had made movies back then, in 1871, it would move as slowly as this.Perhaps that date suits the film to perfection.The days of utter simplicity, with nearly nothing happening.Where maybe days are filled with yourself.Not distractions.After half an hour, all I could think was, if this was on TV, not only would everybody switch off, the sh** (show) would be axed.It may even beat so many foregin movies as THE SLOWEST MOVIE OF ALL TIME.But slow really means empty.THE OTHER HALF (OF ME)Yet I have since come to learn, by others' reviews, this is a movie which YOU must make, by the mood, or the feeling of dread others speak of. Or else you are left with the feeling of dead.I failed to do that, and without that, the film fails miserably I reckon. Perhaps because I am dead.So, therefore, I envy those creative creatures of subtle senses. Or whether it was because they were so simple, or easily pleased, which means more modest, more modern.So, as in real life, it's only the FEELING which makes anything real.MY FIRST (OR WORST?) HALFThe other part of me thought that, the film being a feature length, they think they can just not try for half an hour, an hour. Such is the problem with many filmakers, even today. When, being a torture, err feature, they should try much harder!!Therefore the atmosphere spoken of in these reviews can only be like saying there is smoke without fire. Virtually nothing happens, and what does makes little sense, as any unconcious creation.MY BETTER HALF OF THE SCHIZOPHRENICBut the acting of the lead lady is expressive and genuine, and not being stereotype; is pleasingly real. Weird as suits the role. As are the others natural, with no Hollywood posing. How often have I heard that story - good acting, bad film? Oh I'm sorry, I did it again.The only thing exciting is the title.THE WHOLEMy conclusion is: I DON'T KNOW WHICH IS MY BETTER HALF, AND WHICH IS MY WORST HALF . . . ?So, all things being unequal, I choose both. I stand and fall by both my views. (I guess that's why God gave us 2 eyes.)I was going to give it only one star* at first, but now I give it merely two**, knowing I'm still mean.I see this movie as perhaps the greatest measure of one's temperament.If you feel better than me, are supernaturally sensitive, or have the patience of a saint to me, add one, two, or three more stars respectively.I intend to watch it again, and then maybe I can give a before and after shot.Please feel free to reject me, write negative comments about me, or scare me. Or kill me.[The world's First Amazoning Interactive Review] That makes it fair</review_text>
It gets two stars for the unintentional comedy. Other than that, it's one of the worst of the ultra-cheesy, predictable, low-budget horror movies from the early nineties. The FX are funny at first, but then they just go on and on and on and the sucking takes over from the comedy. The acting is uniformly terrible, and one has to image that the typically enjoyable Barrymore is just glad to have this ridiculous part of her career well behind her</review_text>
THIS MOVIE IS GOD AWFUL. I MEAN POOR RENE ZELLWEGGER. BEING CAST IN THIS MOVIE. WHAT DID SHE TURN DOWN IF THIS IS WHAT SHE PICKED. DON'T GET THIS MOVIE SEE IT ON TV. DON'T EVEN RENT IT. DON'T GET IT PLEASE. I'M SAVING YOU 12 BUCKS</review_text>
I know, Goldy got another movie later,but here we see why he ISN'T THE next'Rock'. Supoorting cast is pretty badand belgian kickboxing Champ Van Damjust isn't Schwarzenegger (that saysa lot!) and movie night filming doesn'thelp! Props and fake US army set uplooks like something out of a Returnof the Living Dead set! Not really any-thing to right home about unless you'reinto Bill Goldberg, "Next stop, intensivecare...", just like Van Dam and B.G.'scareers after this movie. Can you beleiveVan Dam did (another) sequel?!</review_text>
There are bad movies, and then there are BAD movies. "Universal Soldier: The Return" is a cosmically bad movie, a movie so poor in every aspect of its execution that one would have to look to "Manos: The Hands of Fate" for comparison. The first "Universal Soldier" film was a moderately entertaining shoot 'em up flick starring action stars Jean-Claude Van Damme and "Rocky" refugee Dolph Lundgren that essentially accomplished what it set out to do: people perished in violent ways, stuff exploded, and Van Damme and Lundgren beat each other into bloody pulps at the end of the film. Even the presence of the charming Ally Walker as Van Damme's female sidekick greatly helped the film. The movie garnered enough attention and fans to merit the release of a special edition DVD some time back. It unfortunately also garnered enough attention and fans to merit this unredeemable piece of trash sequel. The second, and one hopes final, installment in a franchise that should never have become a franchise achieves such heights of utter banality and stupidity that I sat in open-mouthed awe watching it. I think I can safely say I am less of a person for having sat through this atrocity. Expect to spend a few days in a coma after the credits roll.Van Damme returns as Luc, the reanimated soldier who triumphed over the forces of government sponsored evil in the first film. On this outing he now works for Dr. Dylan Cotner (Xander Berkeley), a scientist who reconstituted the universal soldier program with the help of his supercomputer S.E.T.H. Luc, with his female sidekick Maggie (Kiana Tom), helps design and run training missions for a new batch of super soldiers. The film opens with what the filmmakers hope is a pulse-pounding jaunt up a river, a jaunt filled with explosions, stunts, gunfire, and the briefest glimpse of Tom's incredibly fit form. As the mission grinds to a halt we learn several important things: Kiana Tom is incredibly hot but can't act her way out of a paper bag, Luc has a daughter named Hillary (Karis Paige Bryant) who you just know will get into trouble at some point, and the only soldiers we must pay attention to are Romeo (Bill Goldberg) and the one played by Michael Jai White. Frankly, turning off the film immediately after glimpsing Tom's amazing physique is probably a good thing. Everything that follows is dull, predictable, and so full of plot holes as to defy description. "Universal Soldier: The Return" feels like eighty minutes of dental surgery rather than an action film.Sure enough, Cotner's computer goes on the fritz and unleashes the killing power of the universal soldiers. In the resulting conflagration S.E.T.H. implants its consciousness in Michael Jai White, Luc and his loved ones flee from the compound, and the military swoops in to contain the problem. An extraordinarily untalented actress named Heidi Schanz also pops in as nosy reporter called Erin who is interested in exposing the government's latest shenanigans. Predictably, Van Damme and Schanz team up to track down...er...well, track down something to defeat the supercomputer. I think they need some code to shut the system down, but in the meantime the film takes them all over the place so that a wisecracking Romeo can follow them around while absorbing all the abuse Luc can hand out. Even throwing in a few scenes set in an adult's only club can't make this turkey fly. It's dull, folks, and painfully so. By the time the film grinds to its inevitable showdown between Luc and S.E.T.H. back at the shattered compound--with an injured Hillary's life balancing precariously in the background to serve as motivation for an overwhelmed Luc (Geez, what a surprise there!)--I knew I just wasted far too much of my life with this car wreck. How bad can it be, you ask? Read on...Plot holes in this film are innumerable, as uncountable as grains of sand on the beach or acne on a teenager's face. For example, Luc explains to Erin that he was once a universal soldier just like Romeo but Cotner "cured" him by restoring him to life; he no longer needs injections or ice or any of the other devices used by the soldiers. What the heck are we doing marveling at this amazing supercomputer when Cotner just performed a miracle of biblical implications? He brought someone back from the dead! How exactly did he accomplish this feat? We don't find out from Van Damme, who simply smirks his way through a few lines of dialogue that simply boggle the mind with their monumentally idiotic implications. I could go on, but let's discuss the performances instead--or the lack thereof. I should say I adore Kiana Tom; she's a drop dead gorgeous babe with a body that could stop the earth's rotation, but watching her stumble through dialogue is like having your appendix taken out through your mouth. Another problem is the lumbering Bill Goldberg, whose "funny" lines are anything but. And the more I think about Heidi Schanz, the less I think of her. You have to wonder about a film where Jean-Claude Van Damme is the best thespian in the cast.You might think a movie this foolhardy shouldn't contain any bonus features on DVD. You would be wrong. Trailers for this film, "The Return," "Double Team," "Desert Heat," "Knock Off," "Maximum Risk," and "Nowhere to Run" showcase the dubious career of Jean-Claude Van Damme. A making of feature, a Van Damme career retrospective (Ha!), a Michael Jai White feature, and talent bios round out the disc. My advice to those viewers thinking of renting "Universal Soldier: The Return"? Run, my friends, run far, far away and don't look back.</review_text>
This sure sounded like a hot movie when i read the overview. A young woman curious about sex and trying to get herself off. Boy,i sure was surprised at what this really is. A super softcore B-movie with terrible acting and almost no sex!!! You want nudity? Sorry. But this movie does have worms,thats right, worms! In one of the "Sex scenes" a guy puts live worms into the womans private area. Yeah,it's that bad. Stay far away from this one</review_text>
I bought this movie because of Charlotte Alexandra. I had seen her in a really good movie with Charlotte Rampling called "The Pool." She was beautiful to watch and played well against one of my favorite actresses, Charlotte Rampling."A Real Young Girl" on DVD was of low quality and didn't make sense to me. I can not recommend it. Some scenes were just gross. It was not even a little sexy. It was sophomoric.I did follow Amazon's suggestion and also bought two other movies; "Romance" & "Frivolous Lola." "Romance" was good but a little dis-jointed and needlessly explicit in some parts and not explicit enough in other parts. The other characters were flat and empty."Frivolous Lola" was hilarious, explicit, sexy, and fun even if it was a little dated. I will see this movie again with friends just to laugh</review_text>
I didn't think I'd miss the Christopher Reeve superman movies (one and two at least) and I really miss George Reeves now!!!!  Those black and white Superman shows were the best!what's her name was a HORRIBLE Lois Lane!!!!  The whole thing sucked - that was the second of two bad movies in a row!  I don't even care about the deleted scenes!  I want to sell it to someone else or at the very least - I'm going to give this one away!Brandon is cute enough but that uniform was soooooo dull!!I remember now that my brother told me I could wait for cable.  I got greedy - someone bought him a DVD that was coded for another country (there was russian writing on it) and it wouldn't work in my DVD player so I got Amazon happy and ordered it from a vendor in Brooklyn.I SHOULDA WAITED FOR CABLE</review_text>
Before I get started with my review i must say one thing. Im not just a mindless hater, trying to bash a fanatical fanbase of the legendary superman franchise. I liked the original movies, with the real superman christopher reeves and the real lex luthor gene hackman. with that being said here is why i really didn't like this movie.i felt it was too long and drawn out. Too much time was spent on Lousi lane crying and complaining about superman not saying goodbye before he left. she whined to her reporter friend, she whined to her husband, she whined to clark kent, she whined to her boss, and finally she whined to superman in another overly long melopdramitic flying scene. essentially making this movie a quasi chick flick/comic flick. and although the soundtrack was stunning at times, too much time was past just showing different scenery and background environments while letting the music play. yes atmoshere is great in movies but enough is enough.  basically im saying this movie was 90% melodrama and atmoshperic mumbo and 10% action.and although the action scenes where pretty cool, it is nothing we haven't seen before in a superman flick, or any other super hero flick.acting wise, i think the guy playing superman did a pretty good job, nothing compaired to reeves, but im not going to complain about that too much, he was servicable. and noone can complain about kevin spacey, he is just awesome, although i dont think he had the charisma that hackman has as lex. did not like louis lane. too whiney.story wise, this movie didnt really make much sense. it was way too out there. i mean yeah its a fantasy story and you have to use your imagination but i mean come on. lex luthor is going to basically destroy over half of the worlds population by creating the new continent and people are just going to go "yeah lets move there" and lex is going to make lots of money. not likely. i mean it would take years among years to make that crytallic and dark damp place to be somewhat livable. i dont think that lex would really be the type to want to put years of planning and prep to make this work. i mean most criminals want their power NOW, instant gratification. maybe im being overly harsh on a fantasy storyline, i just think they could have thought of something better, and more feasable.this movie was alright, it would have been helped a lot if they trimed about 30 minutes of melodrama away. and no i am not saying more action and less character development in movies, cause character developement is one of the most important aspects in the success of a truly great movie. however whiny crying does not constitute as strong character development in my book</review_text>
I think there was packaging or a sticker that compared this film to Pulp Fiction.  As if.  Beyond minor superficial similarities - I dont see it.Le Samurai is one of the most boring films Ive watched recently without turning it off.  In retrospect I wish I had turned it off or never wasted my time since the ending is so dull.Imagine if breathless had a slightly more complicated plot, but the main character had no charisma.  Or if Alphaville (the film not the treatment) was more 100 times more boring.  Le Samurai makes Tokyo Drifter seem like a thrill ride.  I was not impressed by this film on any level.If you are into being bored.  Or if your so freaking smart you can watch paint drying and fill it with significance, this is the film for you</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
The basic premise of this movie could be quite interesting - how does a man trained as a 'killing-machine' integrate back into society.  Yes, it's been done before but still holds promise.  The plot was adequate.The acting was believable - no complaints there.  I particularly enjoyed Sean Pertwee as 'Mace'.  And Jason Isaacs has long been a favorite actor.But what ruined the movie for me was the science.  I'm not a fanatic - I have no problems with FTL travel or spaceships 'banking' on turns or loud explosions in space in movies.  And I realize that movies are not 'real'.  But I've never seen more 'bad' science in any one movie.  My son and I watched this together and it turned into a contest seeing who could catch more bloopers.I could go on and on detailing the scientific and logic errors in this movie - but it would take me all night.  It spoiled the whole movie for me</review_text>
Watching the Razor release (which I bought to save a few dollars) elevated my blood pressure due to the careless way this rare gem of a movie was treated. Let alone that the terrible translation made me miss the meaning all too many times.Fortunately I was able to find the much-praised version released by ERA of Taiwan from a seller here on Amazon, and it sure did justice both to the film and to the dialog-sheer perfection.</review_text>
It gets two stars for the unintentional comedy. Other than that, it's one of the worst of the ultra-cheesy, predictable, low-budget horror movies from the early nineties. The FX are funny at first, but then they just go on and on and on and the sucking takes over from the comedy. The acting is uniformly terrible, and one has to image that the typically enjoyable Barrymore is just glad to have this ridiculous part of her career well behind her</review_text>
pretty raw outlook in the life of BasquiatI'm an avid fan so i have no regrets having this</review_text>
there is no actualy snowboarding or skiing, its a boring chick flick with a ranting sissy main characte</review_text>
Pleasant movie but nothing special, a very ordinary story. Audrey Hepburn's charisma is what puts some life to the movie. Some subtle humour though</review_text>
The Unbearable Lightness of Being was considered an unfilmable novel for a good reason: the point of Kundera's writing is not his plot - or even his characters - but his style.  For instances, his endless digressions about history, politics, and philosophy.  For the movie, we are left with nothing but plot and character.  OK, what is one to do?  That in itself wouldn't be so bad if I didn't watch the film with the constant thought: I could read the book in less time than it takes me to watch this movie.  This is a SLOW film.  It takes an hour-and-a-half story and takes three hours to tell it.  I can't recommend the film</review_text>
I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..</review_text>
The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
The ones that are posted twice do not work. If they are posted once, you can try to download it, but it might not work. The video only worked for about a minute. Shame, since I really like this show and I wanted Amazon Unbox to be cool. The one cent CSI works, go download tha</review_text>
maybe it's because he is such a stright shooter(pun ment) or something but clint doesn't do cold war thrillers very well(remember firefox). while well directed and acted this spy thriller is dead most of the way through and while the climbing scenes are good they don't cover up the fact that it was a good book that doesn't watch as good as it read.some may like it but i found it to be a let down</review_text>
Like so many Hollywood movies -- especially anything made after the late 60s, when America's teen-agers and collegiate students started taking their typically youthful antiestablishmentarianism with them into the future -- this is another passionate rage against the allegedly oppressive machine.  See The Shawshank Redemption, see Dead Poet's Society, see With Honors -- filmdom's lock-step march against authority is a mainstay of the past three or four decades.  Naturally, this movie is revered as something of a paragon if not a modern pioneer of the trend.  In regular Hollywood fashion, Nurse Ratched (the chief antagonist) and the cuckoos' restrictive environment are portrayed with just enough ambiguity to deflect charges that the movie is a paranoid feast for leftist sensibilities -- which it is, of course.  Unlike most fare of this sort, it is at least very competently crafted (the director and the actors sympathize with the source material enough to give it their all), which no doubt explains how it won one or two more of those little golden trophies than it would have gotten otherwise.  -- M. Cooper</review_text>
I was livid when I saw this movie after reading the book. It is barely on course with the book. They could have done a much better job with that story. What a waste of good actors like Denzel and Salli Richardson.</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
Dear Film Company Jackasses,Surely you know we already hate you for your greed - Why do you add insult to injury by taking fine films like "The Great Santini" and cutting them to Full Screen?Yet another fine film marred, no doubt, by some big company's desire to cut corners. Burn, Hollywood, burn</review_text>
Set against the backdrop of the Spanish Civil War, &quot;Talk of Angels&quot; could have been provocative and sweeping, but it settles for little more than standard-issue Governess Falls for The Rich Guy romance. Vincent Perez has a smoldering presence, but the beautiful Polly Walker is as flat on screen as a Fascist protest poster. The two have little chemistry. The result: a stilted and perfunctory outing. The only saving grace is the always wonderful Frances McDormand, whose hard-bitten, love-struck fellow governess offers a sad little bit of zest</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
I wasn't expecting Disney, but I was less than thrilled by this feature.  I'm assuming there's a genera of animation produced in the mid 70's that took the whole 'stoner' heavy metal thing and ran with it.  Many many long drawn out scenes with rock music and psychedelic colors that did nothing for the story.I am an animation junkie and will watch anything and everything, but I couldn't get through this whole film</review_text>
this in an uninspired telling of a transparent political fable.  Good enough to watch once</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
Not that I know everything about crime - especially getting away with it - but A SHOCK TO THE SYSTEM made it look too easy. Performances by Michael Caine as a done-wrong-now-doin'-wrong angry executive and Will Patton as  the police detective who is wise to him make the film worth a look on  television.  But A SHOCK TO THE SYSTEM needed to close a few holes in its  story to make it worthy of your movie theater/home video payment</review_text>
Two moderately decent-looking white people who apparently aren't very good at sex go at it in this movie. If that's your thing, why not just rent a bad softcore porn film and be done with it? At least then you won't have to listen to the cornball pseudo-artistic dialogue in this film. What a crock. They could at least have cast a fine young sista like Rosario Dawson or Gabrielle Union to make this movie moan and squeal! This movie makes sex seem boring</review_text>
One of the worst films of a generation.  Many talented comedic  (Dave Thomas - Colleen Camp) were wasted in this decrepit piece of digital doggeral.</review_text>
This was a really dissapointing remake of the great adventure story by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle. It didn't really seem to follow the original novel other than the names of the lead characters. The plot and scripting are  incredibly weak, it seems the editors just stopped mid-movie and rolled the  credits there. The CGI dinosaurs' appearances were impressive but their  animation was very stiff. In my opinion, not worth the $83 it costs</review_text>
I was really disappointed with this entry even though Jason Takes Manhattan isn't much better! The DVD treatment is way to good for this film. If you want to complete the Friday series it should be seen as it does set up for the Freddy VS Jason movie.</review_text>
I can respect director Adam Marcus for trying to pull away from the series and do something different, but we already had the BS Ft13th movie: Part V.  Jason wasn't the killer.  Technically, Jason is the killer in this movie, but it's not really.  You'll see what I mean when you see the movie, and it is worth a see, but by the 7th or 8th movie, they were movies for the fans.  They stopped making them to be innovative by the 5th movie and were just making them to make money and entertain the audience.  Adam Marcus wanted to be innovative with Jason Goes to Hell, and it doesn't work.  Not for fans or an average audience.  There's nothing interesting about seeing random people who act like Jason walking around and killing people, not to mention WITHOUT the trademark machete.  They could've at least given these people a little personality with the machete, but whoever called that one thought they were doing the series a favor.  The introduction of Jason having a sibling, niece, and now a great niece (I think?) by the 9th movie in the series is a little too late, sorry.  We would've had to know about these people by at least the 3rd or 4th movie to make us care about their struggle.  Another thing:  Jason as a snake/demon creature crawling around the floor?  Hmm... I wasn't under the impression that Jason was really evil in the first place.  Let me explain:  Jason has been made out to be mentally/physically disabled.  If Ginny in Part 2 was able to convince him that she was his mother by wearing her sweater, than Jason isn't evil at all, he just loves his mom and kills all the victims because he believes that they're responsible.  So, Jason as a wierd little hell creature doesn't necessarily work when bringing it into the context of the other movies.  The design of Jason's actual appearances in the movie doesn't make sense either.  What happened between part 8 and 9 to get his mask somehow buried and melded into his face?  Why does he look fat?  Where did his hair come from?  At least Part 8 had some respect for the look and personality of Jason, while it might not have been the best in the series it was at least satisfying to see him the way we know him, and not make drastic changes which don't even benefit his appearance.  Adam Marcus, I can respect you for trying to make your own movie, and yeah, it's definately yours.  Don't try and make your own movie the 9th movie in a series of movies that are about the fans, and don't BS the fans with your idea of an improvement of the series.I'd say, fans should see this movie just to see it.  It's worth the view and the surprise cameo at the end.  *wink*</review_text>
What this film has is an interesting premise and storyline but unfortunatley it becomes to silly and ridicoulos and the car chase scenes didn't help either. Bruce Willis plays the part of a psychologist that while on vacation visits a friend of his Bob Moore who is also a psychologist and is later murdered and the chief suspect is in his therapy group, Bob is determined to find the killer and is also helped by a detective. There is also a young atractive woman played by Jane March who gets involved with Bruce willis's character Dr. Bill Capa, the films only intresting thing is the therapy group itself which has some odd characters otherwise the film was a lame attempt of being a thriller. Now I'm not a big fan of Bruce Willis but I have seen much better films with him in it than this including Die hard trilogy, last man standing and the sixth sense</review_text>
This video has some very effective routines, but the moves are performed much too fast for safe form.  Because they are done so fast, injuries can incur.  She starts out slowly but quickly go into, what she calls, super sets.  I have several videos, and that is definitely not the proper way to super set.  Normally, you could modify the moves by performing them slower, but, because they are time crunch workouts (about 10 minutes each segment), you really don't have the time to do that.  Definitely, not one of her better videos.  The routines are easy, but because of the improper form used, not recommended for the beginner, as it could do my damage then good.  If you are a Denise Austin fan (even though her voice is a bit annoying and this is not one of her better videos, she's still a great instructor), try one of her Hit The Spot segments.</review_text>
I struggle with this movie. I'm a die-hard fan of Jean-Claude Van Damme, so part of me really likes this movie. But the other part knows that this is a very subpar direct-to-video with a slow script, uninteresting characters, and horrendously bad acting (save for JCVD himself). Having said this, I can honestly reccomend it to fans of Van Damme. They will certainly have a good time watching the muscles from Brussles kick the tar out of some low-life hicks while drinking with his Indian buddy and pickin' up chicks. If this appeals to you, there shouldn't be any reason why you wouldn't like "Desert Heat." If even one of this doesn't sound good, stay far away</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
The only thought in my mind throughout this whole movie was the Natalie Holloway case, about the girl last summer that went on that school trip, went off with a boy and disappeared. In this movie, Hilary Duff's character is on a school trip to Rome, meets a guy there and then fakes sick to get away from the school group to follow this guy around Rome. I felt so bad that Disney had made this movie showing a young girl going off on her own with a boy she did not know on a school trip because it rang so close to home from that tragic dissappearance of Natalie Holloway. In this movie the only repurcussions the character gets for doing such completely unsafe acts was that she was grounded..and they didn't even show that part. Young girls are very impressionable and will jsut see the glamour in the movie. Hopefully they will be brough up by good parents that will teach them right to know better than to go off with a stranger in a strange place</review_text>
WARNING ~ a bunch 'o ''SPOILERS'' and common sense ALERT !!!why)did the grand father have to be a perverted drug addict????how i would have done it)make him practicing for his upcoming geriactric pageant.honestly,the movie might have been better without him.most old folks are being portrayed as hippies,hipsters,sassy vixens and gruff  guys anyway.this of course,would have killed off this movies 2nd biggest gimmick.why)did the uncle HAVE to be gay???how i would have done it)ok,a regular uncle isnt funny or gimmicky.how about a gambler ??? an uncle whos depressed/suicidal over losing everything in poker while having only the second highest hand there is.not only that but he loses everything to the loan shark who happened to be at the same table.why)were the parents so feeble???how i would have done it)first off,dont have ANYONE,relative or not,have control over a young child in your home.in real life,its not friends or neighbors who mess you up,but family members.i would have had the whole family participating in olives quest for shallowness.of course that would have killed the movies biggest gimmick.why)wasnt there a pet added to the mix of ''dysfunction''(it was the only gimmick left untapped)????how i would have done it)to replace the cursing,drug addict geezer and empty headed parents gimmicks,id toss in pet skunk,porcupine or rat.some animal thats not a popular choice but is loved nonetheless.why)did olives routine have to be an audition for her future stripping gig????how i would have done it)while my idea wouldnt have been ''edgy'',it would have been more original....have her be a magician and gramps be her ''eye candy'' assistant.even more,have her be good at it.get those ''ugly'' pets to par take as well.make the done up midgets AND their loser parents feel ridiculous not by being outrageous but showing her talent/s.if contestants arent allowed to have assistants,no prob.have her be good at her tricks while still involving said animals and have rick james be her soundtrack.having olive win despite not being little miss pretty would have been the way id go.the stuff that worked;dad having difficult time living his dream.son having will power of some sort attempting his (not speaking is a good a choice as any).a family conflict of any kind and having them come through it even stronger.the bus.im not completely sure what message this little movie was trying to get across.dreams cant get crushed even though the ones you place your dreams success upon are the ones crushing them ?!?!?!?!?!?!?(shrugs uncaring shoulders uncaringly</review_text>
when given good stories tobe hooper can be a good director.to bad this one isn't a very good story.this mess came out at the heigth of the "slasher" movie frenzy. but not wanting to be just a slasher movie they try to give us a monster also. the theme of 4 kids who,now hold on here,think it would be fun to spend the night in the funhouse at a traveling carnival. before you can say "please kill me" the "thing" is picking them off one by one. with only 4 teens in the funhouse you would think maybe some fleshing out of the teens would happen, but no, they just go for the tease scares and even at 90 mins. this bore last to long</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
I read this book for a project two years ago. I wasn't about to finish this book and had to move to another one. First off, this book lacks emotion. This character is so boring. She doesn't seem to ever feel sad or mad and to me, a book without emotion is just unreadable. I hated this book, but I don't like most Scott O'Dell books. Just go read another book</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
Lorna is pretty, and her suitor is devoted. The story holds your attention. For many that is enough. Some auspicious beginnings, without depth. So maybe 3-stars for some people. I give 2-stars, if I do not keep it to watch again in later years.I found the romance unfulfilling, and so the movie. Romance movies that I liked better are: "North & South", "Pride & Prejudice"-1940, & 1996 & 2006, "Wives and Daughters", and "A Walk to Remember". Adventure with romance: "The Scarlet Pimpernel".</review_text>
Just a note to those who were uncomfortable watching this film with their children; movies have ratings for a reason.  This movie is rated PG-13, which tells you up front that it has content that is considered inappropriate for children.  In this case, it is crude humor.What I don't understand is why they made a movie with a story line aimed at a young audience, and then inclduded content that earned it a rating that recommends that a young audience shouldn't see it</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money</review_text>
Between the amended "politically correct" ending to this famous tale and the so-very-hokey interaction between Kirstey Alley and Lloyd Bridges, I couldn't wait for this to be over! The animation was very poor quality... the music was not the focus, my grandchildren lost interest. Shat else could possibly have been wrong</review_text>
Unfortunately, I was sent a standard American copy of the movie which, of course, doesn't function on a european system, despite my adress beeing in Switzerland. So I was kind of disapointed to have a)lost the money b)not been able to watch the movie. One is wrong to assume that every european household is having an american compatible DVD player.</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
From the cover, this movie looked like a fun mixture of Cruel Intentions and Metropolitan. No such luck. I think the biggest problem in this movie was the script-- the writing was so bad that it was actually painful to listen to the dialogue. Though there are some normally fine actors in this cast, it would have been impossible to triumph over the poor script, and the cast as a whole seemed strangely void of emotion, except for a few moments of melodrama. I found myself hating even the characters we were supposed to sympathize with. Delilah, who is supposed to be the "fun, crazy" outsider, simply disgusted me with her actions at the movie's central party. Even the art direction in this movie was strange-- many pivotal scenes in the movie were shot from very far away. The strangeness of this movie is not intentional, it's just lack of skill. Stay away</review_text>
I'm a fan of Audrey Hepburn and this movie relys heavily - too heavily on her charm.  And unfortunately, it is some of her worst acting work, posey, sing-song, and superficial.  Now, if you've read her bio, and know what was going on with her and Holden, that could explain it, but still, this film is very static.Like most Heburn films, a highlight is her clothes, her style, her self.  This film self-consciously relys on this when the script itself could simply have been better.  There are some very fun cameos by big performers that raise moments here.  This film would have benefited greatly by a better comic actress in the lead.  Jayne Mansfield could have been a hoot in this, Thelma Ritter too, in a very different way, somebody with less style and more off beat snap, crackle, and pop.  (Thelma Ritter and William Holden paired in a romantic comedy... I'm all ready laughing!)Before I hit this too harshly, this film was intended to be a trifle, the kind of movie that has bright colors and light plot for a hot summer day that sizzles.  For that, it is adequate.The remake, ALEX AND EMMA suffers very much from the same problems.  They actually improved the script, and gave the leading lady room to make some very wacky choices, but both films seem to have suffered from "settling for a star" when a less mainstream, more zany actress was needed.  OK, this doesn't stink...it has Audrey, but it certainly doesn't sizzle</review_text>
It's always nice to watch Famke Janssen, of course, but I like it better when she's either a very smart X-Person or a Bond-busting sadist.  This movie really wanted to scare me but sheesh.  And the bad guy was like an evil version of Sgt. Carter from Gomer Pyle - totally implausible.  I think the problems start in these movies when horror writers direct them</review_text>
This isn't funny. It isn't well directed or scripted. Perhaps it could have been great, if it had had a decent scriptwriter or director, but it didn't, so it turned out mediocre at best. Unfortunately, I believed all the hype on this website and bought a copy of this for my boyfriend and I to watch. I told my boyfriend that according to most of the reviews I'd read, this was going to be a brilliant, hilarious cult classic. But now that we've watched it, he and I both know better. We know it's dreadful, and I can only imagine all the nice things I'm going to have to do for him to make up for my expecting him to sit through this tedious monstrosity. The only highlight for us was a spirited argument he and I got into halfway through the movie about where we'd seen one of the actors in the movie before. I'm pleased to say I won the argument. That was pretty much the only highlight of the movie for me.In my opinion this is not a 'hilarious cult classic' as others so often describe it. I don't know how drunk I'd have to be to agree with that assessment of the movie, or to find it even a little bit funny, but I suspect I would have to get smashed enough that I'd need a stomach pump afterwards.If you want to see a genuinly hilarious cult sci-fi classic, pick up a copy of Flash Gordon. That has great actors, great sets, wonderfully campy scripts, brilliant humour, and a soundtrack by Queen. Furthermore, it has stood the test of time and is still great today, unlike 'The Ice Pirates', which has dated REALLY badly.Better yet, get hold of some 'Red Dwarf' dvds...seriously, Red Dwarf is sci fi humour at its BEST! It's so good, it will spoil you for other sci fi comedies</review_text>
This was on television earlier today. It's a horribly dated film. Bad pacing, bad music, with not much of a plot. Also, I'd suggest not eating at Dante's. And please, try not to kill the messengers</review_text>
I don't think so.  Contrived movie with a little cycling thrown in to make up for a poor script.  Think about it: take a dump on a stock and get wiped out; now you are a messenger?  I do not think so.  I know of a few New York Stock Exchange brokers who blew themselves up on trades, but this is crazy.  Thank goodness they kept the New York scenes to a minimum.  Yes, he was suppose to be at the NYSE and not the Pacific Stock Exchange as a previous reviewer wrote</review_text>
This movie I think was just plain depressing! Just when you think something good and happy will happen, someone dies, people seperate, bones are broken, so on and so forth. This movie got alot of great reviews, and it was a fun movie, but for people who like complete happy endings, this film is not for you.</review_text>
Dear Film Company Jackasses,Surely you know we already hate you for your greed - Why do you add insult to injury by taking fine films like "The Great Santini" and cutting them to Full Screen?Yet another fine film marred, no doubt, by some big company's desire to cut corners. Burn, Hollywood, burn</review_text>
With "Death on the Nile," the producers of the A&E "Poirot" series can claim to have broken all ties with the original British program starring David Suchet, save the presence of the star. The qualities that made the original program endearing-the wit, the exquisite production design, the fastidious attention to detail, the superb character acting of both the regulars and guests-are gone. That is not to say that this new Poirot is completely devoid of redeeming qualities, just that they pale in comparison with the original series.The novel from which the movie is derived provides one of Christie's more complexly interwoven series of plots and sub-plots. It is no coincidence that the late 70s theatrical version starring Peter Ustinov ran well over two hours, and even at that simplified the story considerably. This new adaptation effectively eliminates the motivations for murdering the victim for most of the characters, and even those with motivation are given barely a scene or two to express those reasons. There really isn't much going on at all except the central love triangle and Poirot's sage pronouncements on the sidelines.Even so, the movie seems to be rushing to its conclusion, as if all involved had other commitments they were eager to fulfill. Even Suchet just seems tired of the part, racing through his summing up speech as if reading a laundry list. (And the screenwriters really should be shot for burdening Poirot with pensive regrets about his failed love life. If there is one thing true of Christie's Poirot, it was that he didn't give a hoot about emotional entanglements. This is a sentimental hack's notion of "deepening" a character best known for his airy aloofness.)The compensations? Some nasty humor at the edges which may not be everyone's cup of tea. Some nice location photography, and the occasional odd bit of behavioral detail from some of the supporting players. Alaistair MacKenzie as the aristocrat going through a Marxist phase and Steve Pemberton as the mysterious Dr. Bessner stand out. At their best, they are within calling distance of the better character playing in the series, although in Pemberton's case, at least, the character has been stripped of any motivation, and thus is something of a gratuitous appendage to the mystery.Otherwise, it's a depressing lack of distinction across the board. A&E would be doing all of us a favor by stopping now, while they are behind.</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
To be quite honest, although there was a stunning cast, the plot was gory. It was sweet and had it's element of romance, but it was too morbid for me to enjoy. If you are watching for Drew Barrymore, don't bother. she only  appears halfway through the movie and then only sporadically afterwards.  Dean Cain on the other hand looks mighty fine, if you're after a gay man.  It's not the type of movie you want your children to watch. Trust me</review_text>
A shallow treatment of shallow characters with shallow values... A waste of time.</review_text>
When Danny Devito's plays Larry Garfield he is like Taxi's Louie De Palma of Wall Street</review_text>
This isn't funny. It isn't well directed or scripted. Perhaps it could have been great, if it had had a decent scriptwriter or director, but it didn't, so it turned out mediocre at best. Unfortunately, I believed all the hype on this website and bought a copy of this for my boyfriend and I to watch. I told my boyfriend that according to most of the reviews I'd read, this was going to be a brilliant, hilarious cult classic. But now that we've watched it, he and I both know better. We know it's dreadful, and I can only imagine all the nice things I'm going to have to do for him to make up for my expecting him to sit through this tedious monstrosity. The only highlight for us was a spirited argument he and I got into halfway through the movie about where we'd seen one of the actors in the movie before. I'm pleased to say I won the argument. That was pretty much the only highlight of the movie for me.In my opinion this is not a 'hilarious cult classic' as others so often describe it. I don't know how drunk I'd have to be to agree with that assessment of the movie, or to find it even a little bit funny, but I suspect I would have to get smashed enough that I'd need a stomach pump afterwards.If you want to see a genuinly hilarious cult sci-fi classic, pick up a copy of Flash Gordon. That has great actors, great sets, wonderfully campy scripts, brilliant humour, and a soundtrack by Queen. Furthermore, it has stood the test of time and is still great today, unlike 'The Ice Pirates', which has dated REALLY badly.Better yet, get hold of some 'Red Dwarf' dvds...seriously, Red Dwarf is sci fi humour at its BEST! It's so good, it will spoil you for other sci fi comedies</review_text>
My SECOND review, as my first did not get printed (AS USUAL).  Anyway, I'll try to make this short and sweet.  I usually try and give credits to directors, producers, writers, and actors in most of my movie reviews; however, I'm going to make an exception here.  I've read other reviews that have called this gigantic turd "hilarious", "Night of the Living Dead + money + color", "wonderful for gorehounds", etc., etc., etc.  All I can say is it must not take much to please you people.This is, WITHOUT A DOUBT, the WORST excuse for a movie I've ever seen.  (My most humble apologies to Tobe Hooper and "Mortuary").  The whiners of horror movies are always moaning and groaning, "why don't critics take horror movies more seriously?".  Well, Einstein, here's a glowing example.  This is nothing but grade D trash:  horrible effects, horrible acting, horrible writing, horrible directing.  You name it; it's NOT in there.  This movie's most FEEBLE attempts at humor come off as just that:  feeble.  I bought this, together with "Dead and Breakfast", and I can't begin to tell you which one is worse.So, here's a little advice from me:  go check out a book at the library, buy a book, go to a REAL movie, have your hair done, have a manicure--do ANYTHING but waste your time on this gag-fest (for all the WRONG reasons) of a movie.  Another one that I would give ZERO stars to, if I could.</review_text>
Something fishy is certainly going on if the average review for this movie is 4 stars.  This is truely THE worst adaptation of a novel ever made.  Costner should be tried for crimes against cinematography.  This movie is far beyond AWFUL</review_text>
I love this movie as I have seen it many times.  Audie Murphy did a great job in playing himself, although it must have been really hard to relive.A movie that I would highly recommend.</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
The characters are not appealing and the story is not interesting. An effort to watch. Make-up, dyed hair, costumes poorly done. One man's eyebrows, the suitor's, are altered like a woman's! No scenery or homes of interest, except a glance at the sailing ships in the harbor. Not a pleasant pace, without humor, without intrigue. A lesbian undertone in one scene.The only positive thing I can think of is this good line of Jane Austen, quoted. Fanny sums up in one sentence, why she will not marry him. Women who have spent hours within romance in uncertainty, will wish to sum up their certainty with Ms. Austen's line: "His sole interest is in being loved, not in loving". This line is an exception to a lifeless script.There, now you do not need to endure the painful movie. Here are two lines re-written by me: For the woman dealing with a trifling man: "No man suffers pains of love on the stage." For dealing with the infatuated man: "You have wounded yourself, but not with love."This movie should be re-made by someone sharing the ideals of Jane Austen. There is plenty to be mined from the novel to create a pleasant film, humorous, with singing, with interest. A movie can take the best of the book, in the spirit of the book, which this movie did not carry, and make a movie better than the book. This movie is bad any which way.Well-made period romance films are: "Pride & Prejudice 2005, 1996, & 1940", "Wives & Daughters", "North & South". Fairly made is "Under the Greenwood Tree". I rated "Persuasion" at 2-stars for the wooden acting; however "Persuasion" is 5-stars compared to this "Mansfield Park". "Persuasion" has attractive scenery, costumes, beautiful singing, and an uplifting plot; though of interest only to women, preferably who have already read the book.</review_text>
After watching the newest version on television, this one didn't measure up. The movie didn't make you want to watch more. There was no romance compared to the latest version</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
What i mean by the title of my review is yes this movie is going to be funny its Monty Python! but there is also some parts where it just really gets out of hand in my mind. If you are new to Monty Python I would get the quest for the holy grail before this one. Also the Monty Python's Flying Circus is great too. It comes in a 16 DVD set so it will give you a lot of their old stuff. I really did not enjoy certain parts. But there is a few good moments.</review_text>
I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..</review_text>
This is one creative way in which to recoup some of the loss incurred by buying this nightmare. If you are one of the unfortunate who rent this waste of time(like I was) recommend that your local video store make one empty space on their shelves and toss this loser. This 71 minute "experience", which feels more like 100 Days of Viewing Hell, is nothing more then a montage of artsy, disjoined, surreal scenes. It quickly becomes boring after the first 5 minutes, tedious after 10 minutes, and downright irritating at around 15 minutes. I actually made the mistake of suffering through to the end, hoping that something magical would happen to make everything half-way understandable. This film could only appeal to the rare, artistically elite, filmgoer who finds anything as superficial as character development or cumbersome as plot layout simply uninspiring</review_text>
I saw this on TCM years ago and i thought what is all the fuss about. I do not like how it glorifies that leaving your wife and kid is swell. The men look more like lady's then the men in this movie that are after her. Also this movie is so long and boring. Don't get me wrong i like foreign films even the ones that are slow like wild strawberries, umberto d and such but this one did nothing for me. Another thing his wife is alot more actrative then the woman he desires. You can tell i did not mention character names well i forgotten them i only seen this moive me once and that was enough. A other thing i need to mentin why is that criterion charges so much for there dvds other dvds are restored as well and they are cheaper and most of chiterion dvds do not even have a whole lot of bonus features</review_text>
I too bought this on VHS for Vincent D'Onofrio.  My only negative comment about his performance is that there's not enough of it!  I'll say right here and now that I'm not a big fan of Smits or Scacchi, and D'Onofrio overpowers them every time he's on screen.  It's a beautiful story, and I can see why director Gillian Armstrong was attracted to it - it is a love story with a bit of real-life depth (rather than those soapy ones where the ridiculous problems are created by the characters for lack of imagination - Julia Roberts films, anyone?).  That being said, the two lead roles needed to be played by stronger actors, and ones that could keep up with D'Onofrio vivacity.  Worth a look for fans</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
George Segal is a good actor, but he is out of his element in this type of movie.  He is much better in light-hearted movies like "Fun With Dick and Jane."The biggest disappointment is the dialog by Harold Pinter.  The characters exchange meaningless small talk at cross purposes while nothing happens, and we all get bored.This spy movie is not even in the same league with "Day of the Jackel" and "The Odessa File."I threw away my copy of "The Quiller Memorandum" after watching it once.  I can't imagine ever wanting to see it again</review_text>
Every once in a while someone comes up with a movie and makes the terrible assumption that as long as they put a well known actor/actress in it that everything will turn out good. Blue Steel is one of those movies. Jamie Lee Curtis plays a rookie cop who is being held responsible for civilian casualties (or should I say murders) which she did not commit. Sounds like an interesting plot, right? It would be had the script not been so poorly written. The supporting actors give such a bland/typical performance that not even Jamie Lee could have saved the dialogue. Aside from the acting, the film does not give the action packed performance that it promises. Some scenes are quite dull and as you are watching you wonder half way through the movie when the cop (Jamie Lee) is going to finally kill the psychopath whose been after her. So why do I give Blue Steel an extra star? Well, I'll just say that if you are a fan of Jamie Lee Curtis you might want to watch this if it comes on television. Just don't pay over $3 to rent it and certainly don't buy it</review_text>
"Over done" is the best way to describe this over-the-top attempt to view gang life from the eye of a "stolen" video camera.</review_text>
This is not one of Fred's better efforts,  the dancing is so so and Rita Hayworth is among his poorest dance partners.  Lacks the glamor and sex appeal of the Astaire/Rogers films.  In spite of these shortcomings the film is worth watching</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
THE SOUND IS BAD. I HAVE TRIED THIS DVD ON 2 DIFFERENT PLAYERS AND IT MADE NO DIFFERENCE</review_text>
I am a huge fan of BBC period drama and have nearly exhausted my library's supply of miniseries based on the works of Austen, Gaskell, Dickens, and Eliot. But I would have to say that the BBC struck out this time. The direction was bad, the acting was mediocre at best, the music was obtrustive, and the screenplay was just plain awful. After the first half-hour my sisters and I survived the rest by poking fun at one cliche after another. I have not read the book so I don't know how much of it is from the source material. Makes me curious to read it, though. The costumes and some of the scenery were good; I'll give it that</review_text>
I was very unimpressed with this movie. "Borat" suffers from the same delusion as Sarah Silverman in thinking that crass or politically incorrect AUTOMATICALLY equals funny. It does not. Of course sometimes it can be hilarious (and Borat does have moments like that), but overall I did not find this movie particularly funny or even amusing. Especially the scene where the naked friend sits on Borat's face was just disgusting and it dragged on and on and on. At some point I just fast forwarded it. You're not missing much if you don't watch this movie</review_text>
I have no idea why I saw this movie in the first place, perhaps it was because The Jungle Book is a fascinating story. However I was realy dissapointed not only is the film boring but it is very silly(in a stupid way).The action scenes were terrible. I recommend this movie to 6 year olds who dont care about the quality of movies.</review_text>
I hated, hated, hated, hated this movie. It didn't make sense to me. To depresssing</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
Back in the early 90's, Jane March made a big splash internationally with her uninhibited performance in the sexually explicit The Lover. Granted, the role didn't give her much to work with, but from a physical standpoint she made a big impression on a lot of filmgoers, including me. The movie garnered her a lot of notoriety and she had every opportunity to use that as a spring-board into a legitimate movie career. Unfortunately, choosing the unbelievably stupid Bruce Willis vehicle Color of Night as her follow-up probably killed any chance at a career that she had.I've always found erotic thrillers to be quite a dubious genre. Most of the ones that I've seen, while sexually explicit, aren't really erotic. Nor are they thrilling in any way. This movie was following on the heals of the tremendous success of Basic Instinct and almost every studio was chomping at the bit to come out with something similar. As a result we ended up with some terrible films like Sliver, Jade, Body of Evidence and this film, Color of Night.The plot goes something like this. Bruce Willis is a psychiatrist who has a patient dive out of his office window, going splat on the sidewalk below. He is so traumatized by the incident that he loses the ability to see the color red(!). He decides to take a break by visiting his psychiatrist friend played by Scott Bakula and hanging out with Scott's therapy group. He hopes that he might be able to make some sense as to what has happened. Scott's group is a motley crew of screwed up people, from a woman who is nymphomaniac, to a weird androgynous young boy. Bruce ends up meeting a beautiful young woman played by the delectable Jane March and he quickly falls in love with her. We get treated to explicit scenes of the two of them screwing in the pool, the bedroom, the bathtub and the shower. Meanwhile someone murders Scott Bakula and starts to wreck havoc with Bruce. He tries to figure out if it's someone in Scott's therapy group and on and on and so forth.The movie is really quite laughable due to the fact of how serious Bruce Willis was apparently taking this movie. Virtually everyone else in the movie seems to have their tongue planted in their cheeks with their performances, but Bruce seemed to think that this might be an Oscar contender. Add to the fact that the plot is absolutely atrocious and contrived beyond comprehension, and add way too many red herrings, and the movie quickly becomes a chore to watch.About the only thing this movie really had going for it was the explicit, but decidedly unerotic sex scenes. They really come across as more silly than anything else.The only thing that I enjoyed was getting to see a slightly older Jane March in the buff and looking better than ever. What a smoking body!But, like I mentioned before, she got a lot of the blame along with Bruce as to why the movie turned out so terrible and as a result, she has appeared in very few movies since. I still think that if she had been given the proper chance, she could have been a great actress, but people have all but forgotten about her by now.It's really surprising that this movie didn't kill Bruce Willis' career. But I guess if he could survive Hudson Hawk & Bonfire of the Vanities, he could survive anything.BTW, the version I watched was listed as being the "R-rated director's cut" with 17 additional "steamy" minutes added back into the film. Since I never saw the original cut I couldn't tell what might have been added back into this version. There is some fairly explicit sexual content and a shot of full frontal Bruce Willis nudity in the pool scene but nothing that's too strong.Avoid this movie like it was herpes.Color of Night is rated R and contains strong sexual content, nudity, graphic violence and strong language.</review_text>
What this film has is an interesting premise and storyline but unfortunatley it becomes to silly and ridicoulos and the car chase scenes didn't help either. Bruce Willis plays the part of a psychologist that while on vacation visits a friend of his Bob Moore who is also a psychologist and is later murdered and the chief suspect is in his therapy group, Bob is determined to find the killer and is also helped by a detective. There is also a young atractive woman played by Jane March who gets involved with Bruce willis's character Dr. Bill Capa, the films only intresting thing is the therapy group itself which has some odd characters otherwise the film was a lame attempt of being a thriller. Now I'm not a big fan of Bruce Willis but I have seen much better films with him in it than this including Die hard trilogy, last man standing and the sixth sense</review_text>
This film has been re-released as "Meltdown."  There are a few reasons for watching this movie: 1) Jet Li.  2) Chingmy Yau (the reporter).  3) Wu Ma (Frankie's dad)  4) a decent fight scene at the end.  Jacky Cheung is also not as aggravating as usual.   That's it.  Jet Li has appeared in three or four films directed by Wong Jing, and, just as Chow Yun Fat does in God of Gamblers and Jackie Chan does in City Hunter, he does what he can.  The direction of the film, however (as well as GOG and CH), stinks.  The plot copies Die Hard and Speed, with some broad satire aimed at Jackie Chan, but that is not the problem.  Put simply, Jackie Chan knows how to direct a film.  Wong Jing does not.  If you want to see Jet Li, go see Fist of Legend, Once Upon A Time in China, or just about anything else he has done.  If you want to see a good Hong Kong action movie, watch films directed by John Woo, Ringo Lam, Tsui Hark, Jackie Chan, and Sammo Hung.  Jet Li is fun to watch, but go watch everything else he has done before you get to this</review_text>
The plot of the story was ruined by the immorality and language.   This could have been a beautiful story if sexual immorality and profane language had been eliminated.   It is possible to have something beautiful and clean where when you finish you feel that you have experienced something encouraging and uplifting.   Dying Young and the plot of sickness and someone caring is beautiful.  Falling in love is beautiful but it is degraded by stooping to immorality.   I threw it in the trash as I would not share it with those that I love</review_text>
Everthing about this movie was bad.  The Acting, the story, the revenge of the nerds like characters and humor.  The acting and production value was so bad that you'd think it was a home made movie with somebody using a home camera from 1975.  How much did it cost them to film this movie?  50 bucks?  The Revenge of the Nerds like script has been done to death and has never been funny to begin with</review_text>
I have friends who might be into this stuff, if only because they like the old and the strange. Me, I'm just like -- Is this "It's a Wonderful Life"?I think I might have enjoyed this more if it was a novel or maybe if I picked up the script. As it is, this just barely seems to translate into a movie, and--forgive me for I have my own opinion--"City of Angels" was a good movie. Too bad if you don't like all this "contemporary nonsense." I feel like it worked.My opinion: it's long, it's boring, it's hard to hear. Even if it has a message, I just can't relate to it. So maybe that's my problem.Your opinion: your own. keep it. you're lucky I gave it two stars</review_text>
This film really made me angry and pissed off I bothered watching it. The characters were cardboard and I can't believe Ingrid Bergman starred in this junk.The main character totally lost it, believing all what her husband was saying about her. She was totally unthinking in the whole episode until it was revealed that her husband was a con</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
Very bizzare movie! Not for kids or anyone who is prudish!Can be an erotic movie if you choose to see through the bizzare nature of it</review_text>
a tired bit of revisionist propaganda out of post-soviet russia which somehow won an oscar as best foreign film.  its fascinating that something so heavy handed can pretend to be an answer to the vile excesses of the stalin era, but what can one expect?  there is (at least one) great movie to be made about that era; dont look for it here.</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
I love the Avatar and I was so thrilled that amazon allows people to download it except the only problem is I've been trying for the past days and darn it all, it's not working!!! It's not as if I'm downloading it for free. I am willing to pay and yet it just wouldn't go through!!! I think it's better to just buy the dvds...I think it's absolutely horrible to tease customers like that..</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
After watching "Anthropophagus- The Grim Reaper", I came away with mixed feelings.  On the one hand, "Anthropohagus" had its moments (albeit quite few) where it was somewhat chilling.  The Anthropohagus, himself, was rather effectively creepy as a horror movie villain.  Some scenes did fairly well building up to a moment of horror, but the problem is that these effective moments of horror are few and far between.  Unfortunately, the majority of this movie is beset with horrible acting and a very cheaply made horror movie, and for some reason, it is just very difficult to get over this fact in "Anthropophagus" probably because these weaknesses are so glaring."Anthropophagus" may even have outdone itself with some of the gore scenes, so the gore-hound shouldn't be disappointed with this flick.  However, with that being said, "Anthropophagus" simply is not all that scary except for the few moments that deliver a scare or two to the audience, and even those moments are fairly pedestrian when compared to the classic horror movies we have come to know and love.  Ultimately, what you have in "Anthropophagus" is horrible acting, a poorly written screenplay, uneven and poorly developed plot and action, below average plot execution, just a couple of scary moments, some laughable scenes, a fairly decent amount of gore and an absolutely disgusting, deplorable and depraved scene of violence (fetus scene) that really crosses all boundaries of horror movies that I've ever seen and which really offers nothing as far as the merits of the movie are concerned and certainly offers nothing to cinematic horror.  If that kind of thing appeals to you, this could be right up your alley, but it doesn't do much for me.  I would rather find a really compelling storyline and a scary movie that delivers atmospheric tension, suspense and a scary story, and you simply do not get that in "Anthropophagus".  To answer a few questions that could be asked about this movie...did "Anthropophagus" bother me? No.  Did I think it was scary?  Certainly not, laughable at some points in the movie but not scary, and nor did I find it disturbing.  However, it can certainly be said that what else do you expect from a low-budget Italian-made horror flick? Touche!In my search for a great horror movie lost in the annals of cinematic horror like a needle in a haystack, what did I find in "Anthropophagus" but another shock and gore horror movie with horrible acting and a barely watchable storyline.  Indeed, it is very difficult to give this movie any credit.  A word of advice, if you have to try to make yourself like a horror movie even after repeated viewings (like I did with this one), it probably just sucks.  For all intents and purposes, that is the case with "Anthropophagus-The Grim Reaper".  Nevertheless, sadly, I've seen much, much worse.</review_text>
Yes, I must admit that I was fooled by the "One of the most notorious, most debated, most banned films of the 'video nasty' era." line on this back of this movie case.  I was lucky because I found this at a Best Buy for $10.99.  It should be $2.99 for as bad as it is.  I've been let down by these Italian Horror Films one too many times.  If you want good, gore filled, Italian Horror stick with Lucio Fulci or Dario Argento.  Once you get past the bad dubbing and acting they're berrible.  Oh, by the way, unless you are fluent in Italian this second disk is almost worthless-there is no opportunity to even have English subtitles.  The only thing good about the second disk is the nudity and strong sexual content and that looks alright in any language</review_text>
A selfish, stupid woman engages in white collar crime, and goes to prison for her misdeed. I say stupid, because she could have paid a modest fine and gotten away with her crime, but chose instead to gamble with her and her family's future by trusting her lot to a jury of her peers. They judged her as harshly as I did.Once in prison, she is exposed to life's realities, possibly for the first time in her wretched existence. Seeing various and sundry sordid occurences beyond her middle class ken, she decides to meddle in the affairs of others (possibly motivated by petty jealousy, since she isn't getting any drugs or sex from the handsome male prison guards).To make a long story short, her rabble rousing is eventually heard in Washingtonm D.C., a senator takes more than a passing interest in her, and her sentence is commuted to a home curfew. I guess the moral of the story is white collar criminals are better suited to country club prisons.If you have nothing whatsoever to do, your DVD player is broken, and you don't feel like cleaning the oven, this movie might possibly entertain. Otherwise avoid at all costs</review_text>
Save your $3.50 DVD rental fee. If you're looking for a movie that will make you feel like City of Angels made you feel, look elsewhere! Sorry, my vote is for Hollywood. The director of Wings admits that there was no script before shooting began. The extras that came with the Wings DVD, interviews and info on Berlin, were more entertaining than the movie.</review_text>
The story of Wim Wenders' "Wings of Desire" is told through images and thoughts.  Abandon all expectations of seeing anything resembling a conventional film before watching it.Two angels glide through the streets of Berlin surveying its inhabitants.  Cassiel (Otto Sander) embraces his role as witness but Damiel (Bruno Ganz) wants to break free of his ethereal existence.  He is willing to cast aside his immortality in order to experience the simple joys of everyday life.  The primary catalyst for his desire to change is his attraction to trapeze artist Marion (Solveig Dommartin)."Wings of Desire" does not quite work.  It stumbles not because it is too pretentious or too ponderous.  Rather, it stumbles because it is just too abstract.   Relying on imagery and monologues to tell a story makes for an interesting lesson in unconventional filmmaking, but it also leads to frustration and annoyance to anyone conditioned to more traditional narratives.  "Wings of Desire" deserves a lot of credit for its innovative approach toward its material and its beautiful dream-like visuals.  Yet, it is a film that unfortunately will not appeal much to the mainstream viewer.</review_text>
I bought this DVD for my daughter who is from China and though I think Xiao Foo is adorable, I am disappointed by Big Bird's behavior. Not only does he seem frustrated every time the slightest thing does not go his way, but he tells Barkley at one point to "sic" the Monkey King and then later, again frustrated, tells the Monkey King to put his dukes up (as if to fight to resolve the issue). I am appalled by this.  Big Bird is also somewhat demeaning to the Chinese people he encounters--they don't understand him because he is speaking English and rather than explain the language barrier, he just gets upset. I love Sesame Street, and although I will keep this DVD to hear Xiao Foo sing in Chapter 7 (our daughter just loves her), I feel I will need to use Big Bird's behavior as an example of how not to act</review_text>
This movie doesn't have a single scene worth watching. Femalien 1 is in another league, don't waste your time on the sequel</review_text>
I'm a big Mann fan, and i even enjoy his not very good non noir or western films, thunder bay for instance. a great director, but this one stinks. i can't even get up the enthusiasm to criticise i</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
This movie is a dog, pure and simple. We ended up with two of these are the freebie give aways for the last few DVD players we bought. They can't sell it, so they're giving them away.  Hide ...fast</review_text>
purely for fans of crappy Van Damme movies again like I says. really corny from beginning to end. Paul Sorvino is totally and utterly fat and moronic in this one. Rob Schnider is wasted and WHY THE HELL WAS HE IN THIS I will have no clue. Van Damme kicks more butt and does more corny things then he did in Double Team. with horrible dialouge and a plot that seems like it came from some guy wiping his ass with a piece of toilet paper and then saw it on the piece of paper and said HEY!!!! damnit, lets make a movie about this piece of crap right here</review_text>
Throughly dismisses all Jazz after 1960, including Fusion, Free Jazz, and everything thereafter. Marsalis actually calls Cecil Taylor's music "self-indulgent bullsh**" Apparently Taylor was not allowed to rebut this during the film. How was that allowed to air on the supposedly intellectual (but more likely agenda-driven) on PBS, I will never understand. If you think Swing is the only valid form of Jazz, you will love this series. If you think Coltrane is a God, you get five minutes' summary. So lets see here: 15 hours on Louis Armstrong and Duke, 5 minutes on Coletrane, and a total didmissal of everything after Duke's death. Reminds me of the Republisuck's "Fair and Balanced" nonsense. PBS, this is your wake-up call. Stop trying to rewrite history - Jazz ain't in a museum. Just ask the artists (most of whom are alive) whom Burns left out. Metheny, you out there</review_text>
This film was dreadful.  Streisand is absolutely unlikeable.  To enjoy this film, you would need to buy into the romance between Streisand and Nolte and I just can't see how that is possible.  I couldn't believe it when I found out how critically acclaimed this film was.  Along with The English Patient, this is one of the worst 'critically acclaimed' films I have ever had the displeasure of viewing</review_text>
I tried to watch this twice. To see what the hype was. I fell asleep both times. Not funny just slow, boring, and stupid. WAY OVERATED</review_text>
Infested (Josh Olson, 2002)It's really kind of impressive that a movie this bad doesn't get shelved somewhere along the line. And yet here it is, in all its painfully cheesy glory, on my screen, daring me to turn it off. I almost gave in to the temptation, but I kept watching. For you, dear reader, so I can give you a full account of the true horror to be found here-- the ninety minutes of your life that you will never be able to get back if you rent this movie and sit down to watch it.The story, what there is of it: A number of friends show up at the estate of one of their high-school buddies, who's killed himself. There's all the post-funeral bonding stuff, and everything's looking remarkably Big Chill when things go horribly, horribly wrong thanks to vicious, genetically-altered flies that possess humans and turn them into soulless murderers. Yes, you got that right.As usual, the only reason to watch a movie like this is the cheesecake factor. Any Jo Johnson plays the dead guy's girlfriend (well, ex, I guess), and there is an obligatory scene where she shows a whole lot of skin. It is not, however, an out-and-out nude scene. Sorry, guys. There is also the gorgeous Lisa Ann Hadley (General Hospital/Port Charles), who's really starting to look like Kate Hodge. (This is a good thing. A very good thing.)You're certainly not watching for the special effects, (amateur even by microbudget-indie standards), the acting (atrocious), the script (even worse), the direction (competent at best), the cinematography (ditto), the soundtrack (cheesy early eighties pop that should have faded into obscurity years ago), or, really, anything else. So it's gotta be the cheesecake. And that's all well and good, but you can do that on fast-forward. I strongly suggest that route. At least you'll waste less time on this. (half</review_text>
This is not the first interview that Fra. Junge has given. View the sensational 1974 documentary, "The World At War,' narrated by Lord Laurence Olivier, and you will see a much younger Junge musing over her tenure with Hitler. Most of the information that she provides in this documentary was given in "The World At War." The 1974 documentary is filled with footage of Hitler. Having had relatives who were in Germany at the time, and personally knowing former German soldiers and officers, I find it difficult to believe that Junge did not know of the Nazi Death camps as both rumors and hard evidence surfaced while they were going on. I believe she knew but because of the fact that she was so taken by Hitler, perhaps she did not want to believe the rumors. My mother personally met Hitler when she was 15 and was totally mezmerized by his apparent charm and grace. At any rate, "Blind Spot" repeats "The World At War" interviews, and is a "talking head" that would have been better produced with raw footage with voice-over. The three stars is for effort, minus one star for "nothing new" and minus another star for German and not English (English sub-titles). The younger Frau spoke good English in 1974 but is lost in "Blind Spot."  S</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
Carly Simon's the only one worth watching on this DVD,but she's only in  the film for 69 seconds,and her only line is "I read that Sh-t you wrote about me."and thats what this movie i</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money</review_text>
...But it gets one star for the brief moments that Ricky Jay has in the film and another for portions of Alec Baldwin's performance.  Overall this is a stinker.  Mamet is not a good director.  He should stick to writing</review_text>
This movie lacked the luster I expect from Robert Duvall. It was an endless journey into boredom, at least for me</review_text>
I have friends who might be into this stuff, if only because they like the old and the strange. Me, I'm just like -- Is this "It's a Wonderful Life"?I think I might have enjoyed this more if it was a novel or maybe if I picked up the script. As it is, this just barely seems to translate into a movie, and--forgive me for I have my own opinion--"City of Angels" was a good movie. Too bad if you don't like all this "contemporary nonsense." I feel like it worked.My opinion: it's long, it's boring, it's hard to hear. Even if it has a message, I just can't relate to it. So maybe that's my problem.Your opinion: your own. keep it. you're lucky I gave it two stars</review_text>
I learned long ago to ignore and laugh at the positive and negative feedback that a reviewer gets.  Obviously my one star review of this movie will get negative feedback but that doesn't make my opinion any less valid.  It is, after all, my honest opinion, and therefore it is worth something to someone, if only to me.  Sometimes I agree with Ebert, and sometimes i completely disagree with him.  I think we all believe in our hearts that "I" am the only one with the correct opinion.  I would subscribe to that myself.This movie is PAINFULLY slow and boring.  Wim Wenders, next time maybe you will develop a story line, please, huh?I really hate the premise that the only way an angel's life can be fulfilling is if he becomes human.  That is the moral here and also in the annoying movie City of Angels.  That's absurd.  Assuming that there is life after death, assuming that there are angels, and I in no way discount that possibility because I know how little we truly know, it is absurd to think that the angels have nothing to do but watch over us and wish they were with us.  That is offensively stupid and self centered.  It is like a child's point of view that mommy and daddy have absolutely nothing to do and are bored to tears when they are not watching the baby and coloring in the baby's coloring book.So this conception of angels is, in my not at all humble opinion, stupid and offensive.  What makes you think that we humans are the center of the universe and the only worthwhile thing that is going on, dingbat?Stupid premise, and boring story, if you want to call it a story at all.  I can't keep watching it.  It is still on right now, and I'm writing this review to relieve the boredom.Later - After seeing the end of the movie, I must add that the final monologue committed by the angel's human girlfriend is probably the worst monologue I have ever seen on film.  She goes on and on, saying nothing, in a stupid and self indulgent elongated bit of nonsense that is surreal, meaningless, and stupid.The only thing that this movie has going for it is that it makes people appreciate simple things about life, like warming your hands together on a cold day.  That's a nice and worthwhile thought, to appreciate the very little and insignificant things about life.  Aside from that bit of wisdom, this movie is poor, boring, full of itself, aimless, and overrated</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
I downloaded this program and it was garbled and video as if played in slow motion.  This is the first of two downloads that didn't play.  I know it was not my computer because I did download three that played ok</review_text>
Well, nice cinematography as set-designer work: nicely interiors and well dressed actors. Maybe, visually it is enough to keep you watching this movie once, but not enough to consider it as a remarkable  movie of year, as other reviewers trying to assure</review_text>
I have seldom seen such a bad movie with so much talent.  (David Arquette, Stephen Baldwin, Mickey Rourke, etc.) One wonders what they saw in potential for this script or why they made choices to be involved.This horribly misguided film centers around a juvenile prank gone awry that ends up involving two bank-robbers who freak and there is enough gratuitous violence and mindless killing (and torture) to last me for the rest of my life.  The film starts out terribly boring and gets more mindless and boring as it concludes, perhaps expecting the violence to make up for the total lack of story.This is a disaster not worth enduring.  Save the actors and film-makers the embarrassment of seeing this film and see something else.</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
As usual, Robert Duvall's acting was phenomenal - why I purchased the movie - BUT the movie itself was pointless and boring.  My husband and I fell asleep.....when we woke up Robert Duvall's character was dead!  Enough said</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
I bought this DVD on the basis that Shania Twain performed the half time show. Even when i did a search for Shania Twain this DVD was listed - INCORRECTLY - as there is NO Shania performance on the DVD. As far as the football goes i really can not comment as i am from the UK and know nothing about American Footbal - sorry!!</review_text>
I was very disappointed with this film.  It definitely had a more "art house" feel to it than I was expecting - and like happens with many art house films Sebastiane is light on plot and character development and heavy on scenery shots, bad string music and slow motion nude shots (but, alas, not even erotic ones).The real story of Sebastiane is a fascinating one.  How does such a man transform into the much beloved St. Sebastiane of the Catholic church?   Well, don't expect this movie to tell you.  There is, as mentioned above, no character development.  We are given an off-handed explanation that Sebastiane's faith (Christianity) was the cause of his eventual execution - but any scenes of faith are oddly intertwined with a lot of Roman flavored philosophical ideas - references to Roman gods and so forth.  Very un-Catholic.  So while we know that it was Sebastiane's faith that lead to his execution, this "plot line" is really dulled down, to the point that there is no plot.The other men on the island are nothing more than pretty bodies to look at, their characters do not get developed at all.  (the interaction/conflict between Sebastiane and the Roman guard could have been so much more interesting and potent if Jarman had fleshed out that character a little more)Also, disappointing was that the eroticism of this film falls miserably flat.  Now I realize that I am a female and this is a gay movie, but I would like to think that I am as aroused by sexy, nude men as much as any gay man would be.  Well, I was not aroused.   There are plenty of shots of nude men, but the way that Jarman shot the film is so stylized and stiff, that it takes all the eroticism out of it.  I watched a slow motion scene of two nude men splashing in the surf and all I could think was "gay men are actually turned on by this??!"Well this straight woman was bored about half-way through the movie.  So my advice is don't buy this movie for it's story line or it's erotic value - there is none of either.</review_text>
An hour and a half of beautiful men prancing around wearing very little can never be less than watchable, but aside from the nudity and homoerotic horseplay, there isn't much else. Granted, there are a few nicely filmed poignant moments, but it's often dull</review_text>
Only Worth the second stop-motion sequence, when Flesh fights a robot twig. That scene is almost flawless and as good as any Harryhausen animation. The one love scene with Flesh and the hot curvy brunette is also nice. The film is worth a rent if your curious but it's really just a lame and unfunny movie. If your open to seeing a trashy sci-fi satire of Flash Gordon with some interesting special effects give it a look. Especially fans of stop-motion animation in which the film features 3 creature sequences</review_text>
I enjoyed this movie. I orginially saw this move 30 years ago and it brought back some good memories from the seventies. I wouldn't really call it a porn movie. It's more of a movie with adult humor. I'd give it an "R" rating compared to some of the stuff that is available today</review_text>
WHAT A WASTE OF FIM! TOO SNIDE FOR MY TASTE. MAYBE IT'D BEEN ENTERTAINING BACK IN THE 60'S, BUT TODAY IT'S ATTEMPT AT CAMP - OR KITSCH - IS JUST TOO THIN</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
i downloaded it and i couldn't view the video paste the intro. then i RE-downloaded it thinking that maybe it was a corrupt file, but it again it only had sound and not video. this one is a waste of money</review_text>
It's always nice to watch Famke Janssen, of course, but I like it better when she's either a very smart X-Person or a Bond-busting sadist.  This movie really wanted to scare me but sheesh.  And the bad guy was like an evil version of Sgt. Carter from Gomer Pyle - totally implausible.  I think the problems start in these movies when horror writers direct them</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
It's always nice to watch Famke Janssen, of course, but I like it better when she's either a very smart X-Person or a Bond-busting sadist.  This movie really wanted to scare me but sheesh.  And the bad guy was like an evil version of Sgt. Carter from Gomer Pyle - totally implausible.  I think the problems start in these movies when horror writers direct them</review_text>
it's a so-so film with Rourke in the IRA. Some good stuff. Look for Anthony(Stewart Head) as Rupert(note: Anthony Stewart Head portraits another Rupert...Rupert Giles on the TV show Buffy The Vampire Slayer)so, now you know. but this one is so-so like I sai</review_text>
Rogers and Hammerstein's "Cinderella" is one of my favorite musicals ever! But does this rendition do it justice? Absolutely not!!!!! More glitz and fancier costumes do not a make a better musical by any means. Maybe if I was not enamored with Leslie Ann Warren or Julie Andrews who make far better Cinderellas I would have enjoyed this. I am not against a politically correct image like this story attempts but if it was done tastefully i would have appreciated it better. If you are a Rogers and Hammerstein fan like I am, you want to watch it anyway but its not merely as charming as the other ones. Its ALOT more exciting that the Julie Andrews version was recently found save your money and buy that one. However a younger audience or an audience that was not enamored with the other Rogers and Hammerstein Cinderellas will appreciate it far better</review_text>
I must admit that I am a guy and that I bought this movie before seeing it. I was not shocked with the horrible acting, but was surprised with the hot stars. This movie had both hot guys and girls. The actor that caught my eye was Steven Albrecht "Freddy", he is so hot. We get see him completely nude showing off his hot body.  He did a great job in his breif scene. Josh Edwards "Trian" was okay to look at too. As for the actress...Venesa Taylor is also hot</review_text>
Okay, so to catch up on this exciting new series, I decided to try this revolutionary downloading program - Amazon Unbox!  I selected the first 10 episodes and hit Purchase.  Minutes later, I was watching the first episode, it came quickly, sounded great, and looked wonderful... however the second one was missing a few minutes at the end.  Forgiveable, until... whole episodes starting arriving incomplete or had missing video, making it incredibly frustrating and disappointing.But, this IS a good concept... unfortunately, Amazon has yet to verify all their own files for both audio and picture quality!  So, until the issue is fixed and paying customers recieve completed files or refunds... DO NOT try and download Season 1, Episodes 2, 4, 5, 6, and 7!!!  1, 3, 8, 9, and 10 were the only ones that were 100% complete for me</review_text>
This film really made me angry and pissed off I bothered watching it. The characters were cardboard and I can't believe Ingrid Bergman starred in this junk.The main character totally lost it, believing all what her husband was saying about her. She was totally unthinking in the whole episode until it was revealed that her husband was a con</review_text>
i had never known that there was a movie made about the life story of one of my very favourite singers patsy cline.well they needn't have bothered as it was a very much by the numbers story something definetely not above anything that you would see as a midday movie on any weekday.i liked both of the main actors,jessica lange and ed harris.the problem for me was that there was no attempt at conveying any real depth to the characters.whilst i appreciate that there has to be some element of fiction in most bio-pics anyone watchimg the movie and not having heard of patsy cline would be none the wiser for her motivations and driving forces.the only saving grace for me was that patsys singing was used in the movie to at least try to convey the quality that others saw in her singing</review_text>
Because there were so many great reviews for this movie, I decided to go out and rent this film and watch it.  I was bored to death watching this film, and whats with the words "what's wrong" kept being said over and over again every time someone opened the medicine cabinet in a computer generated voice?  Those words and that voice really annoyed me!  Why does this place have not one person with hair?  Now, I'm not trying to be raciest here, but what's with a black girl and guy dancing totally nude on t.v., well  I can only say that the girl was totally nude since they only showed the guys chest and up.  What's with that guy who kept stalking one guy by saying that he wanted to be his new roomate?  Was he supposed to be gay?  I guess this film is way to so called "artsy" for me.  What I know is that this film is boring, and when it comes to ending, you don't know what happends to the guy at the end.  The film just kind of fades out after he stands on top of that cone stairway.  This film makes the movie The Village exciting to watch.  I wish that I could give my money back</review_text>
This movie,   the story of a shocking long-ago murder entwined with the story of a modern woman who is investigating it,  is only worth watching to see the scenes leading up to the past crime.   The modern day portion of the movie is very tedious.    Elizabeth Hurley's and Sean Penn's characters are laughable caricatures.    Anita Shreve's writings never disappoint,   read the book instead.</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
Holy moley.  This thing sucked rancid twinkies through a hot garden hose.  Even *if* you could get past the editing, there's the lighting.Even *if* you could get past the lighting, there's the problem with the audio being disastrously out of sync with the video (even in the first scene, when the flute player didn't even come close to keying with the notes...and on and on and on).Even *if* you got past the editing, lighting, and sync problems, you're still left with a bizarre egomaniac throwing himself around on stage.No matter HOW good you think he is (and I do agree he's quite talented) it's obvious that Flatley thinks he's even better.  At the expense of the story, the cohesion, and at the expense of the viewers enjoyment, he's out to show how awesome he is.Which tells me that other than dancing, he doesn't have a lot going for him.  He kind of reminds me of Mighty Mouse... chest puffed out... "Here I come to save the dayyyyyy!!!"  I'll tell you what to save... save your money, put it as the very very last item on your internet dvd rental queue, and hope you never get to it</review_text>
I don't know what's up with all of these 4-5 star reviews. This movie was awful. There was no plot and the movie just seemed to drag. Not even the guest appearances by Afrika Bambataa, Melle Mel, and the Rock Steady Crew could save it. I couldn't wait for it to be over with. The "graffiti" throughout the movie was absolutely awful. Ramo and his girlfriend were too white to have a baby that dark with curly hair. Guy Davis was fine back then, but not anymore. Rae Dawn Chong was just annoying. This is one movie I never want to see again</review_text>
Zed (Sean Connery) hitches a ride inside of a giant, flying, stone head. Once aboard, he shoots it's occupant dead and flies off to "The Vortex", a place where the "Eternals" live. This is a land full of men and women who have no sense of what real living is all about. They just loll around, musing and pontificating about nothing. Zed spices things up for these immortal buffoons by being different and, oh yeah, by having a male organ that works! I kid you not! The rest is mainly Zed finding out that what he thought would be heaven is actually pretty dull. Unfortunately, so is this movie! John Boorman (Deliverance, Excalibur) wrote, produced, and directed this elephant tranquilizer. Although, it does get an extra star for that hilarious flying head..</review_text>
This film has been re-released as "Meltdown."  There are a few reasons for watching this movie: 1) Jet Li.  2) Chingmy Yau (the reporter).  3) Wu Ma (Frankie's dad)  4) a decent fight scene at the end.  Jacky Cheung is also not as aggravating as usual.   That's it.  Jet Li has appeared in three or four films directed by Wong Jing, and, just as Chow Yun Fat does in God of Gamblers and Jackie Chan does in City Hunter, he does what he can.  The direction of the film, however (as well as GOG and CH), stinks.  The plot copies Die Hard and Speed, with some broad satire aimed at Jackie Chan, but that is not the problem.  Put simply, Jackie Chan knows how to direct a film.  Wong Jing does not.  If you want to see Jet Li, go see Fist of Legend, Once Upon A Time in China, or just about anything else he has done.  If you want to see a good Hong Kong action movie, watch films directed by John Woo, Ringo Lam, Tsui Hark, Jackie Chan, and Sammo Hung.  Jet Li is fun to watch, but go watch everything else he has done before you get to this</review_text>
This is one of the worst movies ever! It seems to just have been an excuse for the actress and her director husband to show off her naked body</review_text>
Possibly one of the worst movies ever made, Bo and John Derek managed to massacre the Tarzan legend while wreaking cinematic havoc with this unbelievably bad waste of celluloid. Where to begin....the lousy script, the poopy cinematography, the atrocious acting....I can't think of enough adjectives to describe how putrid this actually is. As for erotic - forget it. Jane should have boffed the ape instead. Jane and papa head through the jungle, delayed by her repeated falls into the river. Despite the time period, when women were supposed to be modest, Jane doesn't seem to know what underwear is. Yeesh. I can't believe people actually paid to see this tripe. If you must watch it, rent it and save some $. You'll be glad you di</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
"Sleep with Me" would be completely worthless if not for a Quentin Tarantino cameo in which he riffs on the homosexual undertones of "Top Gun."  That lasts about two minutes.  The remainder of the film is just dull relationship philosophy spouted by pretentious, ersatz neo-Bohemian characters. Except for Tarantino's "Top Gun" bit (and the twenty seconds or so when Parker Posey has her shirt off) there's nothing worthwhile here</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
I used to think this film was okay but it's really lame. He's going home only cause he wants a car, shows you how greedy people in america are about christmas. They only care about the material goods they get out of the overrated season</review_text>
I seriously did not laugh once in this movie.  Horatio Sanz got me to crack a smile a couple times, but I can't believe I think he should have been in the movie more.  I thought Saturday Night Live was bad, I had no idea!  SNL is gold compared to this.  Every single joke falls flat and the director obviously has no clue how to make a movie.  I can't even tell if Jerry O'Connel and Jake Busey are bad actors because the director doesn't even give them a chance.  I think one thing that could have really helped this movie out would have been a script.  In case the director reads this review I want to tell him you need to have a script BEFORE shooting a film.  Just a tip.One of the worst movies I have ever seen, easily.0/</review_text>
as the director and actors of this mess should, on their skinny french knees.  Complete waste of film and your time. Not erotic, sexy (? was that actress really a woman?, was her boyfriend really a man? or visa/versa) Damned if I could tell.  And that old man who tired her up, ya think he had enough rope? The movie was as clinicial as the gyno exam she went through.  French people are not pretty, and this woman was not only NOT pretty, but she drifted through the entire movie in a coma.  Even when she got screwed she looked like she was in a fog.  Save you money and your eyeballs and buy some french fries and eat them on your porch for the same experience</review_text>
I thought, since this was a Criterion Collection flick, that it was gonna be a psychedelic, spaced-out trip through India with heavy Ravi Shankar music, incense, and flower children with bells and long hair trying to "find themselves". It was about as far away from that as anyone could get, but it was WEIRD nonetheless. Basically, it's the story of a bunch of rich white people living in India on some sort of plantation, far from the everyday realities of India itself in their luxurious palace. When I found out the plot I was immediately turned off, because I hate movies about rich white people, especially when they slum around in foreign countries ripping off the local economy through some sort of corporate pseudo-slave labor arrangement, sitting back on their plantations acting all sophisticated in white linen clothing.So anyway, the movie centers on this one white chick, Harriet, and SHE IS UGLY. Good grief, can she peel the paint off a wall. Anyhow, she's living on this plantation with her ritzy family and her one very bizarre younger brother who likes to play with his lizard or something. All of a sudden, some rich white heart-throb guy named Captain John shows up and suddenly Harriet GETS IT, her first crush, and she discovers something besides bad poetry and horses. She first visits him while he is at her neighbor's house, which strikes me as a weird sort of sexual harem because the neighbor's wife died and ever since then the neighbor apparently has the hots for a pre-pubescent Indian girl. (Ah, the elegance of foreign lands, where there are no child exploitation laws.)Anyway, Captain John is an American, a sleazy bohemian type that looks like a cross between Harry Chapin and Eraserhead. He smokes cigarettes in a very sexual manner while galavanting around town in Tommy Bahama clothing. Harriet invites him to a party at their ritzy family house (called "the big house", go figure) and after she flirts with him non-stop, he decides to go for Harriet's SISTER, Valerie, who looks like an impish Meryl Streep with a bad nose job. So, jilted by Captain John for her own sister, Harriet decides to stalk him all over the stereotypical "Indian Village" where we see all sorts of truly Indian things like cobra-charming and a marketplace where you can buy tapestries made by children enslaved in sweatshops all over India. What I noticed at this point is that Captain John looks about 30, and Harriet's like 15, but even though he's fascinated with her in a quasi-sexual way, he plays hard-to-get. In a sad development, Harriet says "I have decided to conquer him", and attempts to seduce him by reading her bad poetry, which seems to amuse him, like, "wow, I've got a 15 year-old rich white chick who thinks I'm the man". But the best part is that Valerie, who we've come to totally despise for being the Ego Princess From Hell, steals Harriet's diary and reads it aloud to Captain John (which, of course contains bad love poetry about him). So the two sisters get in an ALL OUT BRAWL right in front of this guy, and he intervenes to cop a feel with both of them while "breaking it up". Harriet then storms off, which causes Captain John to think Valerie is a bitch for reading the diary. So Valerie then "plays" with him by throwing a toy at him, which causes him to tear his hamstring, and he limps off in a hilarious scene, vowing never to hang out with her again.At this point, the movie turns really, really STRANGE. Suffice to say a THIRD girl gets involved, and good ol' Captain John starts spreading himself a little too thin, keeping 3 juvenile girls hanging as he tries to figure out which one to pop first. However, tragedy strikes as Valerie & Harriet's brother (the one with the lizard fetish) gets a little too close to a pet cobra. The sad outcome gives everyone a big wake-up-call, and everyone gets real moody. The final outcome is an anti-climactic scene where Harriet resumes her poetry-writing in a funk about failing to seduce a 30-year-old.This flick wouldn't be so bad if it weren't for the archaic screenplay, atrocious acting (even for 1950), and dull character development. I mean, it tries hard to be really "Indian", but it's about as Indian as a trip to The Bombay Company or Pier 1. Most annoyingly, the movie itself would be no more than a half-hour in length if it weren't padded with very bizarre National Geographic-style narrations about Indian culture, complete with some British voice-over chick that makes it seem like a 3rd grade social studies filmstrip. (At times I was waiting for the little "beep" to indicate where I needed to advance the frame.) The footage of India is swell, in its weird early-Technicolor restored glory, but after you get over that, the whole package strikes me as really contrived. I think of all the truly wonderful films that could stand the Criterion treatment and it makes me wonder how they arrive at the decision to bother with crap like this</review_text>
Simply not enough of Amy Weber in the film. In the scenes she was in she looked lovely, but I was hoping to see more. Anyone hoping to see Weber get down and dirty will be disappointed</review_text>
This has got to be one of the worst films I've ever seen. The characters are pointless and one-dimensional. The guy is a jerk and inspires no sympathy. They have sudden fights over apparently nothing. In fact, there is no cause-and-effect in this movie at all! Things just happen randomly for no apparent reason. There's no real story. The takes are boring; most scenes hum along endlessly making for quite boring viewing. The violent ending wasn't even believable! Instead of inspiring any kind of shock or sympathy, I was left just thinking "what the...???" Really, really pointless all around</review_text>
When I rented Twentynine Palms, I knew it would showcase Bruno Dumont's taste for dispassionate portrayals, violence of various sorts, and shock. In spite of this mental preparation, this very atmospheric film built to a grotesque resolution that left me, a seasoned viewer, rattled. Unfortunately, the shock and awe that the film achieves is short lived. Twentynine Palms is modeled on the horror film, but, like many of its American cousins, the horror it achieves failed to haunt me. The film as a whole left me with an unsettled feeling, as if a cynic had just talked my ear off.  I also had the sense that this was more about the worldview of the director, rather than the world his film creates.Sam Peckinpaw's STRAW DOGS is in ways a similar but superior film. I can admire STRAW DOGS based on its many strengths, so long as I avoid viewing it as the MAN-AS-ANIMAL fable that Peckinpaw intended. It isn't that I disagree with his view of humans as domesticated animals. I see the film as a rare example of violent drama and technical virtuosity transcending the simplicity of its maker's defense. Whether Peckinpaw has a point or not seems beside the point. Of course, the trick with any argument is in having good evidence. In pressing one's point of view, there is, almost inevitably, an artful description of a scene, one that reflects the viewer's position. In this way, films have the strange ability to create their own myths; their own arguments. To invest a film with one's views too forcibly can dull the work's independent life, its peculiar logic, with the sententiousness of fables.Watching Twentynine Palms, it seems impossible to avoid questioning Dumont's personal views. This is because so many of the events described in the film are implausible. Lacking believable characters and action, one naturally develops a sense that the director is revealing something to us that we haven't seen; something unique to his vision. If the strange behavior of the two principles was about their uniqueness and their relationship (e.g. as outsiders) then why would Dumont undercut their characterization, denying us a belief in them as individuals, or, more profoundly, as points of identification? I gradually came to view the two principles as an every-couple, with private rhythms and misunderstandings that might appear absurd if made public. This seemed like a worthy focus, but Dumont forces it to play against a theme of violence, both seen and unseen. The violent atmosphere of the film was something I couldn't account for until the resolution, and even then with difficulty.Toward the end of film, we're given a horrific equation of two orgasms: that of the male protagonist and that of his rapist, the film's principle antagonist (aside from the desert). Both orgasms are shown to be dangerous, powerful, and unspeakable (or, at least, not clearly worded). This equation discounts the context in which the orgasms occur, leaving the viewer with no reliable distinction of the protagonists from their insanely hostile environment. Clearly, the bourgeois, carefree lifestyle of the couple is set up to be cut down (a horror convention), but Dumont makes the attack personal in the most perverse way. From early in the film on, the protagonists suggest an inner horror, which is unmitigated by their lovemaking, and perhaps even feeds on their relationship. The irrationality of their environment makes the couple our most recognizable guides on this strange road trip, but they demonstrate their own measure of insanity. The male half of the couple betrays an undercurrent of sadism that eventually explodes as an act of sexualized murder. The female's deviance is less clearly defined, but there are several scenes in which she is shown inviting harm. If our trip, as it seems, is through a kind of anti-Eden, and our guides are an every-couple, with no structured identity of their own, then their deviancy would suggest a kind of universal infection, or nature, rather than an aberration of character. This would also render the criminality of the final scenes uncertain, in light of their amoral setting.Some would say that the best criterion for judging a horror film is whether it horrifies, regardless of how. This is an unsettling film. It is also an especially tasteless one. In watching this DVD, it may be useful to some viewers that Dumont can be found rationalizing his use of violence (indeed, his violence as an artist) in an interview, in a director's statement, and in the course of the film itself</review_text>
the young actor is great in this movie, but the film itself is non-exciting and a bit boring.**</review_text>
I was really disappointed with this entry even though Jason Takes Manhattan isn't much better! The DVD treatment is way to good for this film. If you want to complete the Friday series it should be seen as it does set up for the Freddy VS Jason movie.</review_text>
The Cat in the HatBy Dr. SeussBy Shawn Hinz,This book is about a talking cat and two kids. Two kid's parents are gone for the day. The furry talking cat just comes in to there house and takes over the kid's house.Sally and her brother try to talk the cat out of making the house a mess all of the things he is going to do. The cat is trying to entertain the two kids inside the house because it is raining. The cat is tall and is wearing a tall hat with stripes on it and is walking on his two feet.At the kids house the cat messes  everything up in the house while the kid's mother is gone.The more trick's the cat pulls the more the house is messed up. They did not trust the cat because he just walked through the door and takes over. But the cat has two friends and they help the cat mess up the house.People should not just let any buddy walk in there house. You need to trust people when they come in your house when your parents are not home. The mom of the two kids did not find out that the cat was in the house.The two kid's house was really messed up. The kids where thinking that to never let the cat in the house when there mom is not home or ever again. The mother of the two kids never found out that the cat was at the house and that the cat messed up the house.</review_text>
Amazon is offering a promotion where you are supposed to get a free TV show whenever you buy a DVD in Dec.  Well, they charged me for it, and I didn't really want it.  I just thought I'd try it because it was free.  There is no verification before you are charged either.  It is supposed to be free, you hit a button, and BOOM, there is a charge on your credit card.  NEVER AGAIN!!!  ..and the directions don't work, so I don't even have the "FREE" stuff I paid for</review_text>
This is the worst movie that was ever made. I'd rather move to Paris and hang out in cafes debating French politics than watch this movie again. It is so bad that it's not worth watching just out of a sense of morbid curiosity-- it is disappointing from every angle. In this case the word bad means world-class egregious waste of otherwise perfectly good blank film. I can't even force myself to describe the movie, it's not worth the effort. I don't like thinking about the movie as I write this. What I'm really concerned about are the people here who somehow found any kind of entertainment value from this movie. Are they nuts, or just the products of our modern, mindless universities? Someone needs to tell them it's time for their medicine and to stay off the Internet</review_text>
An English Teacher's review.  To my fellow educators:I have just finished spending the better part of an afternoon watching all three film versions of "Treasure Island."  I've seen the version with Charlton Heston, the one with Jack Palance and the 1950 Disney version.It is my unpleasant duty to report that a proper film of "Treasure Island" has apparently not yet been made, as all three were so abysmally bad that I was unable to finish them.What no director has yet come close to capturing, is the relentless grandeur with which the book itself unfolds, and the simple directness of Stevenson's 19th century morality tale.  Without exception, all three of these films seem to flounder in a sea of confusion about what this book should actually be; and none of them seem to have even the tiniest jot of the kind of vision displayed by classic illustrators such as Wythe.Again and again with each film, someone seems to have made the decision that the story exactly as told by Stevenson apparently wouldn't be interesting enough or exciting enough for the big screen.  What I really want to know is if any of these directors actually READ the book, or had a personal relationship with it?  I find it hard to believe that they did, since the films all give the impression of slapdash commercialism or outright confusion about what the book actually is.Jim Hawkins is living quietly with his parents in a seaside inn, when the Captain shows up with his sea chest and a mysterious fear of "a seafaring man with one leg."  The Captain should be tall, mysterious, powerful and terrifying.  In two of these films, he seems to be played by short wrinkled winos; and in the third by some middle-aged guy who is apparently married to the lighting director's sister.  It only gets worse from there.The tragedy of the Captain is that he is still physically vigorous and imposing at the start of the book - but Stevenson is bringing a doom to him that will shatter even the English oak of his adamant constitution - the combined forces of rum, terror and stroke.The Captain's fate - to fall dead of a "thundering apoplexy" on the floor of the inn, forshadows the essential purpose of Stevenson's novel - to illustrate that a life of bloodthirsty avarice and short-sighted greed leads only to an ignominious death.  In the guise of a boy's adventure story, Stevenson pursues this deeper moral with a terrible purpose and with great dignity and power.  His pirate characters are not comic or lighthearted.  They are not caricatures.  They are not the wax mannequins of a Disney ride; they are real men with fears and desires and second thoughts; even with regrets.  They do not dance or traipse merrily through this story - they grimace and battle through it, gritting their teeth against the death, (from violence, sickness, treachery or rum,) that is always staring them in their faces.  Jim Hawkins' innocence and youth is the perfect foil for the pirates' hard-bitten cynicism and gold-lust.  It is no accident that, despite the courage and resourcefulness of the cabin party, (led by Captain Smollett,) it is still only Jim Hawkins' youthful optimism and curious spirit that ultimately saves them from "death at the hands of the pirates."  Stevenson is alluding to the biblical command to "be like the little children in order to be saved."To tell this story properly, it must be told absolutely straight, and with the same committed earnestness with which Stevenson tells it.  None of these films is that brave.To make a film that is faithful to Stevenson's moral, the director will need more courage and simplicity of purpose than we find in all three of these films combined.  Those of us who love and understand the novel for what it is must continue to hope for a film that does it justice.</review_text>
Dreadful - even the actors looked embarrassed. The only part worth seeing was the swearing autoteller. Other directors of dogs like this have the sense to save themselves shame by hiding behind the Alan Smithee psuedonym - what a pity Mr. King didn't. Just awful</review_text>
If you were hoping for a skin flick, this is not it.  A couple of minutes of long shots of the young girls swimming topless and one real nice look at Julie McCullouh (...), in bed, is not enough too qualify.  The acting is awful.  Angie looks great for her age.  Still not enough</review_text>
The Dane Cook episode is the same one that it on his "Harmful If Swallowed" c.d. The c.d. also has the uncensored version of this routine that is over 1 hour long. The one star rating is not based on the content. It is based upon Amazon not sharing this fact with customers</review_text>
My favorite show of the Trek series but there's no way I'd buy another individual program from Amazon.  It will ONLY play on their downloaded player ...won't burn to DVD so can't play it on my television.  Don't bother buying this ...just go for the Trek collection on DVD</review_text>
i think the newer version "the love affair" with Warren Beatty/Annette Benning better.</review_text>
A totally awesome movie when it was first released, Hawaii is based on the James A. Michener bestseller. Even at three hours plus, it still had to leave a lot of Michener's novel untouched, but the basic idea is still there. The breathtaking cinematography adds to it, as does an outstanding Elmer Bernstein score. Then there's the acting by the stars, Max Von Sydow as the missionary who goes to Hawaii to preach to the natives, and brings his own brand of religion with him. Julie Anderws is outstanding in a rare non-singing role as his wife. Richard Harris is excellent as the sea captain who is amazed that the preacher's wife turns out to be an old girlfriend.The supporting characters are just as memoriable, with an actual islander playing the queen, and also an unknown playing Keoki.All in all, take Hawaii complete, or don't take it at all. Wait until the complete version comes out on DVD. I rated it one star because of the cuts, but it is a five-star movie in its complete version</review_text>
Even though fans of HK cinema have as a whole come a long way since HK films were generally only seen in the states on Saturday afternoon television, some studios are still refusing to provide buyers with the option of seeing HK films in their original language with subtitles.  This film is available from Columbia Tristar only in a dubbed format, and for that reason I won't be getting the Region 1 release of this film</review_text>
This film stinks. It gives B scifi a bad name -- even makes those Roger Corman movies look stunning. If possible, I would give it a negative rating to balance the positive reviews seen here. If you want cornball underwater action, buy &quot;Voyage to the Bottom of the Sea.&quot; Provided that your cerebral cortex is active, you'll agree it's a zillion times better</review_text>
We have a lawman who for no explained reason starts to investigate the cause of death of a man with 500,000 on him and it all goes down hill from there. There is no rhyme or reason to the story. I gave it two stars because the landscape is great</review_text>
Well, I had to succumb.  I was attracted to this alleged film by it's notoriety as possibly the worst film ever made and a few of my friends who told me it was not that bad.  My low expectations for it were not only met but were exceeded.  This film reaches new cinematic depths.  It's complete ineptitude lacks even the charm of "Plan 9 from Outer Space."  It's stabs at humor are beyond pathetic they're just desperate.  Tom Green has to rank as the most unappealing screen presence, ever!  I felt sorry momentarily for accomplished actors like Rip Torn and Julie Hagerty who signed onto this dross but, hey, they cashed the checks.  Watching a few minutes of this slop is painful.  Enduring the full length of the film is outright masochistic.  To get the stench of this swill out of my consciousness I'm going to have to watch an actual good movie, like "Showgirls"</review_text>
While there has never been a completely factual account of the life of Wyatt Earp ("Tombstone" comes the closest), this film is completely fictional. First, Wyatt isn't even married in this version, and he becomes enamored with a woman named Clementine; thus the title. Doc Holliday was a dentist, but in this film, he is a surgeon who operates on a wounded bargirl he loves.As a piece of Western Fiction, this film would be alright, but since it was decided to use the names Wyatt Earp, Doc Holliday and the OK Corral, the entire project is distracting. The only accurate facts in this film, are that there was a Wyatt Earp, a Doc Holliday and an OK Corral. If it wasn't for the excellent performances of Henry Fonda, and especially, Walter Brennen, I would have given this film one star</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
It's not just that If lucy Fell is a bad film. 90% of what comes out of Hollywood is uninspired, formulaic dross just like it, and usually you can just shrug it off and forget about it. What makes this movie memorably, remarkably bad is writer/director/star Eric Schaeffer's nauseatingly immense sense of self-regard, which arises from every frame like the stench of yesterday's roadkill. The mere fact that the photogenically-challenged Mr. Schaeffer should have the likes of Elle MacPherson tell him he's "cute" speaks volumes</review_text>
Ok, so I am not a big vampire movie fan, so maybe that had something to do with the fact that I thought this movie sucked. But I am always open minded to all sorts of films, so I thought I would give this one a whirl. It started out with some potential, but within the first 20 minutes I knew it was going to be hopeless. I should have just turned the darned thing off. It was so unrealistic (ok, I know it's a vampire movie, so what did I expect) but I just didn't believe that the main character (Kerr) would have done the things he ended up doing thru out the movie. And then the girl (Izabella Miko) who had about 8 lines in the movie; that was just lame and pointless. She must have felt like such a loser telling people, yeah, I'm in this movie "The Forsaken", and I'm in it almost the entire time...but....ahhh....well just call me zombie girl. Anyways, I highly recommend a pass on this one, unless you are a complete vampire fanatic</review_text>
This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence</review_text>
I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
Three years after the first mortal kombat film, fans couldn't wait for Annihilation to come out. Unfortunately, the sequel did not do well at the box office and after viewing it, I can see why. First, I will start with what is positive about the movie. Kitana had more of a role as did Jax, I preferred Sandra Hess as Sonya a little over Bridget Wilson even though she did a good job with Sonya's character in the first movie, some of the fight scenes (Jax vs. Cyrax, Sonya vs. Mileena, Liu Kang vs. Baraka, Sub-Zero vs. Scorpion) were sequenced good, the dvd bonus features were nice, and the soundtrack was awesome. These positive aspects, however, could not save the overall film from disappointment. So what went wrong? Like the first MK, Annihilation attempted to blend two mortal kombat games into one movie (mortal kombat 3 and ultimate mortal kombat 3). Unlike the first MK, however, the blend was not successful. Too many characters were put into the movie and therefore the character development for most of them was almost non-existent. Aside from that, only three of the actors to my knowledge returned from the previous movie though it is understandable why the other actors did not return. What else went wrong with this sequel? Some of the acting was either over-the-top and/or downright pitiful. Shao Kahn's character along with Raiden's character was poorly resembled. Also, some of the characters didn't even get much screen time at all. One flaw that is immediately noticed at the beginning of the movie is that one of the main characters gets killed off (I won't say who because it is probably obvious). While some of the fight sequences were good, most of them were rushed and some were just flat-out ridiculous. This goes double for the animality sequence. Sadly, MK Annihilation doesn't rank up with the first one. Despite all this, there is some good news. After eight long years of waiting, a third mortal kombat film will hit the big screen with most of the actors returning from the first movie. Plus, the third installment will not only kontinue where the first left off but will also ignore the events of Annihilation</review_text>
Mortal Kombat: Annihilation is one of those films that is so bad that it actually HURTS to watch it.From the nearly complete recast of almost all of the characters (odd, considering that in interviews after the first movie, all of them said they'd want/ be willing to come back for a sequel), to the horrible (even by 1997 standards) CG effects, to the cliched fight scenes (gee...two women in a mud pit.  I bet it took them all night to come up with that one), virtually everything that could have gone wrong with this movie DID go wrong with this movie.Loosely based on the story of the Mortal Kombat 3 video game (and set immediately after the first movie, which, while not great, looks like Citizen Kane compared to this stinkburger), the movie set about the lofty goal of depicting Shao Khan (played by Brian Thompson, the alien bounty hunter from The X-Files) and his army (shown in most scenes as a small band of extras.  Oooh...scary.) as they attempt to take over Earth by merging it with the alternate dimension known as Outworld.  This merging of realms will result in the destruction of humanity.With only a week to do anything about it, Lord Raiden (played by James Remar, replacing the, and I can't believe I'm saying this, much better Christopher Lambert in the role) once again enlists the help of Liu Kang (Robin Shou), Sonia Blade (Sandra Hess), and Princess Kitana (Talisa Soto), along with help from a select few other characters from the video games' crowded lineup, to prevent this from happening.The story in and of itself is not necessarily bad.  However, given the film's obviously low budget the weak screenplay, the loss of most of the excellent cast from the first film, and most jarringly, direction even more inept than that of Paul W.S. Anderson, it quickly becomes clear that they set their sights too high, only to have practically everything come crashing down.The only saving grace of this film is its killer soundtrack, featuring an updated version of the theme created for the first movie, as well as music by KMFDM, Megadeth, Rammstein, Juno Reactor, and others.If ever you're looking to punish yourself for something, then by all means watch this movie.  However, if you actually like yourself and want to remain on good terms with yourself, you will avoid this movie like the plague.  Believe me, you'll thank yourself later.</review_text>
There is an interesting comparison to be made between Ingmar Bergman's classic "The Virgin Spring" and the grisly exploitation shocker it inspired, "Last House on the Left" by Wes Craven.  They share identical plots, feature graphic rape scenes, and before it's all over turn average men into murderers.  And yet one is considered to be a bona fide classic and 1961's Oscar-winning Best Foreign Film--and the other appreciated only in underground circles, but largely reviled as cheap gruesome exploitation.So just how different are they?  Not as different as you might imagine--but as different as art and exploitation."The Virgin Spring" is easily one of Bergman's most accessible films.  Telling a simple story in a straightforward fashion, he exposes a frankness and brutality people weren't accustomed to seeing.  A young girl venturing through the woods encounters two men and a boy.  Though they initially seem helpful, their actions quickly become violent.  After a graphic (for the time) rape, the girl is murdered.  Later, the wrongdoers happen upon the girl's home and seek shelter from her family--both groups unaware of who the other is.  Suspicions start to arise and vengeance is sought.It is a powerful tale of love, loss and the depths people can be driven into--where they become unable to stop themselves from betraying their faith and moral code, where savagery and rage take over.  Bergman's film benefits greatly from a stellar lead performance by Max von Sydow as the father.  Real conflict and raw emotion burn up the screen.  Add the beautiful cinematography and haunting score and it's a winning combination.  But what endures in the story of "The Virgin Spring" is how strong a component faith becomes--when there is nothing left to believe in, can you still believe?  A classic in every sense, "The Virgin Spring" still has the power to shock but there's something very redemptive about the film."Last House on the Left," however, is probably more notorious than acclaimed.  The plot, as I've said, is identical.  Coming 12 years later, in 1972, Wes Craven was at the beginning of his career and sought to retell this tale.  It is a shocker, and the scenes of rape and murder clearly foreshadow the "torture cinema" of today.  It is brutal, uncompromising and graphic--and the film was championed in the underground horror market.Working with a small budget, the film lacks the artistry of "The Virgin Spring."  While it still packs a visceral punch and has the power to shock--what it lacks is depth and subtlety.  The characters aren't particularly drawn out so their actions don't have the emotional resonance of the earlier film.  Without contemplating faith and moral choices, what we're left with is straightforward revenge.  And the film, ultimately, has no redemption--no uplift.  It's violence for the sake of violence.  It remains a historically significant precursor and influence on other shock films without being a particularly good movie in it's own right.And therein lies the difference between art and exploitation.   KGHarris, 11/06</review_text>
I'm a firm believer in freedom of speech, but honestly this movie was disgusting without any redeeming qualities. The product description listed above is completely misleading. It's basically a movie in which the abusers abuse and degrade their victims, and then at the end they slowly torture them to death. Pretty much the worst movie I have ever seen</review_text>
I just want to let potential marketplace buyers of SALO that the seller: closeoutgoods and other Amazon marketplace sellers are selling pirated (bootlegged) editions of this movie and other Criterion DVDs. If Amazon were legitimate, they would ban these marketplace sellers from their website. Every potential buyer should report these crooks to the FBI and Criterion</review_text>
I found this movie to be a fascinating story about the trauma that can be caused to those we love when we allow our fantasies and daydreaming to interfere with our actual lives. I was constantly wondering where I would draw the line if I was the heroine. The experience allowed me to visualize the mayhem that could be caused by to much fantasy/daydreaming</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
A number of people had told me that this was a very good war movie and one that should be viewed as soon as possible.  Honestly, I was not impressed.  The plot is disjointed and confusing; jumping from the North African Theatre to the European Theatre almost seamlessly, leaving the viewer thoroughly confused.  The character development is also very poor.  No one character stands out due to the fact that Samuel Fuller never allows them to grow or mature by switches between multiple characters too frequently or by not allowing any lengthy dialogue.  Historically speaking this film is a joke.  During the action scenes when the Germans have tanks they are in fact American tanks with the German symbol painted on.  Also, uniforms are sometimes inaccurate.  However, the most annoying aspect is the fact that Samuel Fuller makes it appear as though this squad of men is the ONLY squad fighting the entire war.  Only once or twice do you see any other American troops.  This feeling of isolation detracts from the overall sense of a full scale war, of which these men are supposed to be a part of.  Finally, to make matters worse, the film's action sequences are sometimes imaginative but are often impractical, sloppy, awkwardly placed, and consist of ridiculous situations.Overall this movie was too long, lacked character development for most of the movies characters, was disjointed, and was historically inaccurate.  For a movie that garnered so much hype I was expecting much, much more.</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
Given high acclaims this film has collected over time, I was glad to pick up a VHS copy at my local library sale.  Began to watch it last night.  I was able to sit thru the part 1.  When the tape ended, I was actually glad. I felt a sense of acomplishment in finishing the part 1!  The movie is DREARY to the max.  People portrayed are irrational, lost, uncommunicative, and subject to random and cruel violence by soldiers and rulers.  In some way, this movie reminded me of the dreary winter (lasting 6 months!) I spent in Russia a couple of years ago...To me, the movie reflects the psychological breakdown that happened after the decades long terror policy of Soviet state (1920-1956).  For survivors, nothing made any sense anymore, except perhaps fear and evil, as people in this dreary film reflects.  People have been already destroyed in their souls.  They are psychologically shattered beyond repair and only occasional readings of the Bible verses give them any sense of permanence in their chaotic daily experience.Maybe that is the real meaning of this movie.  To really reflect what happened to people's psyche after Lenin and Stalin's UNLIMITED TERROR, they found a parallel in Mongol's devastation and oppression of medieval Russia.  In both cases, people were left shattered, helpless, irrational, withdrawn,  and autistic.</review_text>
Don't know about anyone else, but the DVD I purchased had lousy video.  The only good shots were of closeups and sometimes it took the cameraman a few seconds to focus on a number of the shots. All of the long distance shots were grainy and not clear and the medium range shots were not good either. I know the concert was indoors, but I've seen other indoor videos that did not have this problem.  Did I get a bad DVD or did anyone else have this problem</review_text>
If you want erotica then this isn't the Emanuelle film for you.  Yes, there are a couple of so-so love scenes, but the one lesbian scene is pratically non-existent, and the obvious focus of this one is the blood and gore content.  I expected more erotic content, and instead got mostly gruesome scenes that I didn't particularly expect.  Remember that scene in &quot;Tarzan the Ape Man&quot; where a nude Bo Derek was tied up and bathed by native women?  That scene was erotic.  Nothing like that one this video</review_text>
I can't understand the good reviews given by others to this movie. Frankly, I thought it was a dog.Not to say that it had no redeeming features - the friendship between the young girl and the lawn man was endearing, if improbable. And the girl herself was a real sweetie, and a good actress - perfect for the part. In fact, the acting all around was admirable.But the script! Yikes! Not a single character in the whole movie - with the partial exceptions of the two protagonists - had any motivation for anything they did. People acting awkward or mean (in fact, just about everyone in the movie other than said two was mean), or spiteful, or stupid, for no reason at all!It seems as though somehow, the movie could have been good, but didn't make it. Call it almost watchable.I came away from Lawn Dogs (Yawn Dogs?) feeling not at all enriched. Puzzled, perhaps, at why anyone would make such a movie. Well, there was that admirable, unlikely friendship. But that was all.Pass this one by</review_text>
Good cast, adaptation of King Lear. Don't bother unless you are really bored</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
this movie sucks it sucks donkey balls. If you enjoyed this movie you should be shot you should be shot in the head. DIE YOU EVIL FANS OF THIS HORRIBLE MOVIE. Who the hell would put the time, money and effort into such a peice of junk. I suggest that everyone who was involved in the making of this &quot;movie&quot; should be rounded up and sent to consentration camps. I think this is the major problems of this world. This movie is the reason war exists. This movie is the reason people hate each other. please read this review and never watch that peice of crap</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
As a frequent visitor to the Himalayas and being closely in touch with both Tibetans (ordinary folks, not the tortured ones) and the Chinese, I find this documentary interesting but terribly one-sided. I have not met a single wealthy Tibetan in Nepal or India, who can swear to me that he will return to a freed Tibet, run by their government in exile.To be fair to the "experts", a lot of the evidence of Chinese violence against the Tibetans is real. I sincerely feel sorry for them and wish that they could somehow be compensated. However, the documentary gets emotive and it seems bent on presenting the situation in Tibet entirely from the viewpoint of the activists and other victims of Chinese aggression.While it is true that many Tibetans suffered and died during the invasion and subsequent crushing of riots that erupted from time to time, it is unfair to assume that the soldiers and police were the only ones responsible for the deaths and injuries. Were there no looters, vandals, infighting? If you had ever witnessed these riots, would you think that more people might have been hurt or killed had the soldiers not opened fire?It's also incredibly naive to assume that all Tibetans think the same. Even Dharamsala, the seat of the Tibetan government in exile is not without opposition, violence and even assasination. While I do think that most Tibetans are good Buddhists and nice people, the documentary seems to associate everything sinful with the Chinese and everything saintly with the Tibetans. This is something I find totally unacceptable.A few snapshots of Tibetan mobs welcoming the delegates from exile tell us nothing. The documentary seems only able to find Tibetans who are against Chinese rule. They paint the picture that nobody in Tibet is happy. This is patently untrue. But then, this sort of thing sells in America. You have to have a demon, you have to have a damsel in distress and you must have the hero (America in this case). Otherwise, it just won't sell. It's not about compassion at all.If you really want to be "illuminated", visit Tibet and Tibetan communities all over China and see things for yourself. That would be far more enlightening. Sadly, many journalists prefer to interview the wrong (right?) people in order to get a sensational story that will pay for the rent</review_text>
I was aniticpatng a riveting documentary... After reading some books on Tibet, I thought this documentary would be especially enlightening. I found it to be slow paced, repetitive and thin on factual information (factual history and an intelligent logical supportable case for the Tibetan side of the Chinese invasion/occupation) and heavy on "experiences and testimonials" of certain Tibetans. The bit about "the American's abandoned us" was un-necessary and somewhat of a turn off. Not that this man felt abandoned (I have the utmost compassion for his experiences), but rather that the editors of this piece opted to include his comments along side the "evil communist Chinese" bits. Overall, this documentary of the Tibetan experience is too heavy on the emotionally charged (I did cry at one point), too repetitive (frankly, it gets boring), and too thin on (non emotionally charged) information.</review_text>
This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation</review_text>
I purchased this movie for my 7 year old twin boys birthday thinking that because it said the rating was PG that it would be fine.  Also, the market for Transformers is huge with boys their age and the toys being sold everywhere.  Wow, were we hugely surprised to hear curse words on this cartoon movie.  These were not just words like shoot or dang, but the real deal.  I remember Transformers when I was growing up and I certainly do not remember their being foul language in the cartoons.  I am going to take this matter up with higher management and at least get my money back and try find out what they were thinking.  Who knows what the rating will end up being for the upcoming movie at the box office.Concerned in Alabam</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
Why, oh why do you advertise the 1979 version of Crime & Punishment with John Hurt, using the pictures from the 2002 version starring the sublime John Simm. I would download the 2002 version all day, everyday but the misleading pictures are really unfair. Either offer me the version I want, or get the pictures right</review_text>
This title is the bootleg title for a film called the The Ratings Game. I'm no sure why Amazon is selling this on their web site.The quality of this DVD is terrible, I was suspicious when I got it. The DVD caseand the DVD itself look like they were home made.Having said all this, knockoff or not this is a bad film with a lot of big names in it.It's like they were trying to make something campy and failed big time. I expected more of Danny DeVito.</review_text>
I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..</review_text>
interesting story line but shallow and goes nowhere.  kubrick style drawn out and paced shots are unimaginative, poorly composed, and add little or nothing to the experience.  looks like the ending is just a contrivance to exit a lost story line. i've lived in rural japan and it's the most boring place on earth (perhaps the intent here but hardly something you'd pay money to suffer thru or for masochists only), you dont think the younger generations flee to the cities for no reason at all</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
Haven't read the book, so can't compare, but  The Relic on film is simply pathetic. Yes, it's a monster movie. The problem is, this movie is no better than most of its genre, and worse than some. The monster looks like a refugee from one of the Star Wars episodes. The acting and dialogue are terrible. What a yawner!</review_text>
The movie Like It Is, directed by Paul Oremland, has to deal with a boxer/fighter Craig (Steve Bell) as a guy who is trying to crawl out from the fighting life he is in. Craig meets Matt (Ian Rose) who is a band manager/record producer who takes a romantic interest in Craig and the two head off to London. It is in London that trouble begins to unravel the relationshi as Matt's boss tries to split the two up. The movie wraps up with Matt trying to get Craig back before their relationship is doomed.Both Steve Bell and Ian Rose do a decent job of acting in spite of the terrible script that is so disjointed by terrible editting and poor scene transition. There really is nothing new in this film: drugs run rampart, pretty boys litter the set, and sleazy gritty characters are plentiful. In addition, the fight scenes make you wince with how fake it come across. The lack of character development doesn't fully connect the viewer and the drama happening to the characters in the story, thus by the time half the movie is done you really don't care if Craig and Matt get together or not. The only glimmer of promise in this movie was the techno soundtrack which was fairly funky and enjoyable. Finally, when the movie comes to an abrupt end, Like It Is seems more like a recipe on what a movie shouldn't be</review_text>
This movie is great if you want to go to sleep and you ran out of boring books. Ethan Hawke leans to heavily on Kris Kristofferson's performances not to mention Jeff Tweedy's music. As a matter of fact the only gleaming light in the movie is the music. It is written interestingly enough, but the visuals look like there wasn't enough money in the budget to clean up the cheap video that it was shot on. The best way to watch this movie is in the background. You don't need the visuals, and if you dare watch them you will get dreary eyed and fade away</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
Following Orson Welles' fascinating yet tantalizing career can be frustrating for the aficionado.  So much of his oeuvre remains hidden from view that each discovery from the archives is greeted with an inordinate amount of enthusiasm.  Take this intriguing yet relatively disappointing collection of documentaries Welles directed for British TV in the 1950s."The missing link in Welles' work," exults the snapcase boilerplate.  This is a bit of an overstatement, given that far more significant works haven't seen the light of day ("Don Quixote" and "The Other Side of the Wind," to name a couple). The documentaries do help to fill the gap in Welles' output for the 1950s, a decade in which he directed only three feature films.  "Around the World" is a good quality DVD and unquestionably the work of Welles, but a ultimately a shadow of what he was capable of.The five episodes on this DVD explore various aspects of European Culture.  Welles takes his camera in search of Basque country, Spanish bullfights, the idiosyncratic denizens of Paris' St Germain des Pres, and the loquacious and venerable Chelsea Pensioners.  The "St Germain des Pres" episode best typifies the offbeat subject matter.  Welles spends most of his time interviewing a commune dweller who makes his own clothes.  After that, Welles dashes through the town, capturing glimpses of celebrities like Jean Cocteau and Eddie Constantine ("Lemmy Caution"), before discovering a group of "Letterists" who are dedicated to (you guessed it) inventing new letters.Unfortunately, Welles' typically low budget and the nature of the subject matter limit his range of cinematic expression.  Despite the exotic and obscure locales, most of the footage consists of relatively static interviews, captured in long takes with obligatory reaction shots of Welles inserted to break up the monotony.  Even the bullfight episode lacks the dynamic footage one might expect; Welles' camera is grounded in the stands, preventing him from getting involved in the action.  Only towards the end of "St. Germain des Pres" and in the second Basque episode does Welles get inventive, developing the active, swirling camera style he employed in films like "Mr. Arkadin."Like a record that's worth owning for one or two songs, "Around the World with Orson Welles" does have one episode that justifies its purchase: the second Basque episode.  True, the first few minutes repeat the introduction from the first Basque show, but after that Welles has a lot of fun interviewing kids playing 'pelote' (a game similar to jai alai).  Welles gets his camera into the pelote action, and seems rejuvenated by the subject matter. An 11-year old boy joins Welles and acts as a tour guide for the rest of the show.  The episode ends dramatically, with Welles quoting a Basque aphorism against a night sky lit by fireworks.For a better example of Welles' creativity in the documentary genre, check out his 1974 essay film, "F for Fake," just released on DVD.  "Around the World with Orson Welles" is a far more pedestrian effort, but it does give Welles fans something to look at while they await the more significant releases that are hopefully on the not-too-distant horizon</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
A number of people had told me that this was a very good war movie and one that should be viewed as soon as possible.  Honestly, I was not impressed.  The plot is disjointed and confusing; jumping from the North African Theatre to the European Theatre almost seamlessly, leaving the viewer thoroughly confused.  The character development is also very poor.  No one character stands out due to the fact that Samuel Fuller never allows them to grow or mature by switches between multiple characters too frequently or by not allowing any lengthy dialogue.  Historically speaking this film is a joke.  During the action scenes when the Germans have tanks they are in fact American tanks with the German symbol painted on.  Also, uniforms are sometimes inaccurate.  However, the most annoying aspect is the fact that Samuel Fuller makes it appear as though this squad of men is the ONLY squad fighting the entire war.  Only once or twice do you see any other American troops.  This feeling of isolation detracts from the overall sense of a full scale war, of which these men are supposed to be a part of.  Finally, to make matters worse, the film's action sequences are sometimes imaginative but are often impractical, sloppy, awkwardly placed, and consist of ridiculous situations.Overall this movie was too long, lacked character development for most of the movies characters, was disjointed, and was historically inaccurate.  For a movie that garnered so much hype I was expecting much, much more.</review_text>
"Cyrano" is one of the greatest verse plays ever written.Unfortunately Gerard Depardieu is no Cyrano.  He's a great, clumsy side of beef, not a shining flame encased in the middleweight body of Hercule Sevanien Cyrano de Bergerac.  With the best will in the world, his performance seldom achieves adequacy and never brilliance.The English translation was especially commissioned for this film.  It is undistinguished, prosy and dull.  It has little of the wit and less of the poetry of the old standard translation commissioned in the 1920s by the great American actor Walter Passmore.Get the Jose Ferrer version.  This one's a dog</review_text>
B Grade movie, really poor script.Bulk of movie is boring, superficial, stereotypical.Real purpose of movie is Baptist condemnation of the supernatural.Story line.The wife of a couple deeply in love dies in a boating accident during a beachhouse visit. The husband feels a deep loss for two years during which he is frequently visited by the ghost of the wife.On the second anniversary of the accident relatives and friends gather at the beachhouse and push the husband to come to grips with his grief and refocus his energy to move on with his life.Overtones.The leading man is depicted as unstable, self-centered, reckless, irresponsible, and fantasy-prone.before and during the two year period. When revealed to the those assembled, the spirit contact with his wife is universally condemned. His "giving up the ghost" is seen as a great relief and the first sign of maturity he has displayed in his life.The daughter has dream sequence with the mother in which the mother coaxes her into a head-on crash with a car.leaving her frightened and distraught.Media Messages.The film illustrates the creation and reinforcement of a cultural taboo.1. Spirit contact is dangerous, selfish, and emotionally unhealthy.2. The personal grieving journey of another should be co-opted by peers.3. Condemnation is the only acceptable response to spirit contact. There should be no expression of curiosity or investigation like "What did she look like?" "What kinds of things did she say?"4. Messages from loved ones in dreams should not be trusted.In short the movie creates a set of automatic responses all of which mitigate against a common sense acceptance and appreciation of the value of spirit contact with loved ones..In life our conduct is about building bonds of love and trust with those around us. In passing over these ties endure and can be building blocks for a link to the beyond. When William Blake's brother passed, he appeared and taught the skill engraving thus providing humanity for centuries thereafter with icons known to all.Many near-death experiencers have wisely learned that they must keep their wisdom to themselves. The inner teachings are sacred and must not be diluted and defiled by small minds. The same is true for after-death communications largely because of media images that create a cultural storyline like that in this film</review_text>
There is a reason there are 247 used ones of this book.We used this book in for our men's study group and every one of the men, and every one of the wives agreed, that this was a worthless book.  It was written for a 1950's wife that no longer exists.Now 3 truly wonderful books to help you with your wife are:Discovering the Mind of a Woman by Ken NairIf Only He Knew by Gary SmalleyTogether Forever: How to Overcome Problems and Rekindle the Love in Your Marriageby Anne Kristin CarrollThey are truly inspirational as to how to be a good husband</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
I brought this movie a couple of days ago and I was very very very disappointed. Don't waste your money on this movie</review_text>
This has already been expressed here in the reviews, but just as a reminder one more time..... this DVD is NOT the original version.  The original version has more material and is much better.  Hopefully someday they'll release an Unrated Version the way it was on VHS at one time.</review_text>
I originally read the novel (of which I assume most of the other reviewers are unaware) and watched the earlier German film of the same name for a college course entitled "Memory and Mourning in Post-War Germany."I'd just like to point out that the film is a horrible depiction of the novel. It seems that the director wanted to make a more "Hollywood" version of the film, and I think he succeeded. For instance, the entire ending is completely different from that of the novel, and in my opinion is completely wrong for the story.In general, the film has little to do with any of the original versions, and is far inferior</review_text>
I was a big fan of the ST1. The plot and characters were excellent, it rated up there with the best of them I would give ST1 5 stars. I saw this was on sale for a great price so I got it expecting great things. Usually sequels aren't to par with the originals so I at least expeted a 3-star movie. When i flipped on the movie i said "WOW....right where they left off" at a pretty good battle seen with the BUGS. Well, that was it I was waiting for more action. I waited....I waited...I waited and I waited...they made the plot intersting with occasional nudity but it still wasn't worth it. I don't know who's idea it was for the sequel but I hope this was their last one. I'll stick with the new Battlestar Galactic and Star Trek reruns</review_text>
one of the most pretentious and exaggerating movies ever seen. the dialogue, the acting...whatever, all suck big time. everything in this movie looked unrealistic, not funny but pathetically pretentious and exaggerating to the extreme. that kinda performance would have won an oscar, yeah, right, maybe just because there were only worse pictures nominated in that year. what a hype</review_text>
I did not like this movie. I know that times have changed and it would be revisionist to hold this movie to millennium standards of sexual conduct and infidelity. Nonetheless, I found it very disturbing: his lack of concern for his wife and children, how the wife was unsympathetic and one dimensional, and how absolutely de rigueur it was in the sixties for married men to have "a bit on the side." And what about her kids? apart from the first scene we never see them again; she instead seems to spend all her time cooking and keeping house for a married man. I'm not a prude, really, but this film left a bad taste in my mouth</review_text>
Except for two cuties: William Zabka and Dana Ashbrook! Especially Dana who constantly having a hard-on</review_text>
THE TRANSFORMERS gets my vote as the worst movie of the 1980's.  It pains me to say this for I am a fan of the series.  It was a travesty to see Optimus Prime (the greatest of the Transformers) fall in battle and pass on the Matrix of Leadership to a successor (Rodimus Prime) who proved incapable of leadership.  Galvatron was a pathetic reincarnation of Megatron--he lacked the malevolent cunning of Megatron and behaved like a raving lunatic.  Why would a Decepticon warrior follow him into battle?  As for the new generations of Autobots and Decepticons introduced in the movie, they were forgettable.It amuses me that "fans" are raving about the movie now yet they did not pay to see the movie when it was released twenty years ago.  THE TRANSFORMERS failed at the box office and I am glad it did.  As a fan, I was insulted.  Perhaps these other "fans" have allowed nostalgia to blind them to the ugly truth of this outrage.</review_text>
This movie is my favorite movie. Ever. I feel terrible giving it two stars. But it gets 2 stars because I am comparing it to the Rhino version, which I also own. I also own the original VHS. I have watched this movie at least once a year since I was 8 except for about 6 years in middle school/HS. I can sit in class and watch it from memory in my head.BUY THE RHINO VERSION.If you can't find the Rhino version, this isn't half bad. Its just that that version is much better, and since I have been growing up with older copies, the new one's flaws, minor to the newcomer, are blinding to me. I also am physically unable to watch any of the "Special Edition" Star Wars because of those changes, if that gives a clue to my movie anality.BUY THE RHINO VERSION IF YOU CAN FIND IT.One complaint is that the VHS had this cool "glitter" effect in a couple of scenes involving energon and Unicron internals. It is present in the VHS, It came out wrong in the Rhino version, and was totally gone in the 20th. Thanks for deleting part of my childhood.In comparison to the Rhino version:The remaster is terrible. Mine seems to flicker and have strange artifacts. The colors are totally off. Hot Rod is basically magenta/pink instead of red and his orange is not orange like an orange, it is orange like a cheaply made basketball.Widescreen is fake. It is a cut fullscreen. I wish you weren't such a liar, Sony.Cover art: D-. No detail. Looks like whoever does the new show drew it in an afternoon or two. The matrix looks like a honeydew. It would have got an F but Prime is on there.Very few of the extras were worth it. I bought this for the remaster, hoping for some clean up and a restoration of the glitter effect, and they weren't there</review_text>
'Clownhouse' is mainly associated with a sex scandal involving the director and the youngest boy actor. While hearing of Salva's conviction when 'Jeepers Creepers' came out, I never knew it had anything to do with this movie, nor had I ever heard of this in the first place. I actually stumbled upon this looking to see if there was a horror movie involving clowns besides 'It', and came across this weird little 'Halloween'-like suspense tale. While the sex scandal never once popped into my head (except when there was a pointless and gratuitous butt shot of the kid), I still didn't care for this too much, despite its pluses.Like 'Halloween', this film relies on suspense rather than gore to creep people out, but sadly, it didn't really get to me. If I was about 9 or so, this would've scared the hell out of me. I'm not saying I hated this; it was all right and had some geniune chills and some fantastic images, but because you see who the clowns are before they find the house and start terrorizing the children, it lost some effect for me. I would have liked it better if I had no idea what was going on, and it would've been a creepier experience.Horror movie fans should like this, even though I personally thought it would be better. The atmosphere is very, very creepy, and the clowns are actually pretty terrifying in their own way, but it just didn't do it for me. Rent it first</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
anyone who thinks this is a good transfer must be daft.  in addition as was mentioned earlier 11 minutes have been cut and as i remember the film they were some of the "best" scenes if you get my drift.  if you want to see the original film this is not it.  avoid at all costs</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
I reviewed the subtle subversiveness of the Sinatra version in an earlier issue. How does the update stand up?Well, once they moved the setting to Iraq, cleaned up the muddy surrealism, sobered up the star, and played it straight, there was absolutely no subtlety whatsoever to the political message. Like dropping a bowling ball on a birthday cake. Or Chinese cinema. "We will tell you what to think." The locals might mistake it for a documentary. I quit watching after 30 minutes.You just can't carry an entire movie with a "fake war hero via hypnosis" plot. No movie should hinge on a single plot point, and if it does, please don't make it a boring one. No disrespect to Denzel Washington intended. He played Frank Sinatra so well that co-producer Tina Sinatra probably got goosebumps. And what a waste of Meryl Streep. She did a great job and it didn't matter.But hey, one of the beauties of watching DVDs in China is that I don't blow three hours' pay on each movie.As a brief aside, show ONE FLEW OVER THE CUCKOO'S NEST to 155 Chinese students. This film refuses to tell them what to think, and that confuses the hell out of them. Then they ask you, Mr. Teacher Person, to explain the film's message. Um, it's about your school, but I'm not saying that.</review_text>
I love Sophia Loren as an actress however this DVD as 3 movies in one package is a very very very poor quality DVD. Colors are bad, picture is bad and the sound is even worse. don't waste your money. My DVD copy was bought from Amazon.this is my advic</review_text>
With The Straight Story, Lynch demonstrated none of the recognizable trademarks that transformed him into the director that I love.  This film felt like a "blind date" gone bad.  The Straight Story showed up, David Lynch arrived, but the rest of the date felt muddled, confusing, and utterly disastrous.  Everything in this film seemed wrong.  Lynch's choice for lead actor, the bland Sissy Spacek, the filler of repeat cornfield montages, all the way to the incoherent time spent on the read, I just felt that nobody had control over this picture, yet the randomness (and the possible tear ending) gave critics something to smile about.  This is not a David Lynch film, and for those walking into this with images of Mulholland Drive, Twin Peaks, or even Eraserhead in their mind will be utterly discombobulated.  The Straight Story attempted to show us a slice of Americana via the cornfields of Iowa, but for this boy based in the Flatlands of Illinois, it just seemed repetitive and boring.What initially pulled me away from this film was the technique that Lynch used to introduce us to Alvin and his daughter Rose.  Alvin lying on the ground because he can't get up, the clich use of taking him to the doctor letting us know that he is deteriorating, while bringing us the central conflict of his brother falling ill was just too much in such a little time frame.  Spacek's depiction of Rose seemed unbalanced and rather stale.  She brought nothing fresh to this rather emotional character outside of a stutter and some unfunny scenes.  I expected so much more from Spacek with her timeline of cinema, but this felt like something she did on an afternoon instead of providing us with the intensity that she harbors.  Then, to add more fuel to the fire, there was Richard Farnsworth.  Again, he isn't a horrible actor, but it felt like Lynch picked him because he fit the role physically, but alas, couldn't master it mentally.  Farnsworth seemed out in left field for a majority of his time onscreen.  I couldn't tell if he was trying to remember his lines or if he was truly in character.  His eyes seemed watery for everything which brought too much emotion to those little scenes, and seemed to bring not enough by the dramatic ending.  His entire speech about his time overseas at war was pathetic, while some will quote it as being his speech of a lifetime, I saw it as babble (and no, I am not that insensitive - I just felt it could have been handled by a stronger, more professional actor).  The rest of the cast seemed equally as unimportant.  I wanted Lynch to either go 100% for this film or none at all, but alas, it felt as if he just half-ed his way through this heap.Speaking of David Lynch, where did he go in this film?  There were some scenes that I witnessed that screamed the director that I love, but then there were others that just felt like he took pointers from Ken Burns' "Looking at America" class.  I hated the sweeping cornfields that seem to plague this film.  Instead of keeping us by Alvin's side throughout his journey, Lynch gave us a repetitive view of farming and corn.  There is nothing wrong with this technique when making the epic that one desperately needs to see once in a while, but when the same images were used over and over again, I nearly felt Lynch was humoring us with the dulls of Iowa instead of being the majestic all the critics raved about.  I think he could have been stronger with his filler than what he was with this film.  He needed something to couple with the authenticity of Alvin, but the stock-footage that he chose to show was definitely not the balance one could hope for.  I also felt there was more to be discussed with the friends that he met along the way.  Alvin was a walking storybook, filled with the way that he led his own life instead of listening to those around him and learning from their experiences as well.  Lynch made Alvin very closed minded, which did not create a strong protagonist for the feature.  Alvin was a strong character, but I needed more with this story.  I wanted him to make choices, learn new things, and bring that to his brother's table when they eventually met.  I felt cheated when this never occurred and felt as if Lynch was saying that this journey through Americana was that we could learn from Alvin, and not vice-versa.Overall, I wasn't stunned by this picture.  I thought Lynch could have been stronger with his choice of direction and cast instead of what seemed like he just "played it safe".  The overplayed stock footage of cornfields infuriated me due to the lack of time that we could have been spending with Alvin.  Speaking of Alvin, why couldn't he have been a stronger, better-rounded character?  I felt after watching this film that Lynch had duped me into believing that he wanted to paint a picture of America, but instead gave us nothing more than soft music, recycled images, and stock characters.  The stories were interesting to listen to, but brought nothing fresh to the table.  I must admit that the brotherly love moment brought a tear to my eye (since I have a brother as well), but why couldn't we focus on this further.  Lynch made the riff between the two brothers seem like a toss in the pan, when it was the central focus of this film.  The Straight Story could have been a strong tale bringing in a new image for Lynch, but instead it felt jagged and old.  I could suggest one viewing for this film, any further, and you will see how dull those cornfields really claim to be!Grade: ** out of ****</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
As the reviews below indicate, "Arthur" has a lot of fans -- when it was released in 1981 Vincent Canby of the New York Times found it a wonderful "screwball comedy" (although over time, Times readers, perhaps more discerning than Vincent, have only rated it 3 out of 5 stars) and Bravo listed it #10 on its list of Best Comedies (see below). I first saw Dudley Moore in "Foul Play," thought he was very funny. Based upon that, I bought "10" and "Arthur," as it turned out a downward trajectory.What I dislike about "Arthur" is Moore playing a loud, obnoxious drunk telling unfunny jokes, and Minelli playing a salt-of-the-earth working girl who loves Arthur for himself, not for his $750 million fortune. Even John Gielgud, who was great in "The Loved One" a much better comedy, can't resurrect this turkey.Okay, folks. Start casting your negative votes. In the meantime, here's the Bravo 100 Best Comedies list:100. Anchorman99. The Birdcage98. School of Rock97. Happy Gilmore96. Four Weddings and a Funeral95. Harold & Kumar Go to White Castle94. Waiting for Guffman93. The Aristocrats92. Father of the Bride91. Revenge of the Nerds90. Clueless89. Slapshot88. Team America87. The Kentucky Fried Movie86. Zoolander85. Dirty Rotten Scoundrels84. Silver Streak83. Sister Act82. Tootsie81. Half Baked80. Lost in America79. Three Amigos78. Bananas77. Flirting with Disaster76. Ghostbusters75. Dumb and Dumber74. Trading Places73. City Slickers72. Moonstruck71. Roxanne70. The Nutty Professor (Eddie Murphy)69. The Blues Brothers68. Broadcast News67. Kingpin66. Dazed and Confused65. Office Space64. This is Spinal Tap63. Manhattan62. The Pink Panther61. Election60. When Harry Met Sally59. Police Academy Series58. Private Benjamin57. Swingers56. Young Frankenstein55. Bull Durham54. Ferris Bueller's Day Off53. Dr. Strangelove52. Meet the Parents51. National Lampoon's Vacation50. The Princess Bride49. American Pie48. American Graffiti47. 9 to 546. The Incredibles45. Raising Arizona44. Sixteen Candles43. What About Bob?42. Harold and Maude41. Austin Powers40. Monty Python and the Holy Grail39. Mrs. Doubtfire38. Best In Show37. Dodgeball36. Good Morning Vietnam35. Beetlejuice34. Rushmore33. Clerks32. Groundhog Day31. The Big Lebowski30. The 40 Year Old Virgin29. Legally Blonde28. Annie Hall27. A Fish Called Wanda26. Wayne's World25. Meet the Fockers24. Bill & Ted's Excellent Adventure23. Big22. Beverly Hills Cop21. Shampoo20. The Jerk19. Wedding Crashers18. Stripes17. M*A*S*H16. Old School15. Fast Times At Ridgemont High14. Napoleon Dynamite13. Naked Gun Series12. The Producers11. Pee-Wee's Big Adventure10. Arthur9. Ace Ventura: Pet Detective8. Blazing Saddles7. The Wedding Singer6. Airplane5. South Park: Bigger, Longer, Uncut4. There's Something About Mary3. Shrek2. Caddyshack1. Animal HouseMy suggested additions: "The Loved One," "Leap of Faith," "Used Cars," "Eulogy" and "Drop Dead, Gorgeous."</review_text>
If you got Elvis Presley and Dodie Marshall and put them in the same film you will have Easy Come Easy Go, an Elvis Presley that people who like boats or sailing or both will love. But anybody that hates boats or sailing and is an Elvis Presley fan will be un-happy. And Elvis' leading lady in this film is Dodie Marshall which I guess is a re-make of a film with the same name came out in 1947. And this is one of final films that Elvis sings the same song with somebody else, and the song is Yoga Is As Yoga Goes. He sings that with Elsa Lanchester who plays a not very nice yoga teacher. If you are an Elvis Presley fan, then buy or rent Jailhouse Rock on video or dvd</review_text>
I have not seen this movie, but thanks to the review of "A viewer" from July 2001, I don't have to</review_text>
Well...don't know where to start......bought this one because it has Jeffrey Combs in it, Stuart Gorden is director.....and they did a good job on Re-animator.but let me tell you, horror freaks will be disapointed. Only one really bloody scene is worth watching...not because of the blood, not because of the gore.....just, because it is the only bloody scene in the movie...a nice looking woman is eaten by the "castel freak".....If you have seen Re-animator, The Evil dead, From Beyond, Hellraiser and maybe The Thing, then skip this one..you will be disapointed like me....Even a John Woo action movie has more blood in it.....</review_text>
This movie is not worth Sam Elliot.  I was very dissapointed, I will most likely thow it away</review_text>
I am a teacher who reads this book to my class every year.  I show the movie and this is a terrible version.  They leave out almost the whole story, and change the rest.  It is such a great book and I think they could have done a better job on the video.  I am always hoping a newer and better version is made</review_text>
This is a poor excuse of a movie. The actors are less than right for these rolls. I will be selling this movie used if anyone wants to waste the cash...</review_text>
Director:  Jamie BlanksCast:  Denise Richards, David Broeanaz, Marley Shelton, Jessica Capshaw, Jessica Cauffiel, Katherine Heigl, Hedy Burress, Fulvio Cecere.Running Time:  96 minutesRated R for strong horror violence, some sexuality and language."Valentine", the over-slasherized version of the excellent Tom Savage suspense novel, starts with a pre-teen valentine disco set in 1988. A bespectacled young boy heads on the dance floor looking for a young female to share a dance with. First he approaches Shelly (later played by Katherine Heigl) who embarrassingly rebuffs him. His charm doesn't seem to work with Lilly (Jessica Cauffer), Paige (Denise Richards) or Kate (Marley Shelton) either; they all send him packing quite arrogantly. His luck changes when Dorothy (Jessica Capshaw) actually acknowledges him and the twosome leave hand in hand. They are later caught kissing under a bench by a gang of bullies. In order to save her own self from persecution, Dorothy accuses the youngsters of attacking her and so the gang decides to take their own revenge. They cover him in red gooey stuff ("Carrie" anyone?), strip him, and chase him onto the dance floor where they proceed to beat him up.  Fast forward ten years and the girls are now women; no one is sure what happened to Jeremy (the bullied brat from earlier) as he disappeared after that dance. It's close to Valentine's Day (of course) and they each receive a card signed with a poetic threat to their lives. They soon realize to take them seriously when Shelly is found with her throat sliced. Before long a mysterious masked madman stalks each of them leaving Kate and her boyfriend Adam (David Boreanaz) to work out that she's next on the psycho's list.The acting is standard horror fare. Denise Richards once again shows us her amazing and wide-range acting talents: Those two large things attached to the front side of her body that we like to call "breasts." David Boreanaz gives a fair performance, but definitely shouldn't give up his day job on the WB's "Angel." Newcomer Marley Shelton can't do much with her underwritten role, and she comes off as extremely annoying and whiny for the most part. The rest of the acting is close to pitiful. Another problem with Valentine is that the characters are all so self indulgent and morally extracted that it's almost impossibility for them to win over the audience. In the beginning they're shown as mockers to any child that's unfortunate enough to be less pretty than their egotistical selves and actually possess a brain. This discrimination continues throughout the movie as they brush off the men who are trying to woo them out on a date, simply because they're not up to their high standards. How can anyone want such pompously arrogant characters to survive? In a typical slasher movie, the `final girl' is usually the shy reclusive type that the audience feels sympathetic towards, like Laurie Strode. These characters have no such power, leading you to believe that the world would be a better place without them anyway.  Director Jamie Banks ("Urban Legend") has proved that he has the potential to become a fair filmmaker; however this is his first feature failure. It's a shame that he couldn't have made more of the talented cast and competent budget, but in the end, Valentine just feels empty. A couple of talented cast members are not really enough to warrant the many obnoxious ones. Cupid certainly missed when he fired the arrow of fortune at this heart.  This one's destined to escape our memories in the not-too-distant future</review_text>
I purchsed this video a few years ago and was also very disappointed. I have nothing more to add to the other reviews posted here; just to agree that the sound was poor and the viewing quite fuzzy. I remember watching not only the first broadcast on NBC but several broadcasts years after that, with different casts. It was and still is my favorite Christmas story. I will certainly purchase the Schippers CD and hope to see another video or DVD in the future</review_text>
It is unfortunate that the only video presentation of Amahl is so generously flawed in stagecraft and sound production. It is not necessary to enumerate specifics here since some were cited in Ms. Lynch's review. True, Ms. Stratas' voice was often subjugated by the orchestra, but there were also  moments when her diction was less than perfect, during times which the orchestra had, gratefully, been relegated to a less prominent decibel level.  Here, sound production staff  must share blame.  Menotti knew what he was writing. A brilliant orchestrator, he etched clearly, the differences between orchestral dialogue and accompaniment figures. Staging, at times, appears to have little to do with the music. When one thinks of Menotti and opera (almost synonymous), the marriage of music AND theatre is considered a perfect union. Sadly, Menotti's obvious musical intentions were overlooked. It is heartening to read that a new video of this opera may be produced. I would disagree with Ms. Lynch that it is a good introduction to this operatic work. The beginning, the introduction makes the strongest impression.  It is lasting.  This is one indelibility I would not welcome</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
Okay, Ginger Snaps one has become one of my all time favorite horror films. I loved the first one,but I dont understand how people can say the sequel is just as good as the first. I had some problems with this movie. First, there were some plot holes actually there was alot of plot holes (who the hell was the wolf chasing her? Was it Sam from the first Ginger Snaps?). But my biggest problem was, im not even sure.It was boring and not that interesting.We dont even get to see Bridgette cause mayhem as a wolf.Ghost is really annoying to watch in the film and well i just didnt like this one. I dont understand what people loved aboput this film.The only thing that kept me interested was the fact that its Bridgett and actually Ginger Snaps.I love the sisters characters.But this film just wasnt all that good at all. I still yet have to watch "The Beginning",and since its much more expensive hopefully its better</review_text>
Sorry but i totaly disagree with all these positive reviews.I'm a fan of war classic films but this one is a mess.Nothing is moving,action is zero and filming is poor.we are very far away from dirty dozen,battle of the bulge,midway,enemy below etc....a total waste of time and money</review_text>
The Claim purports to be an adaptation of Thomas Hardy's classic novel, The Mayor of Casterbridge transplanted to the Old West. The producers clearly wanted The Claim to be accepted as a literate Western and it is clear that the critics fell for it. However, as anyone who has read the original Hardy novel can tell you, the movie fails as a Hardy adaptation. Meanwhile, any fan of movie westerns can tell you that The Claim is a failure in that department as well.The Claim begins in 1869 where Daniel Dillon (Peter Mullan) lords supreme over his company town. His gold mining company is a topflight operation. Dillon is easily one of the most admired men in California, if not in the nation. However, Dillon is not a terribly happy man. Deep down, he broods over a dark secret that, if exposed, could lead to the destruction of his reputation.You see, the gold claim was originally made by another man, but Dillon sold his wife and daughter to the original claimant in exchange for the claim. The prospector thereupon took both wife and child to Boston and raised the family there. Meanwhile, Dillon ruthlessly exploited the gold claim to become one of the richest men in all of California. Needless to say, if it became public knowldege that Dillon's success was based on the sale of human beings, that would be nothing short of disastrous.Matters are brought to a head when his wife (Nastassja Kinski), daughter (Milla Jovovich) and his wife's subsequent daughter with the other man (Sarah Polley) show up in town and request that he take them in as his family. Just when you think that things are going to get interesting, the rug is pulled out from the audience's feet when it is revealed that Dillon conveniently never married after making his dirty deal. This enabled him to marry his ex-wife without never having to publically admit that they were previously married or what happened to that union. This effectively removed all dramatic tension and helped make The Claim a colossal bore</review_text>
I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
This a dreadful example of what Jayne was reduced to play in to feed her children and compensate for the lack of earnings of her deadbeat-husbands/lovers.The only reason to watch it would be because Mamie Van Doren was also in it.But be aware (and i read that in a biography about Jayne) that in their contracts was specified that they would NOT appear together in ANY scene whatsoever.So you see them SEPARATELY in different scenes.Also be aware that if you blink,you will not see either of the 2 blonde beauties.Conclusion:Get this film for a member of your family who is nostalgic for the ways of the ''Ol' South',or someone with a white hood showing his eyes onl</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
Expected more from this movie - although DeNiro was good as usual</review_text>
Shark Attack is an interesting tale of deceit and stolen shark footage.  The movie features some computer harpooning police men and a crazy fisherman turned taxi driver.  The most interesting part is all the shark footage...  The best scene is after the bad guy/hotel owner is eaten, the shark clearly shown with a hook in it's mouth being pulled towards a boat.  This of course has nothing at all to do with the plot.  So where did this hook come from?  It was probably I was trying to stab in my eyes to stop the pain of this movie</review_text>
If I was asked to give you a plot synopsis of this gorgeous film I would be hard pressed to say that OSCAR AND LUCINDA is about  anything for sure.This is positively the singlemost butchered screenplay I have ever sat through.Laura Jones has adapted Peter Carey's novel and Gillian Armstrong has turned out "something" that is so chopped up and nonsensical that, apart from from the very quick shots of New South Wales and a magnificent soundtrack by Thomas Newman,  I had to keep pausing the film to say,"WHAT???!!!" This film is about everything and it is about nothing;it is about obsession and compulsion;it is about different religions;it is about chance and faith;it is about a father and son;it is about how a grandson came to be.........but it certainly IS NOT about two connected characters named Oscar and Lucinda.Each scene of this film is SO short and abrupt that the viewer never has any time to identify/sympathize/empathize with ANY of these extremely disconnected people and events.There are SO many plots and subplots and themes and subthemes and non essential material and characters that it is positively laughable and annoying to see such squander of good source material in the wrong ,uncapable and un-understanding hands.It seems that trying to tell any of the heart and soul that is revealed in Peter Carey's novel in slightly more than two hours proved to be too much for those involved in this endeavour.What a shock to see the immense talents of A -list actors such as Ralph Fiennes,Cate Blanchett,Ciaran Hinds and Tom Wilkinson literally wasted in 20 second scenes!Even the breathtaking land of the Australian outback is shown for five seconds at the most.AND THE ENDING!!!!!.....what in Heaven's name was that???Either most of this film is still on the cutting room floor( edited by the noferious Nicholas Beauman of LITTLE WOMEN,COUNTRY LIFE,COSI) or Laura Jones and Gillian Armstrong just simply could not find any center and focus for this beautifully filmed "butchered" mess of a movie.2*'s because the Thomas Newman soundtrack is so lovely,but nay a farthing more!!</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
Comparing Oceans 11 of the 1960s to the remakes of today is like comparing the Vegas casinos of yesteryear and today.  The hippest casinos of that era were, by today's highest standards of casino elegance and class (no, I'm not talking about Excalibur), dull, smokey, hokey, and cramped - just like the original Oceans 11.I'm as fascinated with the Rat Pack as much as anyone, but I think it's important to take the rose colored glasses off when critiquing the work of these sometimes neurotically insecure and deeply flawed individuals in order to judge a movie on its own merits.  I think too many peoples' sense of self identity is reflected in the image of the Rat Pack to ever really do objectivity justice.Humor and style do evolve (my father, for example, finds no humor in some of the most critically acclaimed shows on TV today), so it's hard to compare two different eras.  Nevertheless, great, timeless cinema came out of this era, but this work is not in that category.  By any movie standards it drags heavily and its "hipness" seems contrived and forced into an otherwise hokey vibe. The musical interludes and final stride down the Strip are incredible for reinforcing this image (and I do love them as stand alone moments), but jar so completely with the tone and style of the rest of the movie that I can't help but think this was just a vanity flick to satiate the appetites of fans hungry to devour media images of the highest style and pizzaz that era had to offer.Regarding the issue of whether this movie appeals only to an older generation, it should be noted that those in the younger generation who have reviewed this movie favorably are teenagers.  There may be something deeper at work here - an adolscent (or arrested adolesecent) quest for a two-dimensional, this-is-what-cool is mantra by fans of any age.To me this movie is little more than a vain time capsule revealing how much tighter, interesting, and more sophisticated not only most movies but perhaps society at large has become.  That said, there's still an audience for the old school casino in which dank slot machines greet you at the door on the way to the cheap buffets, just as there is and always will be an audience that smugly holds this 1960s Ocean 11 as superior.  I know I'll take a hit in terms of "was this review helpful" points from this crowd, but by the nature of who they are they got away with a lot that would never compel an objective viewer free from the folklore enmeshed in this intriguing group's fame.</review_text>
KILL MEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE!!!   THIS MOVIE IS THE WORST MOVIE OF ALL, ALL, ALL, TIME SINCE THE HISTORY OF THE UNIVERSE AND BEFORE THAT! IN THEATERS I WAS THE ONLY ONE WATCHING THAT MOVIE AND I FELT LIKE WALKING OUT!! I WANTED TO CRY  :( THE ACTORS STINK ALONG WITH THE PLOT AND 3-D EFFECTS!!!All I can say is BOOOOOOOOOO THIS MOVIE SUCKS</review_text>
I own both Blu-ray and HD-DVD movies, and have been consistently dissapointed with all the HD-DVD's.  They just don't compare to Blu-ray.  The Hulk was not a very good movie to begin with, and the transer to HD-DVD was not impressive.  Picture quality was average at best, and the sound quality was also mediocre.  I have yet to find any HD-DVD that is even comparable to the best of Blu-ray</review_text>
I might be in a slightly foul mood on account of my having just returned from a shopping experience which resulted in my receiving a parking ticket, but...I used to watch KB's Hamlet on a fairly regular basis. Whether is was on cable or VHS, I found I could never get enough.I signed the petition. I'm one of those people who's written letters in the hopes they'll actually make a difference.That said, WHERE IS THE FRIKKIN' DVD? I mean, has anybody else noticed that KB's Hamlet has already missed the DVD boat? While the world is moving toward HD-DVD, we *still* have yet to see a sign of the stupid thing. I haven't owned a VCR since back before Amazon even really existed, or was, at least, widely known (I was an early adopter of DVD).Now, years later - *years* after the first time I inquired about this release, I still can't believe it isn't out.Reality check, people: Forbidden Planet, fine movie though it may have been (and in context of this discussion as, beneath its sci-fi exterior, one can find an interesting retelling of The Tempest), it's gone from film (decades before I was born) to VHS/Beta/?, to DVD, and now to HD-DVD.Why is it that a film like Forbidden frikkin' Planet gets pushed up through the years and transferred over and over again to the latest medium when *the* finest version of Hamlet ever produced for the screen has been left behind?What's going on? Is KB being held at gunpoint by Mel Gibson's handlers? Is there blackmail involved? Did KB contract George Lucas to add a bunch of CGI ewoks to each scene? 'Cause I can't figure out, for the life of me, why we haven't seen this stupid thing yet.Was it that hard to commit it to VHS? It seems to me that it was readily and easily done.So what's the deal with DVD? Is the money just not good enough, Mr. Branagh? I realize that your talents lie in theater rather than finances, but 100% of zero is zero.It makes me wonder, then... is it some artistic issue? When transferred to the higher fidelity formats of DVD and HD-DVD, are there imperfections present that were undetectable when the film was out in VHS format?Can we see more clearly how Charleton Heston's weird teeth have yellowed and browned over the years and formed into this strange rolling dental pattern greatly in need of modern dentistry (my dentist could set those teeth painlessly over a four month period without the use of orthodontics)?For years, I've wondered about this. College came and went. I've moved to three different continents. My own career has gone from peon to Mr. Importantpants, and yet *we are still without even a DVD version of Hamlet*.Yes, I realize there's a 4:3 version of the film available for digitital download, but please don't make me any more uppity than I already am.I want the film, and I want it in its full glory, with proper aspect ratio, and preferably on HD-DVD so I can see it in all its glory (which would be especially nice considering the 70mm film used to record this sucker).I hate to give what is easily the best film version of Hamlet ever produced (and, no, this point is not open to argument - it's not an opinion, but, rather, a scientifically proven fact) one star, but given that the man and his peeps have had over a *decade* to get the job done, I think it's really just about time to see it hitting store shelves.If it *is* hitting shelves, by the by, I apologize for the rant, but I'm tired of waiting.I want to see this movie on a disc before I die.Widescreen.Preferably HD.I don't care about the bonus materials - you can keep 'em if *that's* what's taking so long.But just get some dummy college intern to do the transfer and throw together a DVD menu.If it can be done for Forbidden Planet, then it can be done for Hamlet.I have spoken.And I am awesome</review_text>
I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.</review_text>
Can't understand what all the fuss is over this movie. It's cute but so boring. I could hardly stay awake.</review_text>
B Grade movie, really poor script.Bulk of movie is boring, superficial, stereotypical.Real purpose of movie is Baptist condemnation of the supernatural.Story line.The wife of a couple deeply in love dies in a boating accident during a beachhouse visit. The husband feels a deep loss for two years during which he is frequently visited by the ghost of the wife.On the second anniversary of the accident relatives and friends gather at the beachhouse and push the husband to come to grips with his grief and refocus his energy to move on with his life.Overtones.The leading man is depicted as unstable, self-centered, reckless, irresponsible, and fantasy-prone.before and during the two year period. When revealed to the those assembled, the spirit contact with his wife is universally condemned. His "giving up the ghost" is seen as a great relief and the first sign of maturity he has displayed in his life.The daughter has dream sequence with the mother in which the mother coaxes her into a head-on crash with a car.leaving her frightened and distraught.Media Messages.The film illustrates the creation and reinforcement of a cultural taboo.1. Spirit contact is dangerous, selfish, and emotionally unhealthy.2. The personal grieving journey of another should be co-opted by peers.3. Condemnation is the only acceptable response to spirit contact. There should be no expression of curiosity or investigation like "What did she look like?" "What kinds of things did she say?"4. Messages from loved ones in dreams should not be trusted.In short the movie creates a set of automatic responses all of which mitigate against a common sense acceptance and appreciation of the value of spirit contact with loved ones..In life our conduct is about building bonds of love and trust with those around us. In passing over these ties endure and can be building blocks for a link to the beyond. When William Blake's brother passed, he appeared and taught the skill engraving thus providing humanity for centuries thereafter with icons known to all.Many near-death experiencers have wisely learned that they must keep their wisdom to themselves. The inner teachings are sacred and must not be diluted and defiled by small minds. The same is true for after-death communications largely because of media images that create a cultural storyline like that in this film</review_text>
I hate this film and "The Ballad of Cable Hoge," because of its depiction of animal cruelty. This happens just at the prelude of both films.</review_text>
First, this piece of trash is based on The Journey To The West about as much as Raiders of the Lost Ark is based on the Bible. There are some characters common to both Lost Empire and Journey. Well, common in name. That said let's get to the real problem with this film. It is astoundingly insulting to Chinese religious traditions. Imagine for a moment some non-Christian producing a film in which: the God Jehova no longer cares what happens to humanity and just gives us over to Satan; Jesus gives up on that sacrifice stuff and is now focused purely on the personal acquisition of wealth and power; and the Virgin Mary comes to earth for a hot night at the singles bars. Sound offensive? It is. And this film is equally insulting to Buddhism, Taoism, and Confucianism (the three big ones in China).Confucius, a man revered these past 2500 years for his uncompromising moral standards appears in Lost Empire as a lecherous,traitorous,lying,cowardly weasel.The Jade Emperor,Taoism's chief God, is shown as a despondent,apathetic slob who no longer cares about the earthly or celestial realms.Kuan Yin, one of the Bodhisattvas, is shown in Lost Empire falling in romantic and physical love with a man. That is as likely as the Virgin Mary turning tricks on a street corner.If some religious bigot wanted to disguise a piece of anti-Chinese propaganda as a clever adventure-fantasy they could not easily do better than The Lost Empire. It makes me wonder if the insult was intended.</review_text>
This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
This movie is horrible. I even found the terror that was Jaws: the Revenge better than this. I'll list some of the things that made this movie bad.1. The acting was horrible2. the special effect were even worse than the acting3. The kids were smarter than the adults (thats how you know its a corny kids movie)4. The jokes fell flat every singal time5. The script was horrible6. 95% of the movie you could tell was on a blue screenI know they were targeting this movie for younger audiences but get real I've seen alot of family movies that both kids, teenagers, and adults can enjoy. I felt tortured threw this entire movie. I was Praying that it would end and I could leave. Don't buy this movie. Hell don't even rent it. Its just that bad</review_text>
James Spader was supposed to be in the last season of DINER. That would be my only reason for buying it. He is certainly not in this one! So where is he????!!!Are there no Diner videos or DVDs with James Spader?</review_text>
This is what happens when you buy movies that Amazon recommends; I consider my EXTREME boredom with this movie my PUNISHMENT for letting them recommend a movie for me to buy.  Don't let the fantastic cast lure you; this movie is BORING!True, it is realistic in the sense that conversations among friends -- more often than not -- don't necessarily go anywhere, and oftentimes the texture of a movie is -- not in the conversations themselves -- but in the relationships that become evident within those conversations, but nevertheless DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY on this movie.Did I mention that it was BORING</review_text>
I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show</review_text>
(What do Holly Hunter and Burt Reynolds have in common?)Just another flick about a gal who falls for an abuser, this time with the gimicks of a waterlogged piano and exotic New Zealand Maori.The tribe had it right, though, ignore these two losers and stick with the trees</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
I remember seeing CHILDREN OF THE CORN right after reading Stephen King's short story version in his classic book, Night Shift. I was excited because King's story was such good scary fun. Well, I watched the movie and was amazed at how awful it was. While the short story had a building atmosphere of dread and horror, the movie had an atmosphere of pure cheeze. King's story was short (like 10-20 pages) and sweet, w/ sinister children and a mysterious god / monster in the cornfields. The movie has a town full of annoying brats and a cheap beasty that caused much eye-rolling and laughter. The running time is 90 minutes, including about an hour's worth of padding. COTC would have made an excellent addition to one of King's anthology movies like CREEPSHOW. As it stands, it's bloated and pretty boring. Of course, Linda Hamilton is in it, which is why I gave it an extra star...</review_text>
in the short story collection night shift, mr.king gave us some of his best short stories and spawned at least 6 movies that i know of(this mess,trucks( twice once by king as "maximam overdrive" and once as a t.v. movie),night surf,the boogyman(not the new one),graveyard shift,the mangler,and maybe more and not one has been done right! this one misses by a mile as it tells of the cult of kids who kill all the adults in a town and serve "he who walks behind the rows"more like "we steped in something behind the rows" and we steped in this flameing piece of junk!!! skip it!!!!!!</review_text>
After two hours of watching it, I still don't know what it was about.  Yes, the scenery is fantastic, but a National Geographic film would have done more.I applaud the acting of Milla Jovovich, and Nastassja Kinski.  But, the kudos reviewers have given to Peter Mullen would have been better deserved if this were a silent movie.  I hardly heard anything he said and there are no English subtitles offered on the dvd.  As for Wes Bentley, that's acting?  He kept the same expression when he was having sex as when he was having a gun pointed at him, or a co-worker being blown to "Kingdom Come" (that's a pun based on the movie).  He makes Clint Eastwood look like Laurence Olivier.The film is supposedly based on a Thomas Hardy book, but very loosely based, and the scriptwriters should have at least used Cliff Notes to have learned more about the story and the character development.  They obviously fell asleep after the first couple of chapters and made up the rest.</review_text>
I was not thrilled with this work.  Here's why:  The movie jumps about in non-logical fashion that distracts from the flow.  It is beautifully filmed with great costumes, colors, imagery but the acting is so bland, almost weak!  Christ, I wanted to jump in there and show them how to be passionate! The sex scenes were boring.  Maybe i should make films!  This is frustrating!!It had it's moments so, 2 stars.  Wish someone would make a movie about 'Narcissus and Goldmund' or 'Cloister and the Hearth'.  Now That would be Passionate! (unless Amblin or Touchstone did it).</review_text>
Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!</review_text>
I actually wish they had given us director commentary on this disc because I would have listened to a little of it just to see what Barry Levinson was thimking and I would cross my fingers and hope he would blame the whole thing on a really bad drug trip. Take a look at the man's filmography and tell me if you think this absolute disgrace belongs there. Worse, he wasn't alone, SOMEONE ELSE liked the idea enough to co-write it. Everyone else can blame a large paycheck, but Levinson actually came up with the idea. This is one of the most beautiful terrible films I ever seen, if they took one tenth of the imagination they put into the set and toy designs and invested it into the screenplay they might have had a movie</review_text>
Man, there's no way to describe this movie.Slow, boring, unidimensional, bad plot, really bad acting...Really low-budget (in a bad way)I'm not gonna get my time or my money back. I bought it based on the reviews, and they were really off... Even if you enjoy the gothic ambience, believe me, it's really bad.You've been warned</review_text>
Typical of the war movies of that age.  Very much the Americans are all good clean kids who will overcome injustice.  I enjoyed looking at an America that was.  Would purchase again but this is not a documentary or even a close approximation of real life</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
If you want a review of the plot itself, complete with spoilers, feel free to read the other reviews.My biggest beef with this movie is the fact that any suspension of disbelief is utterly killed, again and again, due to the fact that the script writers and director couldn't keep the story straight.There is a homage to Asimov with the shipboard computer telling one of the crew that it can not let a human come to harm. That would have been fabulous if it had actually been adhered to in any other part of the film. There are a handful of these screw ups that kills any chance of the story being credible.That said, it was a bit enjoyable. The cast did a fantastic job with what they were actually given. If the writers would have spent more time developing the characters than finding ways to get them naked, maybe I would have cared what happened to them.The dimensional jump effect was quite novel and was the one thing in this movie that made me say, "Oooh, cool".Good premise, good effects, good acting, but poor writing killed any chance at this being a good film</review_text>
This blatently derivative (hat tip to Ridley Scott's Alien, with a hint of Stanley Donen's Saturn 3 thrown in) movie should surely win the award for the most irritatingly gratuitous over-use of strobe lighting ever. This makes it extremely uncomfortable to watch and is, presumably, employed to detract from the lack of any genuine thrills. Throw in a ridiculously precocious ship's computer and a downright silly robot, and this adds up to one helluva big turkey in space. James Spader and Angela Bassett do their best to make something out of an inadequate script and plot, but this is unremittingly dreadful and dull.  The &quot;happy ever after&quot; finale will probably make you cringe in its corniness. Supernova's only redeeming factor is that it is very short</review_text>
This is a review of the 1997 DVD release- thus far, as of September 2006, the only release I know of.Of all of the DVDs in my collection this has to be one of the most disappointing. Without going into minute detail of what makes the film brilliant- the classic score,  the hilarious comedy and Burton's twisted but brilliant vision- the quality of the film transfer to DVD is almost criminal. It probably wouldn't be noticed on television screens smaller than 27 inches, but on larger screens the picture becomes soft and grainy, devoid of detail and utterly perplexing, given that the movie was shot in the late 80's. The first thought that sprang to my mind when watching it was that it almost immediately reminded me of my time in elementary school before we switched to video tape- the transfer is reminiscent of an old, battered 8mm film reel. I own a S-VHS vcr, and I have seen better film transfers on video tape. Additionally, the extras... well, what extras? There are several paragraphs of "production notes" which are basically brief overviews of Danny Elfman and Tim Burton, but nothing you couldn't gleam from Wikipedia in three minutes.All that aside, I did pay $9 for it at Sam's Club, so the old axiom of getting what you pay for is truer than ever- but I expected so much more. If you're a Beetlejuice fan, wait for the inevitable Criterion Collection or Special Edition remaster.</review_text>
This movie must be restored--the quality of picture is unacceptable beginning with Bloody Mary's singing Bali Hi. I tried to purchase a completely restored, digitally remastered DVD of this musical and could not find one in 2007.  I returned this DVD to the seller</review_text>
This movie starts off blazing hot and ends up ice cold.  Martin does a great job with Nick Nolte as an artist in "life lessons" and i thought after this story that i was in for a real treat of a film but after watching Ford Coppolas somthing Zoe i began to tire and by the end of Woody Allens snoozefest i was bored stiff.  My advice is to watch the first 30 minutes and then turn this one off.  The first 30 minutes is GREAT film followed but very average film and ending with truley awful film.</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
This has been rewritten to dumb it down.  The beautiful language originally used by him has been replaced with dumber versions, and entire paragraphs have been removed.  As someone who read and loved the original story as a child, I was very disappointed to see this when I began reading it to my 7 year old son</review_text>
I did not like this movie. I know that times have changed and it would be revisionist to hold this movie to millennium standards of sexual conduct and infidelity. Nonetheless, I found it very disturbing: his lack of concern for his wife and children, how the wife was unsympathetic and one dimensional, and how absolutely de rigueur it was in the sixties for married men to have "a bit on the side." And what about her kids? apart from the first scene we never see them again; she instead seems to spend all her time cooking and keeping house for a married man. I'm not a prude, really, but this film left a bad taste in my mouth</review_text>
I've seen the phrase "slice of life" used many times to describe this movie, which makes me wonder - whose life is this a slice of? Certainly not mine, and not most people's. The Anniversary Party is a slice of the lives of a group of people who are extremely vain, self-absorbed, jaded and rich beyond most people's wildest fits of imagination. Worse, there isn't much of a hint that the filmmakers were aware that most people, or at least most people who are fun to be around, don't act the way these characters do.Good films can be made about Hollywood - in "Mulholland Drive" it's kind of a dream world, both in the sense that it's hazy and ambiguous and in the sense that one of its characters dreams of being a bigger part of it; in "State and Main," the self-absorption of many of the characters is offered for our amusement. "The Anniversary Party" is presented as if most viewers will be sympathetic with the characters, but I can't imagine them elicting much sympathy from anyone who isn't also a bored rich prick. If this is truly a "slice of life" for the Hollywood set, it is no wonder that so many films produced in Hollywood are so cynical and shallow.</review_text>
Let's just be honest: this film is terrible . . . and not in the way that "Attack of the Killer Tomatoes!" is so "terrible" that it's great . . . more like the way "Caddyshack II" is so terrible that the director should forever live in shame . . .I was a kid when this film was released. And, while it was not particularly exciting then, it is insanely tedious now. It is a genuine test of patience . . . but with no pay-off what-so-ever.Here's some potentially helpful information:The slasher film can branch in two directions: supernatural (Friday the 13th II, Halloween, Nightmare on Elm Street etc...) and crime/revenge (I Spit on Your Grave, Friday the 13th, TCM, Scream, Urban Legend ect...). This one falls under the latter heading. And while realism can render a more potent effect ("This could really happen!"), this film simply fails to engage the viewer ON ANY LEVEL.The goal of a slasher film is two-fold: to horrify and repulse. This does neither!! The "horror" element is non-existent: there is no point in expounding, since there is nothing to examine.  And, if you love gore (and who doesn't?) try another film. The "murders" are barely visible (literally) and so sloppy that they solicit no response other than a yawn. Many of the film's problems are technical: the cinematography is just horrendous. The entirely film is extremely underlit, the colors are needlessly washed-out, and the film stock is grade "F." And this, as you know, is not because the film is over twenty-five years old . . . the problem was always there.There is ONE "good" moment in the entire film . . . when the school's "bad boy" has his head lopped-off and it clumsily thunks down the prom-court walk-way. Still, it is more comic-relief than genuine horror.The soundtrack could not BE WORSE. I am not referring to the disco tunes (we accept those since this film was made at the end of the disco period), but the tracks made for the film . . . they sound like they were squeaked-out by The Carpenters. So, imagine lots of disco punctuated by lackluster, psuedo-thoughtful ballads (like the final song on the track). Words cannot explain how wildly offensive it is!!Did I mention that Leslie Nielson has a meaty role (yes, THAT Leslie Nielsen from Airplane, and Naked Gun)? He plays a tough-minded principal who is tormented by the death of his daughter. I know, it SOUNDS funny, but IT'S NOT!! Trust me!!If you dig watching unattractive teenagers "disco the night away," hey, this film is totally for you!! But if you are looking for a decent slasher film from the early middle-period of its reign look elsewhere (like Halloween, Friday the 13th etc...)I'd be willing to get all Ed McMahon's Star-Search on you and give this "film" a 1/4 star. But it is an important milestone in the slasher sub-genre (I will not spoil the film and tell you why, though). So if you are a slasher enthusiast or a horror scholar, watch it . . . on picture-in-picture . . . maybe after a few drinks . . . on a day when the cable is out . . . on fast-forward!</review_text>
Years ago, a group of children playing accidently kill one of their friends, and decide to keep a secret. Years later when they're all in high school, the girls twin brother exacts bloody revenge against them. Your typical 80s horror film, not very notable other than Leslie Nielsen, and Jamie Lee Curtis. This is one prom, better left unattended</review_text>
We have a lawman who for no explained reason starts to investigate the cause of death of a man with 500,000 on him and it all goes down hill from there. There is no rhyme or reason to the story. I gave it two stars because the landscape is great</review_text>
It starts out as one of those movies where there are a lot of unrelated characters that you think will connect in the end.  And about 2/3 through the entire story line breaks down into mass confusion</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
A lonely traveler is out in the dessert (looks like the same place that many great sci-fi movies were made) in his 50's pickup when he spots a strange light. Meanwhile back at the laboratory an unusual meteor is being tracked on its way to earth. What do they have in common?The Dr. Leslie Gaskell (Jeff Morrow) suspects that there is some nefarious plot from outer space. They could be right.  But can he prove it?This movie is missing the front-end dialog familiar with the classics of the era. They just used the word Kronos because they must have thought it sounded nifty like the giant, this of course is misleading as it makes you think it has something to do with time. There is a love interest between Gaskell (Jeff Morrow) and Vera Hunter (Barbara Lawrence). A fun side interest was looking at al the fancy scientific equipment circa 50's concept. The menacing device is hockey may have had too small of a budget.</review_text>
Please all this is far from Sam Elliot's better Westerns. See "The Sacketts', "Conagher", "The Shadow Riders", or "The Quick and the Dead". This is far less a believable Western. Few if any women did what this woman did let alone the whole storlyine reeks of trying to be modern, not authentic. Sorry but no character development in my book does not make a good movie. Not to mention these were not exactly the kind of characters I would want to see developed</review_text>
Just repeat the following several times.1) Draggy plot2) Uninspired acting, especially Allen, who almost sinks it3) unimaginative (story, direction, etc)Then get a Hitchcock film</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
Dragonheart did not need a sequel. The story was told. It is over. The first movie peaked therfore, end of franchise. This has bad acting, terrible C.G.I., and stupid story. Stick with the first</review_text>
I thought this movie looked cool from the preview, but it was a bit of a bore.  I had a vague idea of what the director was going for, but it just wasn't there.  Film noir meets John Hughes. The female lead is intoxicating, however.Not worth the four bucks</review_text>
Slow,dull and done on the "cheap"....stick with "Zulu" and read your history book's ....far more entertaining</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
I might as well re-draft this review as only 0 of 2 people enjoyed the first draft.  That's wouldn't normally phase me, but I can do better for you in this case.I first saw a segment of ST-2 on cable and mistook it for an anemically budgeted direct-to-DVD release.  This ticked me off a bit because I'm a fan of Phil Tippett, who got his major feature film directorial shot on this movie.Having now got the DVD, I have unreeled it from the beginning and I find it loads more ambitious, intelligent and well rendered by director Tippett than I had given the producers credit for permitting.Tippett has been an innovator in the CGI field -- stop-motion, go-motion, and transitional model-to-CGI models manipulated so as to provide dynamic effects for an impressive array of digital creatures. Among those milestones are the perfectly convincing insect creatures in the first STARSHIP TROOPERS movie. The multitudes of individually rendered creatures in STARSHIP TROOPERS are spotlessly realistic.As a general rule, if a studio greenlights a movie sequel as a direct-to-DVD release, they intend to suffocate the production -- whether the franchise has been good, bad or mediocre in the market -- by simply failing to provide a generous -- or even a minimal budget -- to sustain life support in any recognizable way.  Trust me -- starve any sequel of support and money and you become a key factor in ruining even the best of franchises.STARSHIP TROOPERS (the first) was not a runaway commercial hit on first run, apparently, when compared to its $100 million cost.  But sci-fi buffs are a loyal film audience with eternal memories, and it is certain that this ambitious sci-fi production will continue to attract countless repeated viewings -- and income -- for the rest of the studios' and the filmmakers' natural lives.  Nobody loses on this one.  A sequel is hardly a big gamble if one invests long-term.Regardless of that, director Phil Tippett has not only done an impressive job of directing his first major film, he has also done a very smart job of producing a generous portion of images large in scope and convincing in power within his spare budget.Looking at the bug war scenes in the first act, you might easily not suspect there were any production restrictions at all.  Credit Mr. Tippett for that achievement.  In fact, there are moments that benefit from lessons learned in the first movie, which have added impact as a result.Now for a few notes:  I would have liked to see the bug culture and biology expanded in new, logical ways.  I would like to have seen bug life-cycle mechanics which did not rehash ground covered by other unrelated movies -- what has been done and re-done in sci-fi productions as far back as ALIEN.The creative possibilities for an intelligent multiped, exoskeleton, hive-bred civilization are unlimited.  There is no need at all for the writers or FX techs to resort to the over-used and tired gimmick of an alien climbing from one human's mouth to another human mouth, for example.Nor do we need yet another script in which we revisit the old familiar premise of films from INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS to THE HIDDEN to THE THING that anyone can be inhabited by an alien and still appear normal.  It has been done to death.  Let's move on and discard that whole much copied process.I could tell you things about the way a crawdad captures and eats a minnow from the tail forward that would make your hair stand on end. There is plenty of fresh, untapped bug behavior to mine, and there is far too much writing talent involved with the STARSHIP TROOPERS series to need to use anything rehashed from any previous motion picture.Still in all, Phil Tippett's feature debut as director is more than competent and particularly surprising for his facility with the actors.  I look forward to his future development as a director.</review_text>
THE TRANSFORMERS gets my vote as the worst movie of the 1980's.  It pains me to say this for I am a fan of the series.  It was a travesty to see Optimus Prime (the greatest of the Transformers) fall in battle and pass on the Matrix of Leadership to a successor (Rodimus Prime) who proved incapable of leadership.  Galvatron was a pathetic reincarnation of Megatron--he lacked the malevolent cunning of Megatron and behaved like a raving lunatic.  Why would a Decepticon warrior follow him into battle?  As for the new generations of Autobots and Decepticons introduced in the movie, they were forgettable.It amuses me that "fans" are raving about the movie now yet they did not pay to see the movie when it was released twenty years ago.  THE TRANSFORMERS failed at the box office and I am glad it did.  As a fan, I was insulted.  Perhaps these other "fans" have allowed nostalgia to blind them to the ugly truth of this outrage.</review_text>
Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
Filmed in 1933, this movie is in black and white, and might be considered dull and slow-moving by today's standards.  An accurate chronology of the six wives of Henry VIII, the characters of the wives are rather  undeveloped, and the movie does not delve very deeply into the important  religious and political questions around which the marriages centered.  A  good introduction for those who are unfamiliar with the basic story, but  the serious scholar will want to conduct further research</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
I wont buy this title until they release the original WIDESCREEN version</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
Painfully bad.  I want my money back.Listen to Bob's albums, but stay far away from this movie.  So many great actors, but the story is nonsense.  The characters are just a random assortment of stereotypes.  Unnatural dialogue.  Poorly lit.  Poorly directed.  Poorly edited.And Bob couldn't act his way out of a paper bag.  Stone-faced, frail, semi-catatonic; completely devoid of charisma.  It's his vanity project, but he comes off looking ridiculous.  Even his musical performances are only so-so.The movie was shot entirely inside a Hollywood studio (except for a few 2nd unit shots of downtown LA), making it look fake and crowded.A case in point: Jeff Bridges and John Goodman.  Amazing together in The Big Lebowski.  Both appear here as flat, irritating, one-dimensional characters.It's a bummer, man</review_text>
I was forced to watch this movie for college.  It was the most vulgar, unnecessary piece of junk I have ever seen.  This is a perfect example of the demoralization of America</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
The film shows no action, except a disgusting performance of cutting apart a dead body, and you ask yourself, in what relation to the subject of the film this stands. (Sorry, forgot the 3-second-sceen of a naked young man) Just the head of 17-year-old lads, who wonder why they got infected, when they work as prostitute,  explaning in detail what they are to do in this job and where you can find them in Prag. (Like advertising) You are provided with not the least background information about their education, why they left their home town, why they have no normal job. I would wonder what politics think and do  about the youth in the new EC-country, what young people get told about the danger of deceases at school, and what other chances they have in life</review_text>
Not sure what is worse, the horrible script or the horrible acting. Typical mean girl makes epiphany and changes to good person script. Watching Schneider dress in women's clothes for an entire movie is just creepy. Using lemon juice for eye drops would be more enjoyable than watching this movie.</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
Most of those who were lucky enough to see this stunning Srdjan Dragojevic film at select film festivals in the U.S. have not forgotten its clarity, its anger, and its power.  The movie was passed up for theatrical distribution, although it was readily available on VHS and now on DVD from Fox Lorber.This DVD is a bust in every thinkable way, although Fox Lorber was obviously aiming very low.  The phrase "bare-bones" is usually used to describe discs that are given rudimentary, dismissive releases, lacking supplements that more presumably marketable titles might warrant.  This DVD does contain a trailer, but the trailer, sadly, looks better than the feature.  "Bare-bones" would have been fine, but watching this disc is torture.It's obviously a quickie transfer from the VHS -- I could have produced a better amateur transfer -- with a loud hiss tainting the soundtrack throughout, poor audio balance (with dialogue pulsing between speakers in an artificial echo) poor contrast, a muddy, dark image, burnt-in subtitles, and so forth.  Fox Lorber were long the scourge of the art-film DVD market, and their soulless neglect of their titles has never been more apparent than in this disc.  New Yorker and Wellspring (formerly Winstar) are guilty of similar offenses</review_text>
This film was probably made not to entertain the audience, but more to show as much as possible the reality of the terrible agresion on Bosnia. But it does so for a small part only, showing the Bosniaks and Serbs living together peacefuly before the agresion. With the begin of hostilities this film leaves its half-folkloral nature and becomes a pure propaganda movie of serbian nationalists. Its attempt to blind the viewer, hoping he never watchs news or read a newspaper, is amaturelike and fails not only through its fake of reality, but also through poor cinematografic form. The dialogs are poor and the actors definitely not worth the theme of the movie. Handfull of interesting phrases and few fleshes of situation are by far not enough to save the movie from the abyss. The handling shows several onlogical moments. And as a concept of &quot;we all suffered and we Serbs did not start the war&quot; it only makes a serious and average informed viewer laughing. This movie does not entertain at all, and shows the events as unrealistic as any B - movie about Vietnamwar. And about facts it shows only that there are very unserious and nationalistic directors and producers in Serbia. My rating is absolutely thumb down. Comparing with, for example, No Man's Land this motion picture is failing in everything that makes movies about war a potential time window about occurences in former Yugoslavia. Instead to jump into the minds of people that participated the war, You can only get an idea of dogma that the director is trying to spread by making this underaverage movie</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
...but, sadly, falls way short.  They have a great storyline with a twisted triangle and intense power struggles but the filming is so choppy that one scene ends and the next begins, sometimes with no connection.  The scenes do not blend into each other, forming a movie that is pleasant to watch.  This movie jumps from one place to another that seems to contradict but with no explanation of the change.  One scene the main girl is wildly in love with her husband, is forgiving of the king's adulterous intentions and is supremely happy.  Shortly thereafter, she wants revenge on every person she's ever met. Yes, she was betrayed, in a way, but not by EVERYone.  The only real high point of the movie is Timothy Dalton, who is a great actor, but this was a lousy setting for his talent.  Also, considering the plot of the movie, there were no intimate scenes.  The only thing that happens in the bedroom is the king beats the girl and he nurses her back from smallpox.  All in all, this story had great potential that was sadly wasted in this movie</review_text>
I've been a Timothy Dalton fan ever since I saw Jane Eyre, but this movie is difficult to take even for the most devoted.  Please do not  waste your money</review_text>
The most memorable part of this film was the dance scene to "Night Life" which would repeat through the movie.  This version credits the song, but it was replaced with some lame disco music. I am writing MGM to complain and demand a refund.  Even the trailer has the right music playing all through it.Demand the original</review_text>
I bought this. It is sacriligious and NOTHING at all like the Biblical story. It is immoral. I threw it in the trash because I did not want anyone else to see it</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
I saw the show on stage.  I saw most of the original productions that are reprised in this.  Unfortunately, this is Ann Reinking's version of Bob Fosse.  Reinking is a great performer who was considered the quintessential Fosse dancer of the 70's and 80's created this tribute.  The difference is Ann Reinking has taken the Fosse style and utilized this to create a style of her own.As a tribute to Fosse this is inaccurate.  Therefore, for Fosse aficiandos this is not an acurate recreation but an interpretation of his works.  Also, there is a too big reliance on his concept musical "Dancin'".The one good thing in this is the addition of another Fosse creation Ben Vereen.  He shows why he can still pack a house.My suggestion is to rent Fosse films like Sweet Charity and All that Jazz.  You'll get to see the real Fosse</review_text>
Watching this movie is about as much fun as having your wisdom teeth pulled. Boring and tacky even by horror standards, the only fun comes from seeing the psychic kids' future wicked stepfather being eaten by the monster that lives in his closet, hence the title. I've seen far worse, but those worse movies were more &quot;enjoyable&quot; than this. The following morning you probably won't remember having seen it. If only the monster had eaten this movie's negative, then we would all be spared</review_text>
I like westerns but in this film Raquel Welch and Dean Martin were down your capacities. Ever will be nice look Welch 's body but the film is only that.</review_text>
Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!</review_text>
An average movie with average performances. Glosses over many of the details in the book and ignores the role of many important characters. It wont appeal much to the general audience and neither will it satisfy the people who have already read the book.</review_text>
I was surprised to see Larry Gelbart wrote the screenplay of this unfunny movie.  I can recall very few laughs in this film.  The premise of the film is to highlight the greed of the 1980's, but the lesson is quite dated in the era of Enron and WorldCom.  The greed here is apparent and at least honest and upfront, in contrast to the dishonesty and deception of some of the greed of the late 1990's.  As for the message, I certainly don't think the shareholders of RJR Reynolds minded being courted so well.  If I were a shareholder of a slumping company I'd be mighty grateful to live in a society where people have the freedom to pay whatever crazy price they want for my stock!  James Garner is wonderful in this show, and the movie does a nice job of laying out the business concepts in terms your grandmother can understand.  I do have to confess, however, to dozing a bit in the middle of this movie, so perhaps I missed the funny parts</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
Fredro Starr is a good actor.in fact what ever happened to the group Onyx? but this film is cliched and Predictable.Rhea Perlman looks out of place.this is a 2nd tier Above The Rim</review_text>
This is one of the funniest movies i have ever seen a must see so bad it is funn</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
Like most people who made the effort to see this movie, I read Tim Sandlin's book and thoroughly enjoyed it.Unfortunately for this movie, Sandlin is a far better novelist than screenwriter.The film is disjointed, awkward, and hard to follow. It quickly hops from one important moment of the book to another, allowing almost no time to understand the characters and their motivations or appreciate the bizarre circumstances of the story.The casting isn't bad-- a prepubescent Mischa Barton was a fine choice (a hysterical one for fans of the O.C.), and Jennifer Jason Leigh is also respectable, although she doesn't fit her character's physical description-- but that doesn't nearly make up for the film's jumpy direction and half-baked plot.In sum, this is a dissatisfying and substandard film. Undoubtedly, the subject matter is better suited for a novel, and Sandlin's humor and talents are better utilized there.Read his books. Avoid this movie.</review_text>
An accessible story with all the elements of a Great American Novel was somehow transformed into a perverse, worst of the worst ABC Afterschool Specials. If you had not read the book, you would be unable to follow what was happening. Some of the worst directing and editing I have seen in a long time. The original Evil Dead, with all its flaws, is a better put together film than this one. This movie is flat-out painful to watch. You get no justifications whatsoever as to why the characters behave as they do. It all seems so random. Read the book. If you see this movie in a rental store, just move along, please, nothing to see here</review_text>
Kwok is on fire in this movie with maybe his best physical performance ever. He looks like a pop star but his acting is actually very good. Unfortunately, his performance is completely wasted in a movie this bad. I won't explain the story, it is cops vs. drug dealers. There is a beautiful fighting female, good car chases, big name stars, and good fights. How did this movie go wrong? Well, Stanley Tong is a decent director, but he is a stuntman, screen fighter, and martial arts choreographer at heart. He tries to make this an American movie but he disregards everything that gives feeling to movies. I cracked a smile more than a few times but this is the most mindless modern day film I have seen in a long time. Usually, I am able to get past all of this since I am a sucker for good fight scenes, and this movie does have a few. Highlights to watch for are Ken Lo vs. Marc Dacoscos and Dacoscos vs. everyone in the final fight. The thing that ruins this movie is that the real final fight never finishes, but instead it moves on to a totally ridiculous fight to finish off the movie. 'Cradle to the Grave' has a better end fight! Stanley Tong must have been out of his mind because in the finale, Coolio ends up as the main opponent. Not Ken Lo who is the leg fighter that faces Jackie Chan at the end of 'Drunken Master 2', and not Marc Dacoscos who is one of the very best modern day martial arts actors, but Coolio.I honestly thought this was a good cheesy movie, but the final fight sequence is just horrible. Stanley Tong comes up with a great idea having the actors fighting on a huge piece of glass hundreds of feet in the air and they have to keep their balance while they fight. It is just too bad Coolio had to ruin it. 2.5/5DVD from Dimension Home Video has good sound and picture quality. No special features except the outtakes in the credits which was a much more satisfying end to the movie.</review_text>
The movie is widely considered a classic for Hong Kong action movies.   Leslie Cheung is a fantastic actor, and I enjoyed Bridgitte Lin very much in Chungking Express.  So, even though I don't normally enjoy action movies and certainly not kung fu movies, I still decided to watch this movie.  I was extremely disappointed.  The cinematography is boring and poorly done.  The plot is juvenile.  It is the type of movie that would appeal to teenage boys.  I hated the movie.  However, I fully understand that many, many people love the movie and that it is one of the most important HK movies ever made.</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
Nazi's secretly in LA with a blimp and a whole army?This guy has a jet pack that shoots fire out of it, but it never burns him; it burns other things though.Totally stupid and wierd.There is this super tall guy who is like soooo strong he bends people in half.Jetpacked Germans taking over USA.Give me a break.</review_text>
With as many big names in this I thought it would be amazing....well, it is a corn ball adventure..its set in ancient times yet one man beats someone up, flies off whips out a pair of modern day sunglasses and puts them on and POSES!! (shakes head) its things like this that REALLY hurt the film for many kung fu/hong kong film fans. I REALLY wanted to like this film but couldn't get past the ridiculousness of it. Now corny can be ok at times but this is just rubbish</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
So this movie is made of 2 stories.  The first one is quick and involves Takeshi Kaneshiro and Brigitte Lin.  Both have their stories and I actually found Kaneshiro more interesting.  So this thing ends and the movie should have also.  It should have been a 30 minute movie.  So for the next hour or so we get to watch Tony Leung Chiu Wai sit around his apartment in his nothing but a white tank top and his briefs.  Wow, what a movie.  The only positive to the second story is the girl who listens to the same song all day.  She was fun to watch but I still wish I wouldn't have seen this dumb movie.</review_text>
Everybody I know loves this film. In today's environment, when WKW is being hailed as the premier director from Asia, and one of the world's best, I don't know how many really actually love the film, and how many don't have the courage to state a contrary opinion. Make no mistake, I think WKW is one of the greatest directors I have ever watched - how can somebody who makes a movie like "In The Mood For Love" (ITMFL) not be? Actually, his greatness lies not just in his ability to make a movie like ITMFL, but in his versatility. It is almost impossible to conceive that the same person made both ITMFL and Chungking. Well, his greatness notwithstanding, I can't stand this film. And no, I can't sit, lie, or do anything else with it either.So what is it about this movie which gets my goat? The directorial style, and the cinematography. Actually, I think parts of the latter are great, and the parts I don't like are influenced by the former, so let me just talk about the former. WKW uses a particular style which extends across most of his other films, including "Happy Together" and "Fallen Angels" (yes, I've seen all of them, and hate almost all of them uniformly). The hallmark of this style is a very modern, staccato, piecemeal approach, stringing together relatively disparate ideas, scenes, or action sequences (almost reminiscent of Godard's "Breathless", as the editorial review says here, though not quite). His style is further marked by characteristic filming styles - for example, the slow shutter speed effect. Actually, this is one of his peeves, which even spills over to ITMFL, where it oh-so-doesn't-fit-and-stands-out-like-a-sore-thumb. Having watched nearly all his films, and having seen the wide array of situations across which is deploys this mechanism, and having spent hours analyzing the potential connecting theme, I can assure you that there is absolutely no uniformity and sense to its usage. It gets used for dream-like sequences, for grounded reality; for sentimental togetherness, for aloofness; for tears, for laughter; for thoughts, for action; the list goes on. WKW similarly uses other weapons in his vast director's repertoire to some bizarre effects, taking improvisation to an extreme where it stops being laudatory.The above notwithstanding, let me round off by saying that if the kind of style I have delineated above appeals to you, then you should definitely watch this film, for outside of his jarring style, WKW has pieced together a great story and actors. As for myself, I will continue to watch every one of his films, living in the suspense of what this genius will do next - make me fall in love, or hate.</review_text>
This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence</review_text>
I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
Shark Attack is an interesting tale of deceit and stolen shark footage.  The movie features some computer harpooning police men and a crazy fisherman turned taxi driver.  The most interesting part is all the shark footage...  The best scene is after the bad guy/hotel owner is eaten, the shark clearly shown with a hook in it's mouth being pulled towards a boat.  This of course has nothing at all to do with the plot.  So where did this hook come from?  It was probably I was trying to stab in my eyes to stop the pain of this movie</review_text>
Read the Unbox terms of use CAREFULLY before choosing this route over a regular DVD purchase.  It is not your usual set of "blah blah" legal jargon.For example, 3c:"Removal of Software. If you uninstall or otherwise remove the Software, your ability to view all Digital Content you have downloaded to the Authorized Device will immediately and automatically terminate and we reserve the right to delete all Digital Content from that Authorized Device without notice to you."If you ever remove the Unbox software, Amazon may revoke your ability to view the Firefly episodes you paid for and may even delete them from your machine!Amazon, I've ordered literally thousands of dollars of stuff through you and always had a great experience; why did you let Unbox create these anti-customer terms of use??</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
The movie is frustrating and a big disappointment. And, what is the point of everything being so white?  Is there some deep meaning here or something?  This movie is exasperating</review_text>
The movie is great but the cd is defective.  It keeps on getting stuck on the same spot.  I'm trying to return it but I can't get any reply to my e-mails</review_text>
This is one of our favorite movies.....but, when we sat down to enjoy it, the last 2 scene segments would not play.  Very unsettling</review_text>
Don't waste your time or money with this DVD.  The best part of the DVD is probably the Trailers and most of those are Garbage also.  My DVD came loose in the package and scratched, too bad it didn't do any damage to ruin the Movie.  I couldn't wait until the Movie was over, I would have stopped it earlier, but wanted to see if any damage was done.  You'll be counting the minutes and seconds after watching the first half or even earlier.  The last story was stupid and horrible and should have been left off.  Don't waste your money, spend it on the cheap $5-6 horror DVD's, because at least those can be somewhat entertaining</review_text>
To put it succinctly, Brendan Fraser is a college senior who ends up writing a ridiculously long thesis, which is then swiped by Joe Pesci, the homeless dude who, predictably, is really quite wise.  The problem is that his "wise" sayings aren't really too wise; he's like the guy you know who is always trying to sound intelligent, but doesn't really know that much. Joe Pesci's character is pretty annoying.  That's probably why he ended up friends with Brendan Fraser's character</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
This is the first time I delved into the HellRaiser series, and I have to admit, I kind of regret it. The film opens with a collage of disturbing images, I guess to get my attention, but there is no real reason for them to be there. From there the film falls into a freefall where it jumps from one messed up scene to the next. It all looks perfectly twisted, but who really cares. Clive Barker, as he did in "Night Breed," shows his taste for creative costumes and set designs. Of course they are all very self-indulgent, but beautiful nonetheless in their own little way. Had this film showed up at a modern art museum I would have labeled it pretentious. But since it showed up in movie theaters I have no choice but to label it crap.I would love to describe the plot to you, but it didn't make a ton of sense to me. Kirsty (Ashley Laurence) is in a mental hospital and is convinced that her dad is calling out to her from inside hell, and thus she must go save him. Meanwhile her evil step-mom (and speaking from experience they are all evil) is reemerging from hell with the distinct disadvantage of not having any skin. Upon her return she uses her bloody pulp of a body to engage in a sexual act with another evil doer. I'm sure that gets laughs every time from the children who are watching, but to me it was silly and unnecessary. She goes on a quest for skin which goes off without a hitch, and from there a battle ensues between Kirsty and her step-mom over the soul of a little girl named Tiffany (or so everybody calls her). The whole point seems to be that our minds make up our own personal hells, and that is an idea I can get on board with. One overview shot of hell has it looking strikingly similar to an M.C. Escher print. With dead ends and trap doors and boogeymen we all travel through the labyrinth of our mind on a daily basis. But I cannot get on board with this film. It is sensational for the sake of sensationalism, which is fine with me, but not when it is mixed with a brain dead plot. What do I, or anybody for that matter, get from watching a man carve himself up with a knife? I guess that at least it is not soft like modern horror movies, but this one does not earn its gore.For those of you who demand nothing out of your movies other than the experience of a bad dream where nothing makes sense then this is your film. For the rest of you this is failed storytelling of the highest degree. I still have "HellRaiser" on my shelf to watch and I must say it won't be hard for that one to top this mess. I may never understand why people think atmosphere is enough to create a scary movie. It is the major flaw of this film and Japanese Horror in general, but I want a story to go with my scares. What this one is selling is a chance to be grossed out of your mind or bored stiff. . .or both. I hated this movie, and no I don't care how realistic it looked when the characters were peeling the skin off of their faces. *1/2</review_text>
Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped</review_text>
"The World According to Garp" is on my top 5 list of favorite books of all time.  It's one of those rare books that makes you laugh out loud, but still really feel the emotion of the characters, and the story really sticks with you.  (I made a joke about an Ellen Jamesian just the other day, lol ~ yes, it was a dumb joke that no one else got, but, that's how it goes sometimes :)  I was introduced to the book in college, well after the book and the movie were released, but I had never heard of either one.  I read the book in just a couple of days ~ I couldn't put it down, and I chatted it up with everyone who would listen.  I've re-read it several times since then, and i still think it's terrific.  Naturally, when i found out there was already a movie . . . I was thrilled!  I ordered it right away . . . but i wish i'd never wasted my money.  On it's own, the movie might be alirght.  But when you're invested in the book, when you know the characters, Robin Williams just isn't Garp.  I love Robin Williams, he's a great comedian, that's not a question.  I just think that the casting for this part was way off base.  and if you can't believe the main character, the rest of it's crap.   If you've never read the book, I highly recommend it!!</review_text>
Except for two cuties: William Zabka and Dana Ashbrook! Especially Dana who constantly having a hard-on</review_text>
After watching this lame, stupid sequel all I can say is "Leave it alone already!" God this film sucked. First, after 25 years of trying to escape from brother Michael, this is how Laurie Strode goes out???!!! Major let down, it should have been more shocking and spectacular. Second, while "20 Years Later/Halloween 7" was made for Lifetime, this one seems to have been made for MTV. All Dimension films has done for this franchise since taking it over for Part 6, is give it style, no substance whatsoever. The only one of their 3 sequels that was remotely scary was 6, fully due to bringing back the guy who played Michael in 4(the last good Halloween film)George Wilbur, he's sorely missed but probably too old for the part now. Third, I'm so sick of rappers and models thinking they can act as is the case in this film with Busta Rhymes and Tyra Banks. No talent Busta needs to stick to cursing and throwing his hands around to a repetitive beat and Tyra needs to stick to walking a catwalk in some designer dress with her mouth shut. They suck. Hopefully Hollywood feels the same way since I haven't seen them in anything since, thank god. Fourth, the story is just another retread with a new gimmick, the internet web cam. Poorly executed, no suspense at all in this film. The film was originally suppossed to be released for Halloween '01, but they had to do reshoots to improve the film, unsuccessfully I might add, so it was released in summer '02. Funny, this film was directed by the same guy who directed "Halloween II"(the best sequel). Even funnier is the fact that they had to do reshoots for that one as well, but John Carpenter did them and it DID improve the film. His touch is sorely missed here.So, if dreadful acting(except Jaime Lee Curtis, but she's only in the first 10 minutes, unfortunately), boring, dumb story and dialogue, shockless, routine kill scenes and no scares or suspense(unless your 10 years old and have never seen a horror film) if all that's your cup of tea then by all means watch or buy this waste of time, money & effort(if there was any). It's just another insult to fans of the original.And now, for next Halloween('07) we will get "Halloween:The Remake" directed by none other than the man who brought us the classic(NOT!!!) "House Of 1000 Corpses", Rob Zombie!I'm also sick of bad singers thinking they can direct. The choice is refective of Hollywood nowadays, style over substance, cool and trendy over timeless and great.</review_text>
Look...to be fair, one man's BOTE is another man's &quot;Manos&quot;. What I mean by that is some people may love this ep, but I personally didn't find it very funny and the movie is so bad that the sub-average riffing doesn't save it. The best lines that Mike &amp; the robots make are when they speak for a character and add a line to something a person says. Unfortunately, the feature's horrible pacing, slow dialogue scenes, and atrocious acting are not enough, and it seems like the writers took a break on this one. Of course, even weak MST3K is better than pretty much any other show, but I must say this is certainly my least favorite episode from season 5 and at times feels like a Season 1 episode (the riffing is sparse and not really funny). If you are a newcomer and would like to see this show at it's best, get either &quot;Manos: Hands of Fate&quot; or &quot;Red Zone Cuba&quot;</review_text>
When I watched this movie, I have to say, I thought it was pretty pointless.  Napolean Dynamite is, too, but it's funny.  This isn't quite up to Dynamite standards, I'm afraid.  It's not as squeaky clean as good ol' Napolean, either.  Don't buy it.  If you must see it, rent it</review_text>
As ex-infantry I found this a big disappointment and almost unwatchable. This low budget movie spoils the book. A supposed highlight is the SAS field craft, but that's a bad joke. The SAS troop crowds around for camera shots, all the while talking loudly if not shouting. Bog normal infantry don't do this never mind the best of the best, the SAS. The fire-fight sequences are passable. The interrogation is the strongest part of the movie but can't make up for the rest of it. The foul language Even if it's what they used in the field, should have been ameliorated for the movie and it detracts a lot, making it unsuitable for many audiences</review_text>
Oh PLEASE - whoever has the rights to dub off the original 1972 Masterpiece Theater TV series of 'Cousin Bette' do so and make it available on DVD.   This was one of THE finest shows ever created for television.  Truly, it totally eclipses the 1998 movie version and now, 40+ years later, I fear it will soon not be physically possible to render this production to DVD.  For the sake of one of the theater (and humanity's) most glorious theatrical efforts, PLEASE make the original TV version available!  (BTW - I rate the ORIGINAL item at 5+ STARS!</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
I think a lot of the high scores given to this movie were based on emotion and patriotism. However, judged purely on its cinematic merits, this movie is simply not very good. The premise is excellent, and if properly executed, the movie could have been superb, but it rapidly turns into an endless barrage of cartoonish cliches that have all been done countless times (and better) in movies like the Dirty Dozen.See if any of these concepts seem familiar: gather a rag tag team of misfits, take them to a secluded training site where they are quickly and miraculously turned into dedicated, disciplined fighters (in this case by chopping down trees and carrying poles around....the Navy Seals must have it all wrong). Their mission suffers several immediate reversals (usually due to the "evil" government), but the team members all bravely vote to continue anyway, improvising as they go. Naturally, a couple are killed (usually the big and/or ugly ones), but the majority emerge relatively unscathed and victorious (to a crescendo of soul-stirring music).This movie may indeed have been loosely based on real events, but I  absolutely positively guarantee you that the way the REAL soldiers looked, acted, and prepared for the mission bears no, and I mean NO, resemblance to this gaggle of ninnies.Indeed, superficial, formulaic, laughably simplistic movies like this are not only a disservice to heroic reality, they are an insult. Check out the perfect haircut and snow white teeth on the prisoner rescued last (Robert Stack's "son")....ridiculous!!!It's a shame that an accurate movie could not have been made about the real mission, instead of this silly, sanitized, trite visualization. One last question: what is the net gain in sacrificing four people to save four people? Is this really a "victory"? Buy it, rent it, watch it if you must....then see whose review hits this cliched nail on the head</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
right off the bat, JJ runs into an indian in the middle of nowhere, the indian has is gun JJ doesnt, oh boy the tension fills the air, no wait, for the FIRST TIME EVER, the indian turns and rides away, does NOT kill the white man, who is all alone on the Indians land, trying to catch HIS fish.     liberal revisionist trying to make the indian look like he is better than the white man, and oh smarter also, for just after that, JJ is trying to get a fire going "but" does this under a tree that has snow all over it, he gets the fire going and oh darn!  snow fell on it!  dumb white man!If this movie didnt have superstar Robert Redford in it, would of been just another dumb movie, like that idiot Timmy that made Grizzly Man.An Indian that lets a white man live all out in the middle of nowhere, LOL!  yes the white man stole the land, yes the white man did this that and everything else to the indians.   But its not like they were angels, they fought with each other just like the rest of the world has always done throught history.   to deny that, is just plain stupid.The 1970's, marks the turning point the liberals took over Hollyweird.  Clint Eastwood never would of made this move in the 1960's, or ever.</review_text>
i love nature and cowboy movies.  Jeremiah Johnson was on of the best movies i've seen.  it is unforgetable.  It was my favorite  RobertRedford movie.  He did very little talking talking in this movie, he just acted, his best performance ever.  the movie deals with the american indian also, in a profound and touching way.  this movie is engrossing and based on a true story,  it's simply the best. Don't miss the opportunity to see this movie, it is a classic.  It truly is in a league of it's own.</review_text>
I'm rather upset with the technical quality of this DVD.  Grindhouse rereleased this disc exactly as it was in 2000, without so much as a 16x9 animorphic upgrade.  This is certainly not worth the $20+ dollar price tag Amazon.com has right now</review_text>
If you aren't really into jokes about the difference between black/white, sex, drugs and how bad gays are this is not for you.I had seen other stuff by Pryor I always liked but this time I never once really laughed out loud. It was dissapointing, good thing he has so many other good stuf</review_text>
Richard Pryor is my all-time favorite stand-up comedian.  I consider him the best in the business.  But his performance in  &quot;Live and Smokin&quot; shows he's still just a rookie.  He's nervous in front of the camera, and says so several times. His material   is typically raunchy, but not very funny. You can hear the forced laughter from a few members of the audience. Buy this tape only if you're a die-hard Pryor fan, but don't expect the side-splitting laughter you'll get from &quot;In Concert&quot;, &quot;Live on the Sunset Strip&quot;, and &quot;Here and Now&quot;</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
I found the DVD to be completey inappropriate for children.  Too much violance and too much swearing.  My kids watched 5 minutes of it and its now in the garbage</review_text>
I watched this movie, seeing that it was a "shark" movie. But where's the shark?? The plot is these people are hostages. The shark is just there so us shark fanatics have a reason to see this awful movie. But I was watching going, "okay, they're in the water, where is the shark???" Even JAWS 3, (which sucked) has more sharks. If you like hoatage movies, see this. (on second thought, don't...) But if you like sharks, see something else</review_text>
This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
As a lover of many types of music, this movie sparked my interest....so I rented it.  I found myself thinking throughout the movie "I can't believe I'm actually watching this.  What a waste!"  Not only was the plot slow to the point of boring, but the film exalted lesbianism to the point that I (as a grown woman) actually fast-forwarded through a couple of scenes.  The small amount of goodness in the movie was not worth all of the disappointing twists and turns of the story.  Also, please carefully consider before allowing children to watch!! I will NEVER, under any circumstances watch this movie again. (I want the reader to know that I am in no way a movie critic.  I am writing this strictly as someone who wishes to steer others away from what I found to be a complete waste of an evening.</review_text>
Considered by many fans to be the best season ever, Survivor: The Australian Outback - The Complete Second Season is being released April 26, 2005. This brief review of the season is ok, but the season set is definitely the better buy. The season set is six discs, one of them being this disc. DO NOT BUY THIS IF YOU ARE BUYING THE SEASON SET</review_text>
Nothing but a lame excuse to show the overrated Barrymore's face on the screen again</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
The man died as he lived a loser. This uneducated thug was nothing more than a racist piece of crap. Plain and simple truth. The only praise he deserves is praise that he is dead. Thats one less racist thug off the streets. A two year old can write better music than he did. Heck calling his stuff music is an insult to music and musicians every wher</review_text>
The extreme reviews here are very misleading; people either say it's the worst film ever made or Godard's best film. Don't believe either camp. If you're not an expert on Godard and/or 1960s avant-garde cinema, I could definitely see a person writing off this movie as "sheer pretentious crap", but that opinion would derive from a mixture of shock and ignorance. On the other hand, those who say this is Godard's finest work must be riding high on acid and Marxism themselves. The truth of the matter is that "Weekend", like every one of Godard's post-Anna Karina films, is more a flawed experiment than anything else: On occasion, interesting and thought-provoking, but more often static and didactic to the point of alienating the viewer rather than converting them. I respect Godard's attempt to create a new cinema built on "ideas" rather than "emotion", but in my opinion, he went too far in this direction. A piece of art devoid of any emotion is a hollow experience and don't we have enough of that in our crude, consumerist society? And as far as experiments go, much of what he was doing in "Weekend", he had already done and with vastly better results in  "Pierrot le Fou". That film was a perfect balance between Godard the political-scientist and Godard the post-modern film-maker. Plus, "Pierrot le Fou" benefited by having Jean-Paul Belmondo and Anna Karina. They brought heart and humor to Godard's abstract explosion of ideas; a perfect symbiotic relationship between director and actor(s) that he never achieved again. "Weekend" starts off very promising with the sex dialogue and the long tracking shot of the traffic-jam, leading to a car-crash...but then it descends into a grating mess of dated ideology and too much dead space. You really wish Belmondo and Karina would pop in and show the cast they don't have to be mere nails to Godard's hammer.</review_text>
I honestly can't believe that Robert Patrick wasted his time on this piece of [junk] movie.  Ugh!  One of the worst movies I've seen in quite a while</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
If you are looking for a good story and character development, this movie dissapoints. The story is rather thin and slow with more focus on Joe's good looks. A irritatating aspect of the DVD was white flashes occuring at  innapropriate moments during the movie</review_text>
I've taken kickboxng classes and have owned other kickboxing DVDs but did not like this one. Its boring, Kathy seems to be doing a number of the moves in an awkward manner and the other people on set are distracting -- from their outfits to their sloppy moves. Skip this one</review_text>
At first I didn't realize that you have to use Amazon's software to load onto the Zen.  Once I figured that out (actually my husband figured that out) the show played perfectly and it was very easy to do.  I wasn't able to edit the stars.  If I could I would give this 5 stars.  If you have tried some other sites for the Zen, they are much more difficult to use. Amazon's Unbox is great for the Zen</review_text>
I am appalled at the greed that Disney must have to milk out a classic like "The Absent Minded Professer". I found this to be one of the worst if not the worst remake of any movie. I found the plot to be too embelished as it made for the relationship between the characters played by Robin Williams and Marsha Gay-Hayden to be one of where it either tried to remake the safe and easy happy ending that's throughout all Disney movies, or it showed to be one where the parties had to wear their hearts out on their sleeves. I also feel that with the Character of "Flubber" it was a waste of time considering I don't remember any merchandising from the character. They should've stayed with the bouncing rubber balls from the original. I also feel that with the promotion of the Flubber substance that it was all shallow, and commericial as where in the original it was going to be put to good use in the military, and here it was to make a buck. I feel that there are some movies that are best to just be left in original state, and not be remade, and this is one of them.</review_text>
I thought I'd be nice in giving film two stars even though it pretty much deserves none at all. I wasn't old enough at the time, but I'm sure fans were slightly bemused at the re-emergence of Friday the 13th.  Tommy, now a teenager (and a bloody old one at that) is residing at the local mental institution still traumatised by the terror of Jason and also the death of his mother.  Tommy is plagued by dreams and nightmares convinced that Jason is back from the dead.  And it seems he may be right, when a series of murders begins. But who could it possibly be THIS time. Jason is dead, isn't he?It's up to Tommy to fight his demons once again and get to the bottom of things before he himself becomes the victim of Jason Voorhees?Friday the 13th Part 5 is a perfect example of how sequels in horror can ruin what went before.  The body count in this is ridiculously high and the gore itself leaves a lot to be desired.  Was it really necessary? Is too much, too much?The only ounce of credibility in this film is Harry Manfredini's reprisal musical score.  Other than that, you'd be forgiven for skipping this Friday the 13th entry</review_text>
You talk about disappointed, this is the icing on the cake.  All I hear about is how scary and cutting edge this was.  Not even close.  Whatever big shot film critics say that are truly wrong.  I love older movies too and am open minded to the change in times and such. There are actually some scary or at least entertaining horror flicks during the 70's, but this is not one of them....seriously, don't buy this.  I don't know why it is so highly regarded.  The acting, story, and especially the music is EL TERRIBLE'.  It's like porn quality acting, a story written in about 25 minutes and music from a Disney movie.  It could have been a good movie if they would have taken out the attempt at comedy, through in some disturbing music, and made the bad guys, well, more bad.  It could be remade (which i'm usually against)</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
This movie survives in my memory for over 40 years as one of the most boring stupid excuses for a comedy ever made.  I use it as a benchmark to compare all other really bad comedies.  They are either worse than this one (rare) or better than this one. As an example: Buffalo '66 is worse.  If you watch both in the same day, you will surely die</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
Colorado's San Juan Mountains from Durango to Silverton to Ouray is myfavorite place to vacation in the USA.  So when I saw the preview ofDurango Kids on another DVD, I decided to rent it on Netflix.  It isone of those movies where villains are cartoonish, and the kids, whilecute, outsmart all the stupid adults.  The first 30 minutes showed somenice locations in and around Durango, including the steam train (that'swhy I purchased a used copy) but then it goes into time travel to saveOuray from becoming a ghost town and the movie becomes a stupid bore,intended for young and undemanding children.  Don't bother unless youlove Durango as much as I do</review_text>
The dynamic Root duo deliver yet another yawner in this painful children's comedy.  My advice to Root is that he should be selling barbeques rather than this silly trash.  The only thing that redeems this movie is the acting of the child Curtis.  Big props to my man for his preformance.  Hope to see you in more movies to come.p.s. I think Taylor Root is still a virgin</review_text>
This has always been a favorite film of mine.  The story is old-fashioned yet fun and the cast is divine.  Despite having the VHS, I wanted more and ordered the DVD.Beware!  This DVD claims on its packaging to have Closed Captioning, but it does NOT!!  No subtitles in any language,  no line 21 captioning.Nor does it have anything else.  "Interactive Menus" means scene selections.  This plain vanilla release doesn't even have a trailer. This film and cast deserves better and I see no reason Lion's Gate reissued this DVD with nothing added.Since I bought it online, I can't return it and neither Lion's Gate nor Artisan will take it back despite the error in labeling and false advertising which is not the fault of the people I bought it from</review_text>
Just awful slasher picture with not one hint of real talent behind it. The first movie I ever walked out of,and I was home!!!! THE PITS!!!!!!!</review_text>
Another tired story about the Blackman as the horrible villian and the Blackwoman as the innocent victim...And we wonder why our community has so many problems..Maybe it's because of attitudes that are based on fantasy like this film and some other films..."Color Purple" , "For Colored Girls...." etc. We need to stop the finger pointing a realize that liberation can only occur if we "work together"...That means Blackmen and Blackwomen..</review_text>
This movie tries way too hard to the point that it becomes a painful melodrama filled with gratuitous dialogue and over-acting.  I found this movie to be thoroughly unsatisfying</review_text>
I thought this movie was decent but nothing spectacular.  It kept me awake but just on the verge.  The few comical scenes helped to keep me interested as did the totally unexpected ending which was probably the best part of the entire movie.  I thought the acting in this movie was just mediocre at best. Overall I was not impressed with the movie but the few good scenes earned it two stars over just the lonely one star.</review_text>
The only seen that i like is where he had Crap all over the walls of the bathroom and Bob Saget went crazy yelling</review_text>
If I ever:a) subject myself to this movie ever againorb) subject anyone else (including animals) to this movieForm a mob and follow through with my wish in the title of this review.Just one question that still haunts me...How does Travolta's career survive this debacle and Pepper's hits the tank?</review_text>
There are not many movies I have switched off after the first 30 minutes, but this is one of them, and I recommend you rent this one first before you buy or else you might have a nasty surprise</review_text>
My 14 month old son loves the Baby Einstein series.  They've been the only movies to hold his attention.  The sounds and music get his attention, the shapes and colors hold it.That said, this movie never got or held his attention.  There are no interesting sounds or music.  The voices are very monotone.  While I understand the intention of this video, if you don't catch the attention of the child, what's the worth in it?  The pictures on the screen do not corrolate well with what is being said.  I also believe that there is value in learning not only foreign languages, but foreign cultures.  If I knew what was being said when nursery rhymes or poems are recited, I could repeat them in english as an additional learning tool.  All around, this move was disappointing</review_text>
The languages and images don't connect. We were given this as a gift because of the linguistic value, but instead the entire dvd doesn't offer it. The other dvds in this collection are great. This one failed to teach anything</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
This movie survives in my memory for over 40 years as one of the most boring stupid excuses for a comedy ever made.  I use it as a benchmark to compare all other really bad comedies.  They are either worse than this one (rare) or better than this one. As an example: Buffalo '66 is worse.  If you watch both in the same day, you will surely die</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
I originally read the novel (of which I assume most of the other reviewers are unaware) and watched the earlier German film of the same name for a college course entitled "Memory and Mourning in Post-War Germany."I'd just like to point out that the film is a horrible depiction of the novel. It seems that the director wanted to make a more "Hollywood" version of the film, and I think he succeeded. For instance, the entire ending is completely different from that of the novel, and in my opinion is completely wrong for the story.In general, the film has little to do with any of the original versions, and is far inferior</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
I LOVED the book and made the mistake of buying the movie without watching it first. This movie is boring and did no justice to the book</review_text>
This recording is simply DEFECTIVE.It opens with a disclamer about the quality of the recording, and boy, they are not kidding!This is not a simple case of VHS quality on a DVD.  Instead the video quality is comporable to the first live broadcast from the 1969 moon landing.  And the audio quality is in the same league as early cheap casette recorders, complete with pitch shifts..It is clear that abosoltely no attempt was made to clean up or remaster this recording.  Even the title credits suffer from from jitter distortion and there is time base noise at the bottom of each frame.Some example frames at VienneseBall dot org slash PiratesThis is particularly criminal because it was such a superb cast and inspired live performance.I am immediately returning this to Amazon.  This recording should never have been released</review_text>
I just purchased the 2 disc, special edition of this movie, and here's my problem(s):First off, I don't speak Italian, so my only options are to watch the film with the English dub, or with the Italian dub with the English subtitles, but here's the problem; the English dub is out of sync with the film, sometimes being only slightly so, but other times being very noticeable and distracting (i.e. during loud sound effects, such as a chair being knocked over, or someone knocking loudly on a door).And so my other option is the Italian bud with the English subs, but here's the problem with this, the English subs are missing during the scene where Peggy is reading the diary (about 30+ minutes into the movie).Now, I had noticed missing subs during the first part of the film, but these where usually during background conversations, or occasionally a line would be missing from someone's speech, but could usually be figured out, and these where only slightly annoying, but the missing subs for the diary entry is inexcusable (and is also missing from the other subs as well) as this is an important bit of info to the plot of the story.Also, when you set up the audio option, from the main menu, there's no problem, but I found that if you use the audio button on your DVD remote, the Italian option gives you the French soundtrack and the French gives you the Italian one. It's nothing serious, but it's an annoyance all the same.So, does anyone else notice these problems, or did I just end up with a bum disc</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
foul. just plain foul. seemingly never-ending..and not in a good way. tasteless. sick. not even worth the beautiful faces. Heck, I can't even write a proper review because I refused to finish the worthless trash-couldn't tell you what it was about.</review_text>
This is the worst holiday movie in America! I mean if you buy this product you'll face torture (as in singing horribly.) Making friends as the movie says is not the most important thing in the world in my belief. They also said that "If you want, wish for fairy tales and it will come true." Right. Some fairy tales are gruesome (for example this one fairy tale is so gruesome because it has fairies heads cut off.) Eeww! The voice talents are very annoying. Better save your money when you buy a christmas movie</review_text>
I like films that push things to the edge and address taboos, so I was looking forward to this exploration of kink, sadomasochism and Nazism, written and directed both by women.  --Hey, it sure promised to be original.  You can't say "Oh, not *another* movie about a female concentration camp prisoner who grows fond of her tormentor and wants to continue their sadomasochistic relationship a decade later."But despite all the promise of debauchery and a probing of the dark side of human nature, The Night Porter, after the first 40 minutes at least, comes off as a confused, muddled, nonsensical and ultimately unintentionally-comic film, with an arbitrary ending that seemed to happen only because the filmmakers looked at their watch and said, "We're coming up on two hours."The first part of the film, where Lucia recognizes her old captor, now a humble night porter at a Vienna hotel, is well-done.  While I found Dirk Bogarde to be a little wooden, Charlotte Rampling is perfect as the woman--you can still see the scars, but she doesn't overplay them; there's quiet dignity, but also the capacity to feel pain.  A scene where she goes to the opera and sees Bograde watching her, and flashes back to her predicament as she absent-mindedly rubs her once-chained wrists, is understated.  Too bad the rest isn't on that level.Unfortunately, this understatement soon gives way to a second half that's ridiculously over the top.  Bogarde belongs to a sort of "support group" for ex-Nazi camp officers, and together they try to buck each other up, as well as destroy evidence of their past crimes.  I found this subplot laughable--I doubt real Nazi guards ever participated in Dr. Phil-type rap sessions.  There's another sub plot about a gay former SS-guard who's now a ballerina and dances for Bogarde.  I found this subplot bizarre.  This thread sort of fizzles out halfway through the movie, and I'm at a loss as to why it was there in the first place.Then there's the main plot line, which as I said startes off interestingly, but gets pretty silly by the second half, wherein Bogarde and Rampling find themselves cut off from food and being shot at by the other former SS guards, like insurgents holed up in a hideout.  If that sounds weird, it is weird.  The second half makes no literal sense, and one of the former SS-guards himself points out the foibles in Bograde's actions ("Chain can be cut."), yet the film asks us to continue to take it seriously.  Then the ending just comes, out of the blue, with no explanation.Sorry, but this wasn't an "exploration" into the decadence or dark side of the human soul, or of SS decadence.  This was sexploitation in Nazi garb.  The flashback where Rampling dances for the officers in the bar, though sexy in a perverse sort of way, is also silly.  She's supposed to be this meek and frightened concentration camp victim, yet she's dancing like she was born to it.  I don't see an exploration of anything.  I just see an attempt at sexy sadomasochism.  Rampling is so good she *almost* sells me on this, but the others are rather stiff, some of the dialogue is laughable, and the second half is all disjointed.For once Criterion drops the ball in terms of presentation.  The non-anamorphic DVD utilizes a somewhat faded, beat-up print.  The sound is not very good, even for 1974 mono.  There are no extras at all, not even a trailer, not a commentary, nada.  If this is an attempt to "explore" and "examine" our dark side, an analysis by the filmmaker or a film scholar would have been welcome.  Maybe that person could have made heads or tails of this story's resolution.  I cannot, and I cannot recommend this disc very strongly.  It only has Rampling's performance to redeem it, and in the end, that's not quite enough</review_text>
I might have enjoyed this movie more if they hadn't gutted the book, which was a pretty good read. The best character in the book, FBI Special Agent Pendergast, isn't even in the movie, and New York City police Lt. D'Agosta is just a comic caricature of the book's character.Another criticism of the movie is that almost every scene is so dark you can hardly see anything. If the purpose was to create a moody, scary atmosphere, they went way too far.See if you must, but don't expect too much</review_text>
This is a case where the book is wonderful and the movie is just pathetic.  I hadn't read the book before seeing the movie.  The film stunk.  A few years later, I read the book and was enchanted.  I did not make the connection that this was the same story until I saw the film again on late night tv.  I was all excited to see one of my favorite books on the screen.  Then, I realized what movie it was.  I tried to sit through it.  I just couldn't.  The monster should have eaten the film</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
People were talking about this movie as if it were the next Silence Of The Lambs.  There are several reasons why this is not so.1. The Dumbest Cop In The World:  This character never calls for backup, and is too slow to think of the most obvious clues.  At the end, he even throws down his gun to have a fist fight.  He'd never survive on the Sopranos.2. It's sooooooo 1998.  This movie assumes you know nothing about the internet.3. It tries to be cool by combining BDSM, body modification, and rituals, but in the end it just makes all these things look bad.4. It's inconsistent.  The Dee Snider character "retires" all his piercings for a few years, and then suddenly they're all back in the next scene.5. It's unrealistic.  Where the heck did Snider get that second dungeon from in just a day?6. I won't even get into the gaping plot holes.The acting, pretty bad.  The dumbest cop in the world character has just one mood:  Grumpy.  Amy Smart is totally wasted in this movie.  Snider's pretty good though.  Actually he's really good.Really, bottom line:  You have only two reasons to buy this movie.1. You are easily entertained and you have no problem with plot holes so big you can drive a Twisted Sister tour bus through them with room to spare.2. You're a Snider fan and you must own this.If you belong to one of those two groups, go for it.  For Sister fans, they'll enjoy how the movie roughly follows the plot of the song Captain Howdy/Street Justice.You've been warned!</review_text>
"Houseboat" never arrived here.  I have been patiently waiting at the dock, but no boat.  PLEASE send it at once</review_text>
I had the clever idea to compare this version with the new movie.What a mistake.  The original pink panther is an absolute bore.  There is really no story. Essentially, Peter Sellers spends much of the movie trying to get his wife in bed.Major parts of the story make no sense.  Don't waste your time</review_text>
Then you shouldn't call yourself a singer.The "concert" is lypsinch, lypsinch and lypsinch again, there is not any song on it which is live</review_text>
Dario Argento's "Tenebre" is more of a murder mystery with graphic violence rather than a pure horror movie.  This is not a knock on "Tenebre", but having purchased this movie because it was characterized as a "horror movie", I was a bit disappointed overall."Tenebre" is about an author who wrote a book named "Tenebre" which provides details of very graphic images of murder and a killer is using these images verbatim to commit his murders.  What ensues is a pretty good suspense thriller in the mold of a "who dunnit" like murder mystery.  The author begins his own investigation of these crimes and the audience is somewhat prepared for an interesting twist of an ending that is more satisfying to the mystery lover rather than horror movie fanatic.Clearly, there is very little about "Tenebre" that can be characterized as "scary" or terrifying unless the actual violence horrifies you, but a sophisticated horror movie audience will be relatively unmoved and unimpressed at what "Tenebre" has to offer in the areas of horror...sure, there are some incredibly violent and graphic kills, but that alone does not make a good horror movie.Fundamentalists may argue that "Tenebre" does fit the mold of a "slasher movie" and while this is technically accurate, I would argue that this movie, as a whole, lacks the "feel" of a horror movie and is more of a mystery and suspense flick.  Indeed, what Argento does provide in "Tenebre" is a very good murder mystery with some "slasher-movie" like kills.  There is no question that the cinematic atmosphere that is produced by this movie creates great suspense and thrills while very little in the way of "chills".In my mind, "Tenebre" is definitely much better than "Deep Red", but the movies are very similar in style except for a stronger plot development which is clearly evident in "Tenebre".  There is no doubt that Argento has always been long on style and short on plot development, but that is immaterial regarding its erroneous classification as a horror movie.  That being said, Argento's horror masterpiece "Suspiria" and even "Inferno" are clearly much better in the way of producing pure horror than is "Tenebre".I mildly recommend "Tenebre" if you are looking for a good murder mystery movie with some very graphic violence and an intersting twist to the ending, but if you are looking for a good slasher movie or horror flick dealing with similar although not identical subject matter, check out Alfred Hitchcock's immortal classic "Psycho", which is clearly cinematic horror at its finest.</review_text>
Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show</review_text>
This is not a good Tornado disaster movie by any stretch of the imagination. The worse thing about the film is the horrible, unconvincing special-effects! The scene where the family in the car trying to outrun the tornado in the town and the mom shrieking &quot;It's coming closer!&quot; is badly done and also Dan starting to fly out the window and his dad attaining super-human strength pulling him back into the vehicle is incredibly stupid and not dramatic in the slightest. I know, however, a guy named Mike and 2 robots who would probably have to endure this terrible B-grade movie (Actually F-grade) If you want a good, entertaining tornado movie that doesn't include bad acting, bad &quot;Special&quot; FX, bad script and dumb actors check out &quot;Twister&quot</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence</review_text>
Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show</review_text>
I ordered this item several months ago and its yet to arrive</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
I thought thet this movie was the WORST movie ever based on the talent that was involved.  I don't think that Yuen Wah could have been any worse.  Jet Li was pretty good, but how the hell do you screw that up.  Tsui Hark seemingly didn't rush through this movie, but it still turns out horribley.  I would like to go on to explain how the movie was so bad, but I'll just sum it up by saying that not a single part in this movie could have been any worse</review_text>
I like Japanese films, and really wanted to like this one. However I must say there are a lot of confusing parts to the plot. Now I have read this is going to be part of a trilogy one day. If that is true I might give it a higher rating. As of now however, there are just a lot of things that don't make sense</review_text>
Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it</review_text>
Most L &amp; H fans know that the boys made a long series of MGM/FOX pictures which reflected the big studio &quot;assembly line&quot; film-making approach and the wartime atmosphere. Students of film comedy  understand how the &quot;traditional&quot; Stan &amp; Ollie would be  somewhat suppressed in that regard. However, it's very sad to watch a  decent premise with great performers go COMPLETELY to waste, as it does in  AAW - the presence of Edgar Kennedy should lift th proceedings; instead it  reinforces the melancholia. I found the drunken scene most distasteful.  Still, L &amp; H followers might want to place it somewhere on their video  carousel for an occasional peep into what could have been</review_text>
I remember managing to find a drive-in that was showing the first run ECEG; and I remember my girlfriend not saying a word while we watched. She was too kind. In retrospect, it was so totally wrong for the time that one almost has to respect it. I say almost. It was a numbing experience then and the most one can say for it now is: At least the Elvis impersonators will leave it alone. The story is weak, the co-stars are painful, and the soundtrack so bad, the weakest selling record of Elvis' career managed to kill of the Extended Playing record. But , for all that, it is Elvis, and the true beliver will find something in it worth carrying away. Its just best watched alone.</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
i only liked it when pinnochio talked. that was funny, but the rest of the movie was discusting. Some of the scens were very sick (not the blood, but other things). There was no blood hardly, and i could have made it alot better. I espected a good film but it was ... and i would never see it again</review_text>
THIS MOVIE WAS OBVIOUSLY MADE FOR YOUNG CHILDREN, AND OLDER PEOPLE WILL NOYT UNDERSTAND IT</review_text>
Despite of having the hand of a true great director at the helm and a multi-star cast (including a top-notch soundtrack by U2), the movie lacks the rhythm and charisma needed to live up to its expectations, with great performances lost in a bad script. It's just a wanna-be art movie, and nothing else</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
It's amazing that this much acting talent could be shoe-horned into such a bad movie.  I don't see how it could have yielded six 5-star reviews (The Godfather it ain't).Using its better scenes, you could put together a trailer for this movie that would make you want to see it.  And you may be entertained through much of the movie.  But when the story becomes quite nonsensical in the final minutes of the movie, you will feal cheated and wish that you had watched something else.  At least that's how everyone in my family felt when we watched it</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
Yup, definately the worst Halloween movie. Come on, Michael on a reality show? Ha! What the f**k does that have to do with the series? Not only that, but the plot is completely pointless, the acting sucks, and Dr. Loomis and Jamie are nowhere to be found in the movie! Not only that, but the movie relies way too much on gore to be scary, and therefore comes off as pretentious. Don't get me wrong, I LOVE gore in movies, horror or not, but any knowledgable Halloween fan knows that the Halloween movies were always scary without the gore. Along with Halloween 3 (which actually had nothing to do with Michael), Halloween: Resurrection reigns as the worst movie of the series. There are a many more problems with the movie than the ones I listed, but I'm tired of typing, so I'll let other reviewers explain why it's so bad. Bottom line, watch ANY Halloween movie other than this or Halloween 3</review_text>
I don't understand what the people in charge of producing "The Wiz" as a film, could get by joining the former "BIG" names of Diana Ross, Michael Jackson, Richard Pryor and Lena Horne in this trashy picture.The music soundtrack is by far, much better than the movie itself.I have lately become a great Soul music fan, so I recommend to get the soundtrack album and enjoy it considering it just as a very imaginative Soul music work, not keeping in mind that it's a "movie soundtrack". In such manner you will enjoy it more!</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
This movie is the most frightening film I've tried to watch with my [...] daughter. It is NOT suitable for very young children. I was rather horrified by just how creepy it is. The juxtaposition of the saccharine bears with the sadistic cruel scary "spirit" is truly bizarre and could;ve been created by someone who in fact HATES children. If you are not buying this movie due to your own nostalgic desire to relive the 80's, but to watch something sweet and cuddly with your sweet and cuddly children, be forewarned. This movie is not only bad, it's kinda 'bad'. Like, not in a good way. If children are not involved in the purchase- but you are reliving the 80's or getting some really weird gift for a friend, then, you know, maybe you'll dig it. I didn't</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
I am giving this one star ONLY because it is on VHS and not DVD.  I don't even own a VCR anymore and had to watch it at someone elses house!!  The day that they come out with all ten seasons on DVD I will buy them all and really wish I could now!  I just bought the pilot episode on DVD and am hoping that this will sell well and that they'll go on to put all the seasons on DVD already.  I know there is still a huge worldwide fan base who would purchse them!!</review_text>
foul. just plain foul. seemingly never-ending..and not in a good way. tasteless. sick. not even worth the beautiful faces. Heck, I can't even write a proper review because I refused to finish the worthless trash-couldn't tell you what it was about.</review_text>
I watched this on Masterpiece Theater and was intrigued enough with the family story to buy the book.  The characters and the historical context are much better developed in the book and you don't have to listen to that extraordinarily whiny, droning music.</review_text>
Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!</review_text>
Do not waste your time or money, see the original. Once in awhile, a remake of a movie from another culture works; for example, Seven Samurai becomes "Magnificant Seven" -- Most of the time, the remake is trash. The original "La Femme Nikita" is a great movie: exciting with a strong political viewpoint; this version is simply Hollywood pablum</review_text>
A comedy featuring four sexy stars as representatives of Heaven (Fanny Ardant, Victoria Abril) and Hell (Gael Garcia Bernal, Penelope Cruz) battling over the soul of a Mexican boxer is promising, but this attempt at satire, full of symbolism (Hell is represented by English-speaking executives, for example), is clumsily executed, only rarely amusing, and the superb Fanny Ardant is not given anything to do.  What a waste! You'll be better off watching any of the other movies each of these stars has done for more talented directors.</review_text>
By the time I came to this movie, I had already gotten there first three. Up in Smoke was fantastic, Next Movie was great, Nice Dreams was good, this was was pretty poor. They get pretty desparate at some points here, and they constantly repeat chracters we've seen already.The Low points are when they attempt to impersonate two homosexuals (badly), the astronaut which is Cheech miming for 3 minutes of in space, and then pretentds to jerk off at the end. Also, when they got to "Harry Palms" masterbating Champion, that was about as low and unfunny as you could get, just awful. All the points in the stand-up go on about a minute too long, including the fake nightclub. The people laughing at Cheech doing a redneck, had to have been payed actors.There are some good points... not that many though. Maybe the wrestling scene, and some of the scene with Chong recording with a videocamera in the hotel room. They don't seem to do much in this. I wanted something different, which is what I got, but I didn't think it would be this horrible. These guys can do better.</review_text>
I never received this product and will not order from you again. When there is a problem, you are not easy to reach</review_text>
Sure the animation is interesting for a few minutes (if you are interested in rotoscoping see Waking Life) but the story and writing are horrible and bordem sets in within ten minutes.  You will hang in for a bit waiting for somthing to happen but it won't so don't bother with this movie, it's painful to sit through (and I love rotoscoping)</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
I DID NOT RECEIVE THIS MOVIE AND I WAS CHARGE FOR ITI WOULD LOOK TO RECEIVE THE DVDTHANK YOUCAN SOMEONE EMAIL ME WITH THIS INFOrossannemccullough@hotmail.comor call me at 312-404-0267 my name is ROSSANNE MCCULLOUG</review_text>
This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..</review_text>
Harriets adventures include feeding laxatives to her rivals, and her bright friend's big plan is to set off a smoke bomb (incendiary) during a school assembly. Either one will get a kid expelled, arrested, and in the newspapers. Not amusing ! Then there's Golly telling her about the virtues of lying. If there is a lesson that could be drawn (which the movie misses), Harriet's secrecy from her parents manages to create a full blown crisis out of nothing, because she is showing the sort of behavior that (in a kid 2 years older) would be take as a possible symptoms for other bad things like self-mutilation or bulemia, as in the movie "Thirteen.</review_text>
Quick... what's not in widescreen and has no special features?  That's right - MEGALODON!  SIXTY FEET OF PREHISTORIC TERROR - or so claims the box art.  This film may be about a shark, but the production is all about FRANKENSTEIN.  Seen JAWS?  How about THE ABYSS, ALIEN, REPTILICUS, DEEP BLUE SEA, DEEP STAR SIX or LEVIATHAN?  Then you've seen most, if not all, of MEGALODON.  It's all here - the high tech multi-billion dollar drill site, a small, but the "best at what they do" crew, the ill timed major storm (snow and ice), an ill crewman, a lost world filled with lost fish stuffed with lost Magalodons, the standard crew roundtable scar sharing scene, a spunky blond girl reporter and her husky semi-comic cameraman.  Tiny one man (one woman) subs, a helicopter crash, several "tragic" deaths all capped off with a whiz-bang explosion at the end which solves most (but not all) of the problems.  MEGALODON takes no chances by leaving nothing to the imagination.  It simply takes no risks - which is odd since it tries so hard to move in another direction all the time.  There's a good story here blocked by a very large shark.  The Magalodon doesn't come into view until halfway through the film and up until then you may find yourself wondering when they're just going to get on with it - but once the shark does arrive, does get into frame - you begin to realize that there was something more building here.We've seen the destruction of the environment used time and again in these kinds of films - it's a backdrop.  It's something for the creator and builder of the worlds biggest and deepest oil rig to ravage and lay waste to - but here, the head of the COLOSSUS is actually a pretty good guy trying to provide the world with the fuel it needs.  When they stumble upon the lair of the Megalodon there is no talk of drilling for more oil - they all are taken by the wonder of finding a LOST WORLD.  It almost seems as if the story might breakaway here and follow a different direction.  But it never does - the shark swims in, knocks things about, knocks things over, breaks through things, and then gets blown to bits.  We skip into a THREE MONTHS LATER, get our CODA, then our STINGER that there is not one... but two, perhaps more Megalodons now loose in the world's oceans.  Nifty - but dull.There a TON of unanswered questions, and by the end you know the movie has cheated you (can anyone explain why the earthquakes were needed in this film?  Also, was the anchor cable drilled into the ocean floor ever going to break? - they cut back to it at least three times after each quake and I kept waiting for it to snap and the COLOSSUS to tip over - never did).  MEGALODON is what it is - full screen, ready for cable, jammed with a few nifty ideas and stuffed with off kilter CGI (the subs looks fake - but look clean, while the Megalodon itself looks and acts almost exactly like a plastic tub toy shark) effects.  Not the best, not the worst - not JAWS or any of the rest...it's MEGALODON, and it's available for sale or to rent.</review_text>
This is overall a real hoot! Anthony Hopkins is superb! "Fats" the dummy steals lots of the scenes.The question that crosses my mind is which is more frightening the Dummy or Ann Margarett trying to act!Burgess Meredith is great as the manager. One point of interest is the horrible score by Jerry Goldsmith.  He throws in a great harmonica riff when we see "Fats", but during some of the more "romantic " scenes the music is so cloying it would make Yanni blush.Don,t miss the extras where they talk with the real "vent" that worked with them on the movie.If you like movies that are a bit "outside" this is a must have for any collection.Pete Cavan</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
When you decide to adapt a classic film you should take warning several aspects: Has the story aged? How has the suspense's concept altered for the new audiences?We know about the professed sympathy of Cimino for Rourke. We saw him in The year of the Dragon. And somehow Mickey doesn't look credible as the distorted mind criminal. He is too rational and cold to represent that hard character. The illumination is another serious problem. The whole drama looks extremely theatrical: Anthony Hopkins looks uncomfortable with the role and Mimi Rogers is inexpressive. Elias Koteas is simply out of context and perhaps that's why the insipid dialogue. Maybe David Morse shows certain wild tendency. There is a rigidity in the dialogue. Obviously you assist to the common places: the internal disagreements in the policy procedure. Lindsay Cruise is assertive in this role. But the initial sequence of the getaway is terrific. It looks too artificial and the viewer' adrenaline simply is not emanated. The sumptuous photography saves the film of the collapse. The music didn't help to maintain the suspense. It is not easy to readapt a classic film of the fifties. Something similar happened with Cape fear `s remake.The question might be around the new approach of the suspense and the new technologies. Bogart looked extremely old for the role and Rourke looked too elegant to be a convincing ex con.Good entertainment for teenagers in a pop corn rainy weekend.</review_text>
Good special effects for that time period.  Served its purpose to boost the morale of the American public during 1943.  The heroic acts by those in the U.S. military at that time should always be remembered.  Outgunned and outmanned they held their own, and then some on Wake Island and in the Philippines.However, the writers and producer play it pretty loose as far as historical accuracy was concerned.  No B-17s ever flew from Hawaii to Wake Island and on to Clark Field in the Philippines after the attack on Pearl.  I believe it is common knowledge that no B-17s ever sank the Japanese fleet advancing on the Philippines.  Remember Colin Kelly?What was laughable was the scene where the Mary Ann makes an emergency landing on Maui instead of Hickam Field on Dec 7th.  Upon landing they're fired upon by local island Japanese.  Throughout the movie there are references to sabatoge committed by Japanese Americans in Hawaii on Dec 7th 1941.  Upon landing at Hickam Field ("because the Japs on Maui were shooting at us") a colonel goes on about Japanese vegetable trucks driving onto the runway at Hickam and crashing the tails of rows of P-40s before the attack.  Never happened.  In truth, there were no acts of sabatoge committed by the Japanese population in Hawaii.This movie only serves to perpetuate the common belief that Japanese-Americans were disloyal and unpatriotic citizens during WWII, when in fact this was not the case.  It should be noted that a good number of Japanese-Americans (many of whom were thrown into prison camps after Dec 7th) died fighting for the United States during WWII in order to prove their loyalty to this country.May I suggest people watch the movie "Go For Broke" after watching Air Force to educate themselves on what "really" happened in WWII</review_text>
Since this is one of my top four all-time favorite films and I love films passionately, I am ABSOLUTELY beside myself in fury and anger at the HORRIBLE packaging on this magnificent film. I could forgive the lack of extras. I know A LOT of people working for these international movie conglomerates don't give a damn about the Classics (or even movies in general, really). But the lack of thought that went into the packaging of this truly great, PERFECT, scene-by-scene-, shot-by-shot, movie is STAGGERING. Not only do they include a throwaway line of dialog in the middle of the images, not only do they clutter it up with a bunch of extras from a scene in the boxing ring... they picture the villianess, not the heroine, with the hero ! Where is the original poster art !!!!! THe insert art !!! The half sheet art !!! The reissue art !!! There . isnt . even . a . booklet . . or . flyer . inside . NOTHING ! This looks like a release that belongs in the cheapie bin with the public domain stuff . Columbia Pictures.. I am shouting . At . YOU</review_text>
Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!</review_text>
Jane Fonda was not only an excellent actress but a beautiful, if opinonated (remember Hanoi Jane?), woman.  I watched this as a teenager and despite the "striptease" this has to be one of her worst.  Hormones be damned, watching this was a waste of time.  If you like Fonda, try Klute.  She was an excellent actress --- but no one could survive this mess.</review_text>
Actually, since a couple of the Yuen brothers did the choreography for this movie, it isn't really ripped off.  Corey Yuen Kwai did the action for 'Buddha Assassinator' and there is some sleeping style in this movie also, but I will get to the action in a minute.Stephen Chow plays the king of beggars.  Once a rich young man and great in kung fu, he gets cheated out of everything he should have had by a government official.  He is now forced to become a beggar with his father.The main problem is that the movie just doesn't flow together very well.  There is just too much beggar talk.  The story doesn't move along at all except at the start and end.  The rest is just mindless talking.This starts out like a kung fu movie, but when Chow becomes a beggar, that becomes the main focus of the story.  The action is very good when it does happen and I loved the sleeping style.  Sleeping style has been used in a few older movies and it was nice to finally see it in a newer one, but they could have used it more.  The undercranking is way too fast but the fights are still pretty good.2.5/</review_text>
As ex-infantry I found this a big disappointment and almost unwatchable. This low budget movie spoils the book. A supposed highlight is the SAS field craft, but that's a bad joke. The SAS troop crowds around for camera shots, all the while talking loudly if not shouting. Bog normal infantry don't do this never mind the best of the best, the SAS. The fire-fight sequences are passable. The interrogation is the strongest part of the movie but can't make up for the rest of it. The foul language Even if it's what they used in the field, should have been ameliorated for the movie and it detracts a lot, making it unsuitable for many audiences</review_text>
There are so many reviews saying this is a true story I have to point out that while the war and the deployment were real (obviously), about everything else is dramatized (including the mission objectives: SCUD hunting on foot, which is a joke to anyone who knows how wars are fought today). McNab has essentially written Tom Clancy genre fiction. The book Bravo Two Zero differs in details with another book written by a second member of the patrol, Chris Ryan, called The One That Got Away. However, both are convincingly debunked by a third SAS memeber in a book called The Real Bravo Two Zero, also available on Amazon, though only the UK Amazon site (which you can still order from in the US). In it, an SAS member who can actually speak Arabic retraces the patrol using both books as guides and talks to all the people McNab and Ryan supposedly killed and gets their side of the story. Most importantly, he manages to restore, without a doubt, the reputation of Vince Phillips, blamed by Ryan for getting the patrol discovered by the Iraqis and a couple members eventually killed. Contrary to what you may expect, I would recommend seeing this, in fact I recommend getting and comparing all three books: B20, The One That Got Away, and The Real B20</review_text>
I hoped I could leave the theatre, but I was hoping it would get better. Here let me put it this way:3-D suckedPlot suckedActors suckedMovie suckedPLEASE DON'T MAKE A SEQUEL!!!</review_text>
I liked the first two spy kids movies pretty well. The first one was well done and the acting great. The second one, was maybe a bit less than the first but still entertaining. This movie, however, was incredibly lame and absolutely boring.My brother went to see it with my mom in theaters, and for some reason they came back saying it was soooo good. When it came out on DVD I watched it with my brother. Only twenty minutes into it I was wishing I could leave. All the "Amazing" 3-D, Computer animated sequences were giving me terriblel headaches and I no reason whatsoever to watch this drivel.As a previous reviewer said, the spy kids series lost its charm after the second installment. In this movie they were trying to go out with a bang, but fell miles short of the finish line. The acting seemed stale and unemotional. The humor was lame and not even funny. And the whole things seemed like a weird dream the director thought might make a decent movie.Overall, it seems to me that this was just one mega test for the even worse flop "The Adventures of Sharkboy and Lavagirl". I have no appreciation for this director any more and unless he gives us something good fast, I probably won't be watching anymore of his films any time soon</review_text>
The original Jungle Book was inventive, whitty, uplifting and charming.  The characters had depth and a beauty that in its time was unique and wonderful.  The original Disney Jungle Book story was told with great feeling that was a source of fun and inspiration to me growing up as an autistic child.  I can honestly say the original Disney Jungle Book movie was the only movie I loved that also touched my heart.Jungle Book 2 is is just a very badly executed attempt at recreating the awesomeness of the The original Disney Jungle Book.  Jungle Book 2 fails in all attempts to recreate any of the magic of the original Disney Jungle Book.  Jungle Book 2 is endlessly bland overall filled with nothing at all to justify wasting a moment of your life watching.  You will be better and more deeply entertained for hours watching newly poured cement dry compared to watching a moment of Jungle Book 2.  Don't Waste your time wacthing this garbage it is not worth anyones time or money.  It gets one star only because the amazon system does not allow me to post zero stars or better still stars in negative numbers</review_text>
Oh man this is really one of the worst of the 80's "slasher" movies. Tom Hanks shows up for a minute, but the last almost 90. SKIP I</review_text>
This movie is the worst piece of clap trap that I have ever seen.  Built in the mold of the Rambo series, the film tries to play off of the West's fear of the Soviet Union.  You'd be better of watching a &quot;How to pour milk&quot; instructional video, than watch this film that will make you less smart</review_text>
I am never happy when a purchase requires that you install the company's software.  The vid is encrypted so that you need Amazon's player to view it.  Blah.  You're better off buying the DVD for $20 with all the episodes so at least you can watch the DVD somewhere other than your own computer.</review_text>
If you want UNCUT ORIGINAL version, ALWAYS look for ORIGINAL LICENSED Production. NOT US Release. Its a foreign film, it should not be US version to begin with~! HELLO!!!?? Why settle for LESS with US Version where they edit and cut so many excellent scenes especially with Jackie's Fighting Scenes. And US Release ruins the speed and sound as well.I found HK Version to be MUCH MORE in enjoyable, and HIGHER in Quality. American Market always like to "Americanize" and "Control". Regional Code Regulation thing is one of the example to CONTROL the Market. Why not let everyone enjoy the same HK Original Release move the same way REST OF THE WORLD enjoys it ?? No one makes Hollywood American movies to "French version" or "Chinese Version" ~! This what Americans are doing~! Well, enjoy the cheap "American version" then~! LO</review_text>
If you want a review of the plot itself, complete with spoilers, feel free to read the other reviews.My biggest beef with this movie is the fact that any suspension of disbelief is utterly killed, again and again, due to the fact that the script writers and director couldn't keep the story straight.There is a homage to Asimov with the shipboard computer telling one of the crew that it can not let a human come to harm. That would have been fabulous if it had actually been adhered to in any other part of the film. There are a handful of these screw ups that kills any chance of the story being credible.That said, it was a bit enjoyable. The cast did a fantastic job with what they were actually given. If the writers would have spent more time developing the characters than finding ways to get them naked, maybe I would have cared what happened to them.The dimensional jump effect was quite novel and was the one thing in this movie that made me say, "Oooh, cool".Good premise, good effects, good acting, but poor writing killed any chance at this being a good film</review_text>
As along time fan of Paddy Chayefsky, I found "Altered States", his first novel, terribly disappointing. The film was, in my view, utterly dismal. The only reason I would recommend it, would be as an example of "hack movie making". If it were the only criteria to judge the talent of either Chayefsky or Russell, both would be relegated to obscurity</review_text>
Amanda Pete is sexy and there was a bit of nudity, but otherwise this film did nothing for me. A bunch of guys who get together once a week and talk about their conquests? I can't even relate. And they're trying to convince me that women are just as ruthless in their hornyness? Yeah right! See it if you're a big fan of fart jokes, or whatever..</review_text>
Tom Berenger must have been desperate for work when he signed up for this embarrassment of a film.  It has the feel and tone of  the kind of made for television movie you might watch out of sheer boredom and exhaustion on a Sunday afternoon when you're too tired either to locate the remote or to fire a bullet at the television screen.  The acting is wooden and unnatural, and the music, which is supposed to be awesome, sounds curiously like a bad rip-off of Springsteen, even though the flashbacks in the film (when most of the musical scenes occur) are set, for the most part, in 1963, when NOTHING sounded like Springsteen.  Worse yet, the sets do not look like 1963.  This is very clearly a cheap production, doomed from the start by an awful script, terrible acting, and a devil may care attitude about capturing the feeling of an era.  Here's the premise of the film: years after Eddie, the tempestuous and dumb lead singer of the Cruisers, has disappeared (he died in a car accident, but his body was never recovered), a reporter decides to write a story about the band.  She has a theory that Eddie is still alive and believes that the band may be on the verge of a renaissance, if the missing final recordings, named A Season in Hell, can be located.  She forces her presence into the lives of the remaining band members, who are, by the way, dull as dirt, to piece together the band's history.  The reporter is so creepy and annoying that she'd probably have a restraining order slapped on her, nowadays.  Ironically enough, A Season in Hell describes quite acccurately the viewing experience</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
This is my favorite production of the ALICE books.  I love the sets, songs, and casting. It's also very British, which I think adds another great element to the mix.However, skip this DVD edition.  I got it, excited to see ALICE'S ADVENTURES IN WONDERLAND in widescreen and, perhaps a better print than what's previously been available.No such luck.The DVD appears to be struck from the same crappy VHS version that's been out there for ages.  Faded colors. Pan-and-scan. In this age of DVD, quality like this is such a shame</review_text>
The personality of a Nazi brownshirt was one of a heightened need for acceptance.  Fred Leuchter was painted as such by many people, some who knew him(and I'm guessing knew better) and as we may be witnessing others who didn't.  Brownshirts insult, assault, rather than intellectually confront and expose objections to their popular ideas.Maybe a major lesson of the Holocaust is that the brownshirt mentality can live in any culture so long as a popular movement of idea is available for them to cling to.  So long as the need for acceptance outweighs the need for a competition of ideas.  There must be someone to hate for the brownshirt to exist, so that they may prove their allegiance to the group.  Maybe a great contribution one can give to their group is sincere dissent, as dissent does not equal disloyalty...except in a Nazi state.There was a great free press in Germany in Nazi times, so long as that free thought was constrained within the preset boundaries."Mr. Death" is not representation of Fred Leuchter.  Fred Leuchter is representation of Fred Leuchter.  Might I suggest NOT suggesting a collection of articles by many of the same people in this documentary.  That's not clarification, that's reinforcement of one idea.  Rather go and find Fred and speak to him.  Get his view.  If you don't have a preformed agenda (like Van Pelt or Morris), you may get him to respond like I did.  I found a different Fred(and a much much different story) than I was given by director Morris and others.The question is not whether German gas chambers were used to murder people, the question is whether someone will be allowed to think contrary to that, or any other idea.  That is, without having his house firebombed, a concerted effort to ruin him financially take place, have his reputation ruined, or any of the other stuff happen.  If Fred's ordeal is any indication, the brownshirts are alive and well, but I don't think Fred is one of them.The one fact I would alter in my previous post is Rabbi Bauer's support for "no gas chambers".  Bauer supported Fred's methods, not necessarily his conclusion.  I tried in vain to contact Bauer, on where he differs with Fred.  Fred has high regard for Rabbi Bauer.  The Polish forensic investigation(which came soon after Fred's!) did not come to the same conclusion as Fred, but did essentially duplicate Fred's data collection methods and results.There was testimony at the Nuremburg trials by both inmates and German staff that homocidal gassings took place in those camps in Germany.  In 1960, physical and chemical tests showed that no gassings occured there.  It took 16 years(1976) for Simon Weisenthal to admit that no gassings took place in those German concentration camps.  A former inmate at Auschwitz has said that no homocidal gassings took place there.  But all this isn't to say that the Auschwitz gassings didn't occur, but rather to simply say that some may think they didn't occur and for that they shouldn't be condemned...unless the idea is to create an enemy out of sincere people like Fred</review_text>
This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
Looking for a really good thriller, I spotted "Fascination," with Jacqueline Bisset and was sure that with her and the cast, my husband and I had found the perfect summer film on DVD.  What a disappointment.  Although Bisset rallies to the role, the same cannot be said of the other actors.  The dialogue is painfully inept at conveying anything in the least bit sexy, provocative or psychologically intriguing.  The cloying, saccharine musical score doesn't help.  Whereas the music in "The Swimming Pool," or "The Wide Sargasso Sea," enhances, heightens the dramatic intensity, mystery and sensuality, the musak in "Fascination," undermines whatever potential drama there might be. The characters other than Bisset and her unfortunate first husband seem too infatuated with themselves to be erotically convincing. As an ensemble cast, they seem indifferent to both the story and their audience.  Magnificent bodies and sexy entanglements are not enough, in my opinion, to compensate for the pedestrian acting and rather predictable plot.Jacqueline Bisset deserves better and so do we viewers.</review_text>
Acting plot and everything is so bad that it made me cry... Dragonheart was breathtaking this is......B.S.. worst acting and story i ever saw in a movi</review_text>
Expecting sexy camp in the tradition of "Beyond Valley of the Dolls" I was really looking forward to seeing this film. Instead I struggled through this tedious, repetitive, and confusing mess of a film. I respect what the director was trying to create, but the end product is nearly unwatchable. It's starts out so well too.... "I tried not to remember why I buried my trumpet." ...but then it quickly dives into a psychosexual pseudo-sado-vampire ghost story that isn't the least bit sexy or interesting. I know this film has a sizeable cult following. It is pretty to look at (sometimes when it isn't in grainy slow-motion) but I just couldn't make it through. Maybe it's worth a look, but I personally wish I had rented it</review_text>
As along time fan of Paddy Chayefsky, I found "Altered States", his first novel, terribly disappointing. The film was, in my view, utterly dismal. The only reason I would recommend it, would be as an example of "hack movie making". If it were the only criteria to judge the talent of either Chayefsky or Russell, both would be relegated to obscurity</review_text>
I'm a big fan of Colin Firth and I was disappointed of this movie, I felt sleep, wish I never do on an average good movie, I do not recommended if you've seen Bridget Jones diaries, not even close..</review_text>
This movie survives in my memory for over 40 years as one of the most boring stupid excuses for a comedy ever made.  I use it as a benchmark to compare all other really bad comedies.  They are either worse than this one (rare) or better than this one. As an example: Buffalo '66 is worse.  If you watch both in the same day, you will surely die</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
one of the worst movies ever    this stuff must have been made up and total lack of common sense makes this movie an amatureish comed</review_text>
Friday the 13th, Part V - A New Beginning is the worst in the series so far and that is saying allot. The acting is much worst then in prior movies. The script is awfull like on a police academy parts 4 and onwards level and that is nothing short of terrible. The special effects looked cheap even for the time the movie was made and the budget is like nothing close to the first couple of movie. The music is outrageously bad and is probably some of the worst 80's music I have ever heard. I love the 80's hairdoes, the tacky cheap looking clothes, and the make up is atrocious.The dialogue is so bad that one wonders if it is a highschool project gone awry. The killing scenes are also kind of lame and they seem to have run out of ideas. The movie is only 92 minutes long but it sure feels it is like at least twice as long and the plot makes no sense at all. This is a movie that has no redeeming qualities and should be avoided at all costs</review_text>
what a crock of ****. the only good thing is that it still has the story with tommy and thats it,,, the kills suck, the plot sucks,acting really sucks, and damnit no jason</review_text>
I thought this video was disjointed and not oriented to any plot. Also the lighting was very dark and much of what was going on was unseeable</review_text>
Ok so I have always thought Courteney Cox should not be allowed on screen due to lack of acting talent and this show just proves it. It really is the most boring show Ive seen in a long time. If you thought she was bad in scream...and friends..dont watch this...there are other actors in this show who do redeem it somewhat but could never save it. Hopefully this show will be scraped</review_text>
Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
Maybe it was just me, but this concert DVD is a MAJOR disappointment!  It's quite surprising to see how little (if any) connection Madonna makes with the audience.  Shorn of her locks, her aerobically toned and fit body is the hard shell of an automaton here. Perhaps it's a result of her having become larger than life (ala Striesand, Whitney Houston,etc.).  Despite all the razzle-dazzle here, examples of an almost icy distance from her audience abound.  Songs like "Vogue" and "Express Yourself" should have been rousing stompers.  Instead, they are overstylized, choreographed to the max and perfunctory (the effect is like watching a canned TV award show performance).  Worst of ALL is her ill-conceived "Like A Virgin."  I can understand the need to refashion the same songs to forestall boredom, but "Virgin" recast as 1940's Marlene Dietrich nightclub lounge kitsch(complete with unisex tuxedo, top hat and faux-German accent)???? This is a shocking lapse in judgment--and boring to boot!!!The only sign of life comes near the end, with the lock-step performance of "Holiday," which is seductively refashioned as a funky marching-band romp.  Here, she and her dancers perform in what must have been stifling maxi-length military-style coats!  One look at this performance and you can't help but wish for the juice of her earlier stuff. No one begrudges the right of an artist to change and grow, but there is something to be said for giving the audience what it came for.  I'm willing to give Madonna one more shot and pick up the Blond Ambition DVD when or if it becomes available.  Until then, my best advice is to check out DVDS featuring the likes of Tina Turner, Donna Summer or even Sade--they all prove that you can make the old new again, share and reveal something that a studio production can't, and thus never need to worry about going stale. Real concert greatness is not overstylized pomp--it's audience connection!</review_text>
This movie is not very well written in my opinion and is probably a good thing that it is priced so high.  Most of it is uninportant dailog that seems to have little or no piont with no story or structure.  There is  alittle action at the end, but of poor qualaty.  To make a long review  short, it is basically like a bad episode of G.I Jeo</review_text>
Years after its release I find myself writting what I consider a completely biast review for this film (being somewhat of a Star Wars fan had made it difficult to look at it with any negative light before). Let me first start by saying that my two daughters love the film. For me, I grew up watching the original Star Wars (now titled Episode IV, A New Hope). When the original Star Wars came out, it changed the way people looked at Sci-Fi. I saw it several times just to be able to focus on the different aspects of the sets, props, costumes, etc. It was the best eye-candy of its time by far. Substance became less of an important factor and if the movie had a couple of "holes" in the story we forgave it and watched-on mesmerized by its visual splendor and the likability of its characters. Almost thirty years later the panorama is completely different. Star Wars movies still hold the bar for special effects but in a computer-generated world, amazing visuals ocurr within any television comercial, even the lowest budget Sci-Fi television show has special effects that are somewhat convincing or at least cool to look at. Effects do not make a movie and "Attack of the Clones" is more about effects than story or even acting for that matter. Awfully silly dialogue doesn't help it neither. In retrospect, I wish that George Lucas would have come up with two completely different droids than C3PO and R2D2 (the latter even flies! Imagine that, more capabilities than in the future). This premise is even absurd for the world of Star Wars. According to the story, Luke Skywalker and his uncle Owen in episode four bought two droids that are about thirty to forty years old. As I'm typing this review I can imagine myself typing it with a Royal ribbon typewriter, that just wouldn't happen. It is scary to find things that are even too far-fetched for the world that Lucas created but the movie is full of them. He doesn't really give any explanation in the whole trilogy (I,II,III) as to why in the future the ships are not as cool or look and act clunkier, or why everything looks dated thirty years from now. In his world technology goes backwards and not the other way around. I, however have a solution for all these. George Lucas should keep meddling with the original trilogy until all that is left from the original films is the faces of the protagonists. Everything else should be computer re-generated in order to keep pace with a future more in sync with its past. Then, you could buy all versions of the original trilogy (IV,V,VI). As originally shot, the revised version that we all saw in re-release on the theaters, and the "Ultimate Enhanced Version" to better match the second trilogy (I,II,III). Maybe he could even re-edited where the actors look as if they had no personalities and change the dialog to sound more confusing. Then, you would have a whole set of six films that look fantastic but lack in every other aspect of story telling (ie., compelling characters, continuity, interesting plotlines, etc). The only reason I give the movie two stars is because the wonderful effects created by ILM still makes the film worth watching at least once. Otherwise, I rather watch "Serenity" which has a more Star Wars feel to it than this Star Wars film. The nickname of "Mannequin" to "Annakin" is well-deserved as it is any negatives regarding the characters of this poorly told story</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
How on Earth Casper Van Diem accept to shoot this film I will never know. IT's a joke, unfortunately not a good joke ... Special effects ? Forget it. Good acting ? THe actors seem to never have heard about it. A plot ? Nosense. What is this, can somebody tell me ? The so called &quot;sharks&quot; don't scare even a three-year old child !</review_text>
Sorry I couldn't come up with a better punchline, but this movie doesn't deserve any original thought or ideas.  Maybe its because there aren't any original ideas in this movie event.  National Lampoon used to mean funny, now its french for crapola.  Avoid this one at all costs!!!  Watch Caddyshack II, Airplane II, yes even Xanadu three times each before you pick this booger one</review_text>
I just purchased this film and viewed it.  It is the BIGGEST WASTE OF MONEY !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Buyer beware !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!I Love National Lampoon, but this was not a hit.</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
It really sucks, tried to download but it's not able to be viewed in pc's outsided the united states. Crikey.I'll have to wait for reruns to watch it on the telly.Whatta shame amazon dot com. Let's send a CSI to yer headquarters</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
I DONT WONT TO DOWNLOAD IT I WONT IT ALL ON DVD THIS IS WASTE MONE</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
Private investigator and former police detective Jack Ramsey (Michael Harris) is enjoying an affair with the local district attorney's wife, but when she is strangled not long after he has departed following a session of amorous activity, Ramsey is pegged as the primary suspect due to "clues" obviously planted at the murder scene in order to incriminate him, and additionally because of a zealous detective (Matt McCoy) who has personal persons for disliking the former policeman.  As Ramsey tries to clear his name, the sister (Carrie-Anne Moss) of the deceased shows up, and soon she and Jack begin their own affair that is complicated by subsequent homicides and by Jack's former police partner, performed by Brion James, ostensibly, despite private devils, the sole individual Ramsey can trust as additional evidence mounts against him despite entry of other suspects.  Harris, a charismatic player who has created excellent roles, can do but little with a script that defeats as well the rest of the cast, hindered by a wandering plot that is clichd and predictable from the film's opening while, despite helpful cutting, there remains an obligatory slow motion love scene, as well as embarrassing emoting from McCoy, Moss and James that is made unduly prominent because of faltering direction.</review_text>
That's basically my two cents. Shallow characters, bizarre story. I am not the kind of person who usually watches romance films, but I do like a good story and heard this was one. It was not. All of the characters were inverted - Ada and her daughter were utterly irritating, George was disgusting from start to finish, and Sam Neill's character (supposedly the heartless jerk) was actually the easiest to sympathize with. How frustrating!On a positive note, Michael Nyman's score is unbelievable. I love it</review_text>
Being an Oriental I am fairly familiar with films released by our geographical neighbours, although not as extensive as standard Hollywood productions. With Japanese films, whether it was made by a Kurusawa or a  more obscure artisan, I can fairly adjudged them on a whole as lethargic in  pace, inconspicuously lacks background music/instrumentals, and are  generally pressed on celluluid films that are simply comparatively  substandard.  Village of Dreams, while touted as an award winner  is a  glaring testimony of this stunted Japanese film-making characteristic.  Review it yourself. The pace alone wantingly needs tighter editing. It was  the same character that can be seen even in Kurusawa's Ran - a &quot;highly  acclaimed&quot; work that in my case, I couldn't even view for the third  time, because even its DVD resolution has a quality that can only be  likened to the eye-view of a person who's suffering his earliest stage of  creeping glaucoma.  Village of Dreams is so &quot;relaxed&quot; as if the  filmmaker expects people like me to have an available time that they  enjoyed in 1940s Japan in an obscure countryside. At the very least, the  straight narrative of this film is a consolation, but with RAN, the actions  were so hard to follow, you'd be puzzled who was fighting and attacking  whom.  The most unforgivable quality of this DVD transfer  is the poor film  stock. The picture approximates that of a &quot;third generation&quot;  recording of a VHS copy. This means that you'll be sorely dissapointed of  having to get a VHS-quality copy COPIED, in turn, from another VHS copy  which was copied from the original VHS &quot;master tape&quot;.  Of course,  the DVD transfer is not at fault, its simply that the Japanese despite  their touted techno prowess just couldn't give us a decent film stock, that  could at least preserve their comparatively well-made gems. The glaring  deficiency of films like this comes even more obvious, when shown on high  resolution TVs. I've viewed this film in a 29-inch Sony Wega Flat TV, and  in a 50-inch Mitsubishi projection TV, from a Pioneer DVL 919 and 909. If  not for the antics of the two children leads, Village comes off as  wearisome. I bought this film despite its hefty price tag mainly because  I'm a film collector. Its works like this that whets my appreciation for  world cinema. Unfortunately, Village's poor resolution takes away  gratifying cinematic enjoyment, as well  as negating its  &quot;collectability&quot; factor. This should have looked more glorious if  it could approximate the celluluid quality of examples like  What Dreams  May Come or Dark City, but of course that's asking too much from those  editing-challenged Japanese filmakers.  I want to ask Amazon for a refund  because this is not well worth its price value. I was compulsed to buy it  because of its cover, I thought it was at least as exotically  glorious-looking as KUNDUN, but it proved to be just a small, obscure  production. Critics may raved about it, just like those Canadians did with  BLACK ROBE, but the final word is that they're just run of the mill, albeit  thoughtful, films....</review_text>
...and I can remember some of the scenes to this day (i'm 49 now). I was 16;my friend,17 at the time. I used to hitchhike to and from her house a lot in those days,and after that movie, I didn't-for a long time. At the time it was a really scary film,and the urban legend at the time was that it was based on a true story,which only added to the starkness of it. Of course,as some have opined here, what is perceived as horrifying then and what's considered horrifying now is like comparing oranges and rutabagas."Horror-and-brutality technology" in films has definitely-and I use this word wryly-evolved</review_text>
There is an interesting comparison to be made between Ingmar Bergman's classic "The Virgin Spring" and the grisly exploitation shocker it inspired, "Last House on the Left" by Wes Craven.  They share identical plots, feature graphic rape scenes, and before it's all over turn average men into murderers.  And yet one is considered to be a bona fide classic and 1961's Oscar-winning Best Foreign Film--and the other appreciated only in underground circles, but largely reviled as cheap gruesome exploitation.So just how different are they?  Not as different as you might imagine--but as different as art and exploitation."The Virgin Spring" is easily one of Bergman's most accessible films.  Telling a simple story in a straightforward fashion, he exposes a frankness and brutality people weren't accustomed to seeing.  A young girl venturing through the woods encounters two men and a boy.  Though they initially seem helpful, their actions quickly become violent.  After a graphic (for the time) rape, the girl is murdered.  Later, the wrongdoers happen upon the girl's home and seek shelter from her family--both groups unaware of who the other is.  Suspicions start to arise and vengeance is sought.It is a powerful tale of love, loss and the depths people can be driven into--where they become unable to stop themselves from betraying their faith and moral code, where savagery and rage take over.  Bergman's film benefits greatly from a stellar lead performance by Max von Sydow as the father.  Real conflict and raw emotion burn up the screen.  Add the beautiful cinematography and haunting score and it's a winning combination.  But what endures in the story of "The Virgin Spring" is how strong a component faith becomes--when there is nothing left to believe in, can you still believe?  A classic in every sense, "The Virgin Spring" still has the power to shock but there's something very redemptive about the film."Last House on the Left," however, is probably more notorious than acclaimed.  The plot, as I've said, is identical.  Coming 12 years later, in 1972, Wes Craven was at the beginning of his career and sought to retell this tale.  It is a shocker, and the scenes of rape and murder clearly foreshadow the "torture cinema" of today.  It is brutal, uncompromising and graphic--and the film was championed in the underground horror market.Working with a small budget, the film lacks the artistry of "The Virgin Spring."  While it still packs a visceral punch and has the power to shock--what it lacks is depth and subtlety.  The characters aren't particularly drawn out so their actions don't have the emotional resonance of the earlier film.  Without contemplating faith and moral choices, what we're left with is straightforward revenge.  And the film, ultimately, has no redemption--no uplift.  It's violence for the sake of violence.  It remains a historically significant precursor and influence on other shock films without being a particularly good movie in it's own right.And therein lies the difference between art and exploitation.   KGHarris, 11/06</review_text>
Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show</review_text>
People actually gave this movie 5 stars! Are they for real? If you want a good shoot'em up action movie with lots of hip hop and blunt smoking then this movie is for you. It is fun to watch, but to say it is true to life is like saying cabin boy is politicaly thought provoking. It is a fantasy about how rappers wish there life styles really are. Their are so many Scar Face ripoffs it's offencive, and the conclusion is so weak it looks like they said "Okay, we don't have much film left, we gotta' rap this up real quick. DMX, find religion...and cut." Rent the movie, try to figure out what the hell the jamaican guy is saying, ignore the horrible acting of Naz, then return it. And when you review it please don't give it five stars, those are supposed to be for the cream of the crop, not just some "Phat movie you and some down ass playas' watched while moms was outta' da' house.</review_text>
I'm not going to waste a bunch of my time or yours giving a personally oppinionated review of the movie plot. It's redundant and unnecessary, and whether someone likes the story or not is irrelavent. Only you can form an opinion of whether you like it or not by watching it yourself. Double that with the fact that most movies hardly ever line up with the book that's based on and well...My gripe is the transition from putting the movie in it's original format onto DVD was bad. The soundtrack is about 1/2 to 1 second off from the video part of film, therefore the voices don't sync up with the lip movement.</review_text>
Rule number one if you're making a Stephen King movie, especially if it's a TV movie; make it scary or don't make it at all!  THE TOMMYKNOCKERS fails to do this miserably!  For most of the film, you're watching a lot of green light and a lot of silly inventions.  Granted, that's all in the book, but it written chillingly by King in a way only he can do it.  There are some exciting alien moments at the end, but by then it's too late.  You've just spent three hours watching a bad knock off of an X-FILES episode.On the plus side, I had no problem watching the infamous Traci Lords act like like a total slut!  Bless her</review_text>
As along time fan of Paddy Chayefsky, I found "Altered States", his first novel, terribly disappointing. The film was, in my view, utterly dismal. The only reason I would recommend it, would be as an example of "hack movie making". If it were the only criteria to judge the talent of either Chayefsky or Russell, both would be relegated to obscurity</review_text>
This is a pleasant film to look at as far as the pretty girls and the colorful scenes.However that's about all the good things I can say about it.I can think of a lot better things that the pretty girls in this movie could have done besides getting their faces burned off, getting killed by a walking suit of armor, etc..There's a diary involved but what exactly is in this diary I still have no idea.  Maybe I lost something with the English dubbing.  Once I lost the point about the diary there was no hope of understanding the plot.There's some cocaine use involved somewhere but where that all fits in I don't know.The ending is anticlimactic and really not possible from a logical point of view.  I don't want to ruin the 'suspense' bytelling what happens.Based on reading the high praises of other reviewers I may not be sophisticated enough to appreciate this movie.Give me "Frankenstein Meets The Wolfman" or "Brides Of Blood" any day over this movie.Jeff MarzanoRecommended further viewing:Horror HotelIT ! (The Terror From Beyond Space)Invasion Of The Saucer MenNot Of This Earth (original)PhantasmThe Blob (with Steve McQueen)The Brain That Wouldn't DieThe Flesh EatersThe Fly / The Return Of The Fly / The Curse Of The FlyThe Four Skulls Of Jonathan DrakeThe Hideous Sun DemonThe Hypnotic EyeThe Incredible Shrinking ManThe Indestructible ManThe MansterThe Thing (from another world)The Thing That Couldn't DieThe Twilight Zone Collections</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
I just read Doug's review of "First Man into Space" and I just had to write respond.  I was seven years old when I saw this movie. As I recall (though my recollection here may be faulty), it was double-billed with "Tom Thumb."  One of my good friends had a birthday party and we all went to the movies.  "First Man into Space" scared the bejeezus out of us. We were so scared we couldn't stop crying. They had to take us out of the movie in the middle--sometime after the car was pulled over by the state trooper.  I thus never saw its conclusion. A few years ago I found the video of the movie and I triumphantly brought it home to show to my teenagers. Needless to say, they made fun of me throughout the movie: "Dad, you were scared by this?!" :-</review_text>
An incredibly bad film, whose only redeeming feature is Lana Clarkson, in (and out of) some skimpy outfits.  She's completely gorgeous, but even she can't save a disaster of a film.  Buy Deathstalker instead</review_text>
I don't usually make a point to watch films this bad (predictable plot, laughable dialog, horrible music soundtrack, etc), but when I saw that my all-time favorite actor Jeremy Brett had a brief but memorable role in "Shameless" (originally titled "Mad Dogs and Englishmen"), I couldn't resist. It's a bizarre experience to witness an actor -- who so perfectly embodied the iconic Sherlock Holmes in the beloved Granada TV series -- appear in such an odd role of a drug-supplying sugar daddy. It's even odder to see a glimpse of him in a modern-day sexual scene with a young woman. Regardless, as usual, he stole the movie even if he was only barely in it. I only wished the director has used Brett to his fullest talents instead of as an aside eccentric.A young Elizabeth Hurley makes a mediocre attempt to portray a bored little rich girl with drug problems and C. Thomas Howell does his best to seem sexy in a grunge biker kind of way. But Brett's booming voice, subtle expressions and dynamic presence wakes you up for just long enough to pay attention to his character. Once he disappears from the screen, you realize all too soon that the rest of the film is worthless. It takes a great actor to lift up a role from the muck, and I'm sorry to see that this was Brett's only chance to do a modern-day storyline from his usual historic epics before he passed away.He briefly commented in an interview why he did the role, and soon realized the film was a disaster.On "Mad Dogs and Englishmen" (1995)-- "I was mad to do it, but I wanted to show the world that I was still alive and I could do other things apart from Sherlock Holmes. I hope they don't release it..."</review_text>
I wanted to see a romantic and touching movie.  This movie is contrived. The character that Reeve plays acts like a star-struck groupie.  Personally, I don't find his behavior to be romantic.  He seems like he is just like a groupie that is really excited that this actress is interested in him.  This is not romantic to most women nowadays.  He is not suave in the role he is playing.  It seems like a cheesy 70's contrived romance that does a bad job of it</review_text>
I'm a huge Don Cheadle fan, but this film is unworthy of him. [People] who claim that it's a story about racism either don't understand the film or don't understand racism. Basically, here's the plot: The character played by Mekhi Pfeiffer is an unwitting accomplice in a botched armed robbery that leaves three people dying on the floor of a grocery store. Rather than summon help for the others, all Pfeiffer can think to do is help himself to the money in the cash register. He is caught, and in the ensuing trial the prosecutor calls him an animal because of his depraved indifference to human life. That is supposed to be the psychological turning point in the film, because Pfeiffer's family insists on proving that he's no animal and can take his punishment -- in this case, death -- with his head held high. Yeah, right. Guess what? He is an animal, and if the story had involved all-black or all-white characters, racism wouldn't be an issue. A more compelling question: if Pfeiffer's family was so concerned with his "dignity," why didn't they teach him moral values in the first place</review_text>
Steven Seagal keeps making films. In 2005 alone, he made as many as four films, which itself sounds an amazing feat. Not so amazing, however, if you see `Today You Die' dreadful film with a dreadful title. The press material I managed to get at Japanese theater in Osaka (yes, they dared to release it theatrically in Japan) tells you that the film was shot in only 18 days. Small wonder that none of the film makes sense, gives less actions than awful dialogues.Steven Seagal plays one Harlan Banks, ex-master thief who is retiring from his job. Banks turns a professional driver of cash delivery van in Las Vegas, but because of the robbery committed by someone else, he is arrested and sent to a jail. Is he framed? Of course, he is, but when he can wear his trademark long jacket in jail, and meets and enlists a help from someone named Ice Kool there (played by Treach), there is nothing to worry about.But I had to worry about because nothing makes sense in the film. We see a glimpse of one orphanage (briefly twice), but no one in the film seems to remember it. The film begins with a cheesy nightmare sequence that the girlfriend of Harlan sees (played by Mari Morrow) in her dream that portends death and danger, but this supernatural idea is just dropped in the second half of the film. There is a detective played by Sarah Buxton, whose motive to get close to Banks remains unclear, and Nick Mancuso adds confusion to the already chaotic scenario as Agent Saunders.[DULL, DULL, DULL] The most impressive part of `Today You Die' is one car chase scene in Las Vegas with decent stunts and some nice camerawork. In fact, these scenes are recycled footages from one Sidney J. Furie actioner `Top Of the World' starring Peter Weller and Dennis Hopper (yes, I checked it yesterday). The rest of `Today You Die' consists mainly of terribly witless dialogues exchanged between Seagal's character and others, which goes like:BODYGUARD: "Who are you?!"SEAGAL: `Girl scout of America.'Naturally poor bodyguard is beaten up by Seagal clad in ridiculously long jacket, who does it with the minimum energy helped by lightening-speed editing and body doubles, which strongly suggest he is not willing to do the actions once he had shown in the films like `Above the Law.'The film is strictly for the avid fans of Seagal, but I am afraid the number of them is getting smaller every year. I like his films in the 80s and 90s, and I admit `Today You Die' is not as bad as `The Foreigner,' but that isn't saying much</review_text>
As Segal continutes to move toward Orson Welles dimensions,his movies get progresivly worse. Let's hope this is his last</review_text>
Much like Into The Sun, this had all the ingredients for a Seagal come back but yet again the producers of yet another Seagal movie miss the opportunity to deliver a great Seagal action thriller. The movie is again handicapped in the same manner as Into The Sun and Submerged by the recurring problem of what appears to be Seagals disregard of the script or perhaps due to the lack of a script where he seems to make up his own dialogue to fill out a scene. It's as if the camera is turned on and Seagal makes it up as he goes along, conversations involving Seagal and other characters make no sense or have any relevance to the story at hand. In Seagals recent movies there always appears to be a scene which is simply there to give Seagal an ego boast. "Walks like a Black man, breaths like a killer", what was that all about??  The main armored car chase scene is lifted directly from another film made 10 years ago and also the open scenes of The Order with Van Damme is used as the opening scenes in this. I also think though I might be wrong but all the aerial shots of the prison and the prison structure itself looked the same as those used in the Wesley Snipes movie Undisputed. Seagals body double is ever present as usual, Seagals line delivery at times is terrible, yet another muddled and confusing plot and character relevance to the story, Seagal love scene!, fake back drop special effects and bad acting from allot of the supporting cast members are all here present and correct as has become the norm with Seagal movies of late. However it's not all bad, this is a big step up from Submerged, there is no voice dubbing, there are flashes of the old Seagal when he sticks to the script and does his own fight scenes which the two while he is in prison appear to be all Seagal and he is looking in better shape than his last few outings. For me, it was worth the rental as it's not all bad but it did feel very flat and uninteresting while watching it. In Seagals post Exit Wounds years, for me Belly Of The Beast is the mark to aim for and his best since Exit Wounds,  with Half Past Dead, Out Of Reach and The Foreigner(&lt;-- I know people may want to decapitate me for saying that but I like The Foreigner!) following behind. The worst for my viewing pleasure has to be Out For A Kill, Ticker and Submerged(although enjoyable in a it's so bad it's good, kind of way). I'd put Today You Die and Into The Sun in the same box as missed opportunities for two excellent Seagal movies</review_text>
Albert Pyun is my absolute least favorite director. I hate his guts. His direction ruined &quot;Cyborg&quot; and was murky in &quot;Omega Doom.&quot; This is his best flick, and it's not that good. In fact, it pales in comparison to the so-so original. Sasha Mitchell is highly entertaining in this sequel that is certainly watchable, but highly forgettable. The villain from the first, Tong Po, has returned after killing the Sloan brothers from the first movie. Now, he's out to redeem his honor by fighting little brother David Sloan. Standard martial arts fare. Some choppy fight scenes, but an interesting main character saves this picture from otherwise becoming complete dreck</review_text>
Okay, I was excited to see this movie.  I read a few non fiction books on the dot.com bust and thought I knew a thing or two, but when I watched this movie focus on petty relationships and nothing more, I found myself wondering what planet these film makers were from.  I mean, WHO cares about these people's relationships??  NOT ANYONE WHO IS WATCHING THIS MOVIE!  We care about why and how businesses succeed and fail.  This movie sucked</review_text>
I remember seeing CHILDREN OF THE CORN right after reading Stephen King's short story version in his classic book, Night Shift. I was excited because King's story was such good scary fun. Well, I watched the movie and was amazed at how awful it was. While the short story had a building atmosphere of dread and horror, the movie had an atmosphere of pure cheeze. King's story was short (like 10-20 pages) and sweet, w/ sinister children and a mysterious god / monster in the cornfields. The movie has a town full of annoying brats and a cheap beasty that caused much eye-rolling and laughter. The running time is 90 minutes, including about an hour's worth of padding. COTC would have made an excellent addition to one of King's anthology movies like CREEPSHOW. As it stands, it's bloated and pretty boring. Of course, Linda Hamilton is in it, which is why I gave it an extra star...</review_text>
I bought this as a gift for my nephew because I loved the book as a chid and vaguely remembered a wonderful treehouse in the movie.  I'm very glad I screened it first.  The female characters are practically subhuman in intelligence and the story presentation is slow, boring, and illogical.  I'm not very PC with old movies, but the sexism and animal abuse in this movie are way past my limits.  Choose one of the other Disney re-releases instead.  There are plenty of good ones to choose over this dog</review_text>
Blech!  I really like all the young actors that were in this movie and expected it to be really funny and cute.  WRONG!  It was a bizarre combination of shock tactics trying to show how edgey they all were.  The only redeeming actor was Justin Long.  The rest of the movie was a waste of brain cells</review_text>
It wasnt all that bad. It had its moments. Brad Renfro (Bully), Dominique Swain (Face/Off), Keram Malicki-Sanchez (tv's Buffy The Vampire Slayer), Emily Bergl (The Rage: Carrie 2), Justin Long (Jeepers Creepers), James King (Bulletproof Monk) and Jordan Bridges (Mona Lisa Smile, son of Jeff Bridges) star as camp counslers who have, well a lot of problems. Peter Stormare (Eight Millimeter) is the camp nazi and he doesnt want anything to go wrong in his camp. Emotions, relationships and other crazy shtick happens along the way. James King (former model) looks good dipping in that lake..hmm. Renfro and Swain are so wrong for each other, they should be a couple in real life. Bergl is hot to the bone. Bridges is a bastard. Long is a hoot as a nerdy/geek type of characer and Sanchez is nicely cast as a kid who is not afraid to show his homosexuality to the others. Stomare is just weird, plain weird and the kids are brats. So if you liked Heathers, because Daniel Waters wrote it, then this is the movie for yo</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
This is not one for the uncoordinated.  I only tried it once, and have no desire to try it again.  Also beware that this is not the best pick if you have only a small space.</review_text>
Some people praise `We Don't Live Here Any More" as one of the realistic portrayals of two married couples, tired of lies, not really knowing what to do. It is also true that Naomi Watts and Mark Ruffalo have exceptional talent and here again they would not disappoint you with their fine acting. The film as a result looks like a filmed version of some John Updike novels (actually it is based on two shorts by Andre Dubus, whose `Killings' became `In the Bedroom').But sorry, Updike is not my favorite author, and the film's touch is too desultory for me. No, `desultory' is not the only real problem because I remember I was fascinated by the desultory realism of much more successful `In the Bedroom.' The real flaw of `We Don't Live Here Any More' is its dullness and all too familiar things about the four principal characters.Mark Ruffalo's character Jack is having affair with Naomi Watt's Edith and Jack's wife (Laura Dern) already suspects, or knows that his husband is cheating. But the affair means here uninspired, clichd sex scenes between Edith and Jack among the woods in Oregon, with Naomi Watts and Mark Ruffalo having sex against a tree ala `Fatal Attraction.' Edith husband Hank (Peter Krause) teaches creative writing, and has just one book published. The alcoholism of Laura Dern's character is suggested in the most obvious way (you know what), but in the first place why didn't the filmmakers realize that her portrait as poor housekeeper with alcoholism is already a big clich?Among these recycled materials, there are a few well-observed descriptions that deserve attention. It is the brief, but efficient study of the children in both families, and the film shows how these children accept the reality of the marriage that is falling apart. These clever, insightful moments, however, do not last long in the film, for it soon returns to the typical representation of the domestic life in America.We don't want any big surprises, or twists and turns in this kind of film because we know we have none from the beginning. It is true that `We Don't Live Here Any More' presents a convincing portrait of boring and stagnant marriage in a slumbering small town in America, but the film goes nowhere from there, missing every chance for the more incisive study of the characters.</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation</review_text>
Rodney Dangerfield is supposedly becoming mormon(Church of Jesus Christ)  but this movie didn't get any fact right.  the church is never mentioned by name for a reason.  polygamy.  look like Amish.  a collection plate?  this movie stinks and i'm very offended</review_text>
This version is eleven minutes shorter than the orginal version based on the information printed on the DVD and listed in the IMDb.  I saw this film a long time ago and was looking forward to seeing it again, but was amazed at how much they had cut out of the movie.  The DVD packaging does not state that it is an edited version nor does the information provided by Amazon.  They made it a totaly different movie with the editing that was done.  I do not recommend this version to anyone.  The orginal movie deserves better than this chop job</review_text>
Okay, I was excited to see this movie.  I read a few non fiction books on the dot.com bust and thought I knew a thing or two, but when I watched this movie focus on petty relationships and nothing more, I found myself wondering what planet these film makers were from.  I mean, WHO cares about these people's relationships??  NOT ANYONE WHO IS WATCHING THIS MOVIE!  We care about why and how businesses succeed and fail.  This movie sucked</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
This a dreadful example of what Jayne was reduced to play in to feed her children and compensate for the lack of earnings of her deadbeat-husbands/lovers.The only reason to watch it would be because Mamie Van Doren was also in it.But be aware (and i read that in a biography about Jayne) that in their contracts was specified that they would NOT appear together in ANY scene whatsoever.So you see them SEPARATELY in different scenes.Also be aware that if you blink,you will not see either of the 2 blonde beauties.Conclusion:Get this film for a member of your family who is nostalgic for the ways of the ''Ol' South',or someone with a white hood showing his eyes onl</review_text>
Not sure what to make of the movie but it is definitely not one of the best movies and not sure if it is even a movie</review_text>
This has to be Dolph's suckiest movie.  I'm a huge fan, and I own a ton of his movies and watch a bunch more on a regular basis.  But do not buy this movie, save your money and buy one of Dolph's better movies like Army of one or Men of War.  Personally though I'm pumped for the release of masters of the Univers</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..</review_text>
Shawn Hatosy (The Faculty, Outside Providence) is in love with Rachael Leigh Cook (She's All That, Antitrust) but she doesnt love him, she only wants to be his friend, then enter Hatosy's friend, Jonathan Rhys-Meyers (Tv's Elvis, Velvet Goldmine) who becomes Cook's boyfriend and Hatosy becomes jealous from this....who hasnt gotten made when a friend seduces the girl you love....you know what, who cares really. Hatosy tells the story in flashback telling the story to cop Lorraine Bracco (The Sopranos, Medicine Man). This boring story has no likable characters and invokes really thin interest with me. Cook is really stale, Hatosy, as much as a good actor he is is rendered dull and Meyers plays another sleaze ball like in most of his thrillers. Worth a look and by god Im not looking again and towards the end you're like....WHY I DID I RENT THIS?!!. Also starring Estella Warren (Planet of the Apes remake).</review_text>
I have loved Riverdance since the first time I saw it on PBS.  I could wait till I received my Riverdance: Live from New York DVD so many years ago.  Recently, I had a chance to see it on tour when it came to Los Angeles.  I had been waiting for that moment so long and it was everything I could hope for (with the exception of them having removed the song "Home in the Heartland" which any ture fan knows brought the story full circle).  That night, I ordered not only Riverdance: Live from Geneva, but also Jean Butler's Irish Dance DVD (Which I would recommend).  To make a long story short, don't waste your time with this version of the show.  The main female singer is absolutely horrible (Definitely doesn't hold a candle to Katie MacMahon's original vocals), and the lead female dancer's too short hair drove me crazy.  Do yourself a favor and purchase the 1999 DVD Live from New York.  I promise you won't be disappointed</review_text>
Update:  I think I've figured out why they've made the changes which take away much of the Magick that is Riverdance.  The people I work with know how crazy I am about all things Celtic.  So, bless 'em, they thought I would like Michael Flatley's latest creation, Celtic Tiger, and got me that for my holiday gift this year.After watching that HIDEOUSLY TACKY travesty of a show, it seems like whoever is in charge of RD these days is trying to compete with Sacred meets Vegas and Vegas wins junk that Mr. Flatley has produced!So, come on, take RD back to it's Magickal, Lovely, Sacred Roots!What are they thinking?  Who changed the number that originally featured Davey Spillane playing the pipes?  Why on Earth would anyone want to take one of the most soul-hauntingly lovely pieces of Sacred Musick ever written amd make subtle alterations to it?And the sound quality of the tape leaves a lot to be desired!  As always, the performers are AWESOME!  And I've gotten over the trauma of knowing that I'll never get to see Michael and Jean live!  Just kidding about the trauma part, however the RD of my dreams DEFINIETELY has those two in the lead roles!But come on, a Lugh with black hair!  The best Lugh I've actually seen live was Patrick Roddy.  The best Brigit I've seen live is Eileen Martin.The last time I saw RD live was about a year ago, and this was the version that I saw and it kind of made me think that RD was trying to go Hollywood!However, there were a few good things about the changes.  The narration about how it's all a journey from one lifetime to the next and the inclusion of the Shivna number!  It's quite good!I wouldn't realy advise buying this tape unless you are a RD nut like I am and buy anything about RD that you can get your hands on!</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
I saw this movie as a kid when it came out and liked it, but since then it has gone through something of a critical reevaluation. Goodman is an entertaining actor, but there are just too many factual errors, and they arguably detract too much from the film's quality.As was noted elsewhere by other reviewers, Goodman's Ruth does not represent a great athlete. Ruth was not overweight growing up, nor in his early days as a ballplayer. Ruth's weight did fluctuate, but few to this day know that Ruth had 123 career stolen bases, and actually led the Yankees in steals one year (1923). Goodman's character was unreasonably slow, and at the end was portrayed as unable to run the bases even on a home run. This might work as light humor, but it certainly is not fact. Also of note, Goodman was a natural born right-hander that had to learn how to bat and throw left-handed like Ruth for the purpose of acting in this film. This makes Goodman look awkward, and even less like an athlete on a few occasions.On the other hand, I understand as a general rule that playwrights and filmmakers are given a certain "artistic license," and that it is alright on some occasions to stretch the truth for a purpose. The bloated portrayal of Ruth might be one such example, no matter how erroneous it is from a factual standpoint. Even so, many of the inaccuracies have no discernable purpose. Case in point,  "Jumpin' Joe" Dugan was never a teammate of Ruth's in Boston, only in New York. It is also known that Ruth did not have any home runs in 1914, but according to this movie he had one that year. In addition, Ruth was not the first player to hit a home run at Forbes Field. The list could go on for a while, and there seems to be no reason why the filmmakers decided to alter such facts. "Jumpin' Joe" may have been put in there just to have a veteran teammate friend for Ruth, but Dugan started his career three years after Ruth did, so he could not have been a veteran to Ruth at any point in his career. They could have picked someone else to fill this fictitious "veteran teammate" role, or scrapped the idea all together. The 1914 home run served the purpose of providing a dramatic rookie year home run, but this scene could have been set in 1915 instead, and with some modifications perhaps could have been just as dramatic. Lastly, regarding Forbes Field, the announcer could have said a true statement along the lines of "Forbes Field is a pitchers ballpark, not many home runs are hit here folks," as opposed to the inaccurate "no one has ever hit a ball out of Forbes Field." The latter line had a dramatic effect, but was not necessary.Also of note, Ruth's supposed "meeting" with gangster Alphonse Capone seemed a bit absurd, perhaps this was thrown in to get a glimpse of the times. Aside from the dicey misrepresentations though, there were a few strong qualities. The acting was strong overall, with Ruth's two wives giving strong performances, and Goodman's performance was not a total wash, even if there was too much over-the-top buffoonery. And let it be said that this film does have the ability to evoke some of the excitement of the game of baseball - a sentiment especially felt as an eight or nine year old viewer. But as said by Derek Armstrong, there were "too few ambitions toward a greatness to match that of its subject matter."</review_text>
im not sure why i gave this a second star; maybe its because i feel guilty for always loathing everything john malkovich is associated with? directed and written by spike jonze and charlie kaufman (the same duo who gave us the equally pretentious "adaptation"), this one centers around an unsuccessful puppeteer (john cusack) who figures out how to enter into the body of actor john malkovich for 15 minutes at a time and manages to turn that talent into riches and fame but oh my he still isnt happy even tho he gets to hang out with cameron diaz</review_text>
This movie is so bad, it barely deserves mention. However, I am a big DL fan, and I am writing this in the hope that Dolph will not abandon his fans---he may be making movies like this just for the $$, but, I believe, he is also doing irreparable damage to his career</review_text>
In short, the film does a fairly good job of getting the message across, as it should do, in making people aware of the evils of war and the fact that the international community is often slow to act. At the same time, however, it does not provide a balanced examination of the situation on the ground, which only weakens the very effect it is trying to create.What the film ends up doing is the one thing it must avoid at all cost in order to be effective: NOT to choose sides.  The Catholic Croats and the Muslims are the "victims," while the Orthodox Serbs are wholly to blame...  That is neither witty nor wise when trying to carry out a "noble cause."  There is a term used in such situations and it's called... propaganda!A more balanced and objective approach (i.e. there are no good guys and bad guys in such conflicts) with less bias and closed mindedness would have made the film more effective and therefore, more successful. The ultimate goal is good, but the method used is not necessarily the correct one.Another setback is in relation to the acting (or lack of it); that is to say that the cast are badly in need of acting lessons (with the exception of Woody Harrelson)!  The acting-oh my- the acting is beyond words...  School plays (and pre-school for that matter) have better actors!  It is truly sad...Yet another weakness is in relation to the very poor dialogues and the weak plot/storyline for which the writers and director are to blame.In conclusion, the potential for a good movie was there if only the writers/director had the ability to... write and direct!  A shame really...</review_text>
i love norm macdonald and this is the dumbest movie of all tim</review_text>
Everything is this movie seems out of place. The old cliche &quot;good cop-bad cop&quot;, lived by Sutherland and his pal doesn't work at all!  Dridget is in an awkward performance, totally unconvincing, unreal, flat.  ANyway, it serves to study how a movie with so good cast can be a  tremendous waste of time.</review_text>
After a promising start, Stan Laurel and Oliver Hardy's 1944 effort plunges into a sea of MGM mediocrity with a ludicrous plot involving the attempted murder of a boy king. However, Chef Ollie's "Steak a la Oliver" is worth a few laughs</review_text>
So I saw this one live action Alice in Wonderland movie and it sucked!!!! But I'm confused this isn't the same girl in that movie so this another live action movie, I think it is. I'm not sure if I want to risk boring myself with other crap... so will I watch this verison ever... who knows</review_text>
I could not help but to watch this film with all of my African American female sensibilities. Despite the proficient acting, cinematography and directing, I found the content highly offensive and trite. Mr. Kinksy claimed to love Shanduri and was willing to do anything to possess her affections. He was put off to find out that Shanduri was married, but not deterred. Shanduri gave him what she believed was an unattainable challenge to have her husband, who was arrested for speaking out against the government, freed from an African prison. I recognize that it is possible for a servant to fall in love with her employer, however I know that it is extremely rare. (Ask any black woman who's cleaned a white person's house, `how much love do you have for your boss.' The relationship between Shanduri and Mr. Kinksy was one of abuse of power and emotional manipulation. During the `relationship' that I watched develop, not once did Shanduri refer to her employer by his first name. Clearly indicating an uneven balance of power and control...not much different from a slave owner offering to free his children born to his African concubine. So, Mr. Kinksy gave up some of his prized possessions; it was European influence that created the climate that allowed Shanduri's husband to be detained indefinitely. Though I am one among several with a different review about the film, I have no reason to forget the long history of abuse past and present that women of color experienced at the hands of white people, especially white men. To see such a film is an insult and another example of how Europeans do not understand the masses of African Americans</review_text>
Tepid entry in the collection. Lorre's Moto a bit of a bore</review_text>
The "Urban Legend" franchise has been pretty steady for the past couple of years. I just don't understand why this movie was made. It shifts from the slasher feel of the previous two movies and delves into a more supernatural focus. The film is pretty bad. I'm definitely a huge fan of horror movies and it doesn't take a lot to impress me but this was just mediocre.The acting is extremely sub-par and this is especially disappointing because Kate Mara is in the cast. She delivered some pretty good roles in "Nip/Tuck" and "Jack & Bobby" but she goes through this movie, along with the rest of the actors in an incoherent storyline that shifts from scene to scene with no depth. It's hard to care about the characters at all. They just float around with seemingly no purpose. I even almost quit watching the movie halfway but being the avid horror fan I am, I had to continue.There is only one really cool death scene that gave this movie 1 star. It involves a pretty girl and a spider. Most of the rest of the death scenes are just retreads of urban legends the characters talked about in the past two movies. The film even has a cameo scene from "Final Cut" in which a character is watching a porn on the TV.Overall, not even worth a rental. Luckily for me, I didn't have to waste 3 bucks because it was available for free on my Comcast ON Demand.</review_text>
This item is supposedly titled "UFOs: The First Encounters." It is, however, an episode about reincarnation. It is incorrectly labeled. DO NOT PURCHASE unless you are looking for an episode on reincarnation</review_text>
This is bring to your notice that the product that i have orderd has not reached me yet. I request you to do the needful.Thanking youPrince Georg</review_text>
Dont purchase episode 5 of season 2, it's 7 minutes long and you dont get any of the Charlie Murphy Prince story.  WTF!!!  Can someone fix this and refund or offer the entire episode for re-download!!!</review_text>
This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence</review_text>
I was very excited to see another Valentine horror movie coming out; the last one I remember was My Bloody Valentine about some Cole Minor named Harry Nabob or something like that, very bad film.  But Valentine looked like it would be good and it was actually until the ending.The pretty boy being the killer again is just played out.  Scream was good everything else is just redundant.  Imagine if the geeky boy who was attacked by the bullies actually got burned or his face was horribly deformed in a fall or something like that.  He goes to the mental institution and years later he escapes or is released into society, but escaped is much better.  This masked figure then chases down the mean kids and kills them one by one, then the climax when we see his face it shows the reason he is so angry and deranged.I give it 2 stars because it could have been so good and I can always pretend the ending was good</review_text>
Oh the HUMANITY!...First, the obvious: Tara Reid as Cybill? I don't know who in the film industry owed whom a favor, but it is a mystery how that happened.Secondly, Dominique Swain just didn't act like the Andrea Marr of the book. It seemed like Dominique Swain didn't even read the book before she played Andrea. I also happen to think that she is a very poor/mediocre actress all around, but that's another topic.The movie didn't have any similarities with the "feeling" of the book, even though the plot was (roughly) similar.Portia DeRossi as Carla? Ummmm.... maybe?Selma Blair as Darcy sort of worked.The only character I felt was well-cast was Todd Sparrow.Anyhow, I re-read the book a few more times since seeing the movie, to try to recapture the feel of the book (and erase the memory of the movie)</review_text>
I bought the DVD based on all the positive reviews, and I think prospective buyers should be warned that not everyone finds this a 5-star movie.  My husband and I, who love old movies, hated it.  My teenagers just found it completely uninteresting.  It was apparently made about the time Alaska became a state, although it deals with an earlier time period, and the movie has not aged well.  The story was uninteresting, the direction was uneven, the comedy (mostly bar fights) felt forced and awkward.  Stewart Granger did not seem to know what he was doing or why his character was there.  Fabian's acting was unmemorable and we felt Capucine was miscast.  We got bored and spent half the movie pointing out to each other how little the sandy beaches and desert terrain looked anything like Alaska (it was obviously shot in southern California).  I gave it two stars because I was able to sit through the entire thing, but I spent most of it asking myself "why?  Why am I wasting my time like this?</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
I bought this movie because I thought it would be like the movie version of Louis L'Amour's "Conagher". Unfortunately, it is a far cry from that movie. The Quick and the Dead was too predictable, the dialog was stilted and unrealistic, and the characters...well, they were too much "in character" and not believable. I am curious how faithful the script was to the book. If the movie is as faithful to the book as "Conagher" was, then I apologize to the movie makers and will hold a grudge with Mr. L'Amour instead</review_text>
i didn't even see this movie and I know it sucks.  All that I had to see was Bon Jovi and I threw the video to the ground as hard as i could muster at the video store where i was promptly kicked out.  It was worth it though, it actually was offensive that such a thing could exist.  The vampire genre could be so awesome and yet very few films live up to its potential.  I guess it also lends itself to complete drivle such as "Vampires - Los Muertos"</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
To begin, I am not a big fan of Cary Grant, EXCEPT in his Hitchcock movies, where he was excellent. And I enjoy him much with Katharine Hepburn in Bringing Up Baby. He was very good in The Eagle and the Hawk with Fredric March. He was tolerable in The Philadelphia Story and Talk of the Town. A friend of mine loaned me this DVD; she just bought it. I had wanted to see what Cary would do in this film, and I wanted to see him in the dress. From the start, the movie was SLOW and BORING, all the jokes were so lame and not at all funny. I also don't go for films where the man and woman yell at each other and dislike each other, and then at some point realize it is really love they feel for each other. Come on! I just can't understand that sort of romance situation. I felt Cary showed that "mean streak" he can show in some of his films, in the romance situation of this story. I rate this one star because it was one of those films you get bored with right from the beginning and it is sort of torture waiting for it to finally end. All the while I kept saying, "Let's move along, let's end this thing, when does he put on the dress?..." but they dragged it out on and on and on and on with boring,corny jokes. And the part we wanted to see, Cary in the dress, was at the VERY end and not very much at that. Overall, this film was a real disappointment and letdown. The only consolation was that I saw it for free; I didn't have to buy it or rent it. Still, I wasted good time that I could have used in a more profitable and enjoyable way. I would even have enjoyed washing a kitchen full of dirty dishes more than watching this movie!  To sum it up, a VERY VERY BORING and DUMB movie, not to waste your time on.</review_text>
Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show</review_text>
Curious as to why Amazon would charge for this content when CBS offers it for free on the official Survivor Website.  Yeah, at the CBS site you have sit through 4 commercials, but it is worth it to not have to download any extra programs</review_text>
This is only a portion of this episode.  It cuts off in the middle of a sentence</review_text>
When Pokemon first debuted, I thought it would rock, and Misty, Brock, and Ash would stay together as a gang forever, and Ash would love it to just be walking around the world, earning badges, etc., and that's the way it would stay. Maybe even Ash and MIsty would fall in love! But, nope. The dudes who are creating these movies are sucking kids in with exclusive Pokemon cards, and the animation is just getting cheaper. This movie is totally different from the original movies and the TV series, and it sucks. I'll hold on to the older series and DVD's, but, nowadays, Brock and Misty are gone, and it's just boring without them. For those who agree with me, get the message out there that Pokemon is going down the tubes and it stinks. Bring back Brock and Misty!!! IT WILL SAVE THE SERIES! Oh, and I'm only giving this movie two stars because they went so far as to make a movie about something so ridiculous, with so much change, and so little things the same. :-( Boo</review_text>
Oh did this one stink.  Convoluted and confusing, the buildup to the conclusion was positively endless.  I didn't laugh once</review_text>
No, it's certainly not as good as the first one, but I did enjoy some of DEMONS 2. The beginning is cool enough, with the demon's resurrection and it's gaining access into Sally's apartment via the TV set. The tension and dread seem to build quite nicely. That is, right up to the scene where the kid-demon's chest pops open to reveal an idiotic, rubber demon puppet! Ugg! It reminded me of those stupid monsters in GHOULIES, HOBGOBLIN, or some other wretched '80s mess! The apartment building setting was interesting, but seemed to be mostly wasted on the few, precious bursts of action we actually get. I did like the weightlifter folks in the gym. They were hilarious and at least they put up a fight against the infernal invaders! The battle in the parking garage was ok too. Maybe I just expected D2 to be a bit more frightening and disturbing...</review_text>
I don't write many reviews, but this movie was just so pitifully lame that I felt it was my public duty to warn you about it. The fact that Amazon tries to bundle it with "House of 1,000 Corpses" must be some kind of joke! The dialogue and acting don't even rise to the standards of a made-for-TV movie. The cops don't look, talk, or act like cops, and the lead detective/protagonist works damn hard not to express any kind of personality (his only emotions appear to be boredom and irritation).Also, though they try to sell this as a horror film, it isn't. This film doesn't even try to be scary. The first half is a boring, brainless detective story with robotic detectives tracking down a pretentious Buffalo Bill-esque sociopath (Dee Snider). In the second half, our psycho gets released from prison, apparently reformed, but after the townspeople try to lynch him he goes bad again and has to be put down for good.What really makes this a waste of time is that our psycho isn't even a killer. He captures his victims and tortures them for a while. And the torture is nothing terribly gruesome, either. His idea of torture apparently doesn't go much further than sewing his victims' mouths shut and giving them unwanted piercings. Then the cops find them and haul them off to the hospital. The only victim he actually kills dies accidentally. This dung heap of a movie is just not scary, and not worth your time</review_text>
I just had my two and a half year old son evaluated as having SI.  The therapist recommended this book.  I found other reviews interesting and was immediately put off by the cover I am looking for whatever positive help I can get.  I wish more was known about this condition.  Or that I knew of a support group as I don't have any family who live anywhere close around me.  My son has an amazing memory and is very lively and outgoing.  He also has extreme tantrums and throws things and seemed to get really fustrated so some of the SI checklist definetly applyed and made sense.  He also is very keyed into me and I can't even get in the shower or go to the bathroom without him getting upset.  Some of what they state didn't seem to fit him though like he crawled and walked early and seemed to have good co-ordination eating with a spoon or fork?My husband and I definetly need to understand how to try and change or help things in the home situation.I think it was a bad marketing move to create the cover they did as it creates such a negative reaction</review_text>
I have bought 2 seasons of Survivor on unbox and both of them are not complete. Very dissapointing. Guatemala  episode 11 is from a completely different season and it is missing the last 2 episodes and the reunion show. Just leaves you hanging. Exile Island is missing the final episode it just goes from the competition between Danielle and Cirie for a spot in the final 3 to the live reunion show</review_text>
This is still to this day one of the most aweful films i ever saw. I took a girl ona  date for this movie and wow, what a mistake. The movie has no real plot and just gets worse as you watch it more.</review_text>
I wish that Amazon can get it right, that when you create a service you do  not have to go into some's computer and screw around, Shame on you Amazon for allowing this to happen. I guess I will have to purchase an Apple Ipod and go with I tunes. It appears to be a much better product and service</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
Someone just today told me I should see this film.What a disappointment to see these warnings of poor quality DVDs being produced by Fox Lorber.Oh well</review_text>
I recall this movie fondly--Unfortunately, the DVD quality is so poor, this cannot be watched.  Pity Amazon does not allow negative stars the their ratings.  Don't waste your time until someone cleans this up.  But it makes a nice coaster, though</review_text>
Will someone PLEASE produce a DVD/VHS re-make of DIVA with the excellent sound quality deserving of this film!? I was so excited to finally find this movie, but quickly realized after reading reviews from fellow fans, that it would be a disappointment and waste of my money to purchase it. I hope the word gets back to whoever reproduced this movie and they'll re-issue a quality DVD and/or video soon</review_text>
Movie got 2/3 through and just quit. No problem, this is Windows right? Just reboot and start where you left off. Only for whatever reason I can't restart this movie from anywhere but the beginning. I'm not going to watch this moving over from the beginning just to see if it fails in the same place again. Only a couple bucks, but definitely not worth it</review_text>
Dear Quentin,How are things going, man? I heard about the new film with Uma. Sounds great.Did you see my newest film "Lucky Numbers"? I play Russ Richards, the local celebrity weatherman in Harrisburg, Pennsylvania. Russ has adoring fans, his own table and omelet at Denny's, and a snowmobile dealership. Due to uncommonly warm weather, his dealership is about to go under, crumbling his entire financial empire. Out of desperation, he pays a visit to Gig (Tim Roth), the owner of the local strip club. Gig suggests that Russ and his `friend' Crystal (Lisa Kudrow) rig the state lottery. Crystal works at the same station and pulls the numbers out for the lottery. Crystal is all for the idea. She has also been dating Dick Simmons (Ed O'Neil), the station manager and he has been neglecting her. Her share of the winnings will help her break free. Everything, of course, gets complicated.Funny, huh? It has it's moments.Quentin, you know that I like to work with people I know. It makes me feel comfortable. Acting is hard, man. I need comfort to help me create my characters. Nora Ephron directed the film. She and I worked together on "Michael", which was pretty successful, so I was hoping lightning would strike twice.I really enjoyed reading the screenplay. Basically it combines elements of dark comedy and farce. People act weird, some people die, people are mean to one another. But they also act really silly. I haven't done a lot of farce but I laughed when I read the screenplay. My track record with comedy is spotty, but if someone has the $20 million and a decent script, I'm game.Lisa and I are great together. She plays someone that is very different from her well-known persona on `Friends'. Crystal is very different from Phoebe. Crystal has an edge, a determination that makes her very interesting. Crystal has a few moments that also make her seem real, a very important factor in a farce. If the character doesn't have at least a tiny grounding in reality, the farce doesn't work. Lisa gets this and makes it work. I get it, too, and made it work during the scene in the Denny's... In the scene in the snow mobile dealership... In the scene at the television studio when they reveal that someone was killed... In the... Well, I know I made it work somewhere. I'm no film historian, but it works.The supporting characters are top notch. Michael Moore plays Crystal's dimwitted cousin. He is very funny. Tim Roth is good, but doesn't have a lot of laughs. But that's OK. He's primarily a dramatic actor anyway. Actors should play to their strengths. Michael Rappaport plays a local thug. He's all over the place. Hell, most of the supporting cast is all over the place. That's OK, because this is a farce, right?I know reviewers will pick up on the fact that everyone in the film is greedy, unlikable and they really don't like each other. There isn't really anyone to care about. That's OK. These characters are based on real people. They don't need to be likable. They need to be funny. They are funny. Aren't they? Sometimes? Yes. They have some funny moments.Nora is a great director. She has a good hand at comedy, especially farce. Every farce I have ever seen has too many laughs. You're laughing when another joke happens. You can't keep track of it all. Thankfully, Nora has slowed everything down... Quite... A... Bit. Her pacing is glacial. But I like that. I have the ability to laugh at the jokes.Quentin, I'm just not sure. I've had a string of dogs lately. I'm not a good actor. I'm a movie star. I am a persona that draws people into the movies. They shouldn't expect my performance to be subtle or even well-modulated. If I'm playing a local celebrity weatherman, I'm going to play it for all the smarminess I can. I'm going to mug and grin at every character that recognizes me. I'm going to wear the local fame on my sleeve and when things start to go wrong, I'm going to shake, rub my head, run around in circles, really frustrated. I can play characters. But lately, people haven't been coming to the films. "Battlefield Earth" was a disaster, but to save face, I told some news people that I thought it was good and will make a sequel. I am a powerful star, a member of the $20 million dollar club. I can't go back to the under $10 million club. I just can't.Quentin, you are the king of creating comeback vehicles. Can you start thinking of another comeback vehicle for me? I know you can. I think that I may need another comeback in a year or two. Start watching the old videos, OK, pal? For me, Quentin?Thanks, buddy.John</review_text>
WARNING: MOVIE SPOILER BELOW!!!I confess that my primary reason for buying a copy of this film, is grounded in recent history. I was around in the early 80s, when L. Ron Hubbard and his Scientologists were going full-bore with the logistics of making the book into a movie (the hero depicted on the original edition of the paperback looked like Chuck Norris, or so I thought), when all of a sudden Hubbard died, and the whole project apparently fell apart. Back then, I was close to 20 years old and I was curious about whatever it was that these Scientologists were turned on to that was supposed to help improve a person's quality of life... then I read about Larry Wollersheim's 1985 lawsuit. You can figure the rest out for yourself.Anyhow, oh, yeah, the movie... the storyline is your basic alien invasion number, i.e., the Invaders arrived to make life miserable for the poor humans (in this film, the aliens look a lot like the Klingons from Star Trek), until your typical dashing young male hero organizes a band of his fellow humans to rise up and tell the Invaders to get off of our planet. Pretty simple and straightforward, but hey, there are other films MUCH worse than Battlefield Earth, and they've taught me that if you have good enough special effects, even the lamest sci-fi storylines can work!The thing that stood out about this film, though, was its reliance on everyday talk and contemporary cliches for much of its dialogue, and as a result, it came across as rather corny... a film to be recommended for its comedy value, rather than for things like epic space battle scenes. Also, the "bad guy" aliens use some sort of psychic power to interfere with the minds of their human subjects, in order to keep them from organizing revolts... I must say, trying to depict mind-manipulation effects on film does pretty much the same thing to the movie as varnish stripper does when applied to a CD---it turns it into a confusing, incomprehensible mess! A couple of times, the picture would break up into a concentric blur, and I'd wonder what the heck was supposed to be going on.How the makers of this film ever talked a great studio like Warner to help them film it, is something which will forever remain a mystery to me. I remember just before this picture opened, a group of Scientologists were trying to hype it: "oh, watch---this film is going to be bigger than Star Wars and Gone With the Wind combined!" You can guess what happened when those staggeringly huge box office numbers never materialized... can you say "oops"</review_text>
Do yourself a favor and read the book and dont even look at this movie</review_text>
For a 2-disc, director's cut, my expectations were perhaps too high for this DVD.  Nevertheless, I was appalled at the poor quality of the transfer.  The colors were dull throughout, and focus was frequently not at the beginning of scenes.For the movie itself, I don't agree that it is holding up well over time.  At 25 years old, the movie just has limited entertainment value for people who aren't waiting for their beloved canceled TV series to be on the big screen.There's no question that II and IV are the best of the series, but comparing it to other Star Trek original cast movies isn't putting the bar very high.My interest in watching this again was just having finished Melville's Moby Dick, the final scenes of which Khan repeats liberally during the final space battle.  That said, I think Montalban was fantastic as the revenged-obsessed Khan and very evocative of Ahab.  However, Shatner's pretentious Kirk just becomes more grating as time goes on.  The original cast schtick just doesn't make for a compelling drama</review_text>
I remember seeing CHILDREN OF THE CORN right after reading Stephen King's short story version in his classic book, Night Shift. I was excited because King's story was such good scary fun. Well, I watched the movie and was amazed at how awful it was. While the short story had a building atmosphere of dread and horror, the movie had an atmosphere of pure cheeze. King's story was short (like 10-20 pages) and sweet, w/ sinister children and a mysterious god / monster in the cornfields. The movie has a town full of annoying brats and a cheap beasty that caused much eye-rolling and laughter. The running time is 90 minutes, including about an hour's worth of padding. COTC would have made an excellent addition to one of King's anthology movies like CREEPSHOW. As it stands, it's bloated and pretty boring. Of course, Linda Hamilton is in it, which is why I gave it an extra star...</review_text>
This has to be Stephen King's worst work adapted. This adaptation is even worse than Needful Things. Children Of The Corn (I am talking about the original and not the crappy sequels) was miles abouve better than this garbage. Just a stupid movie adapted from a lame book. Just plain trash</review_text>
Rule number one if you're making a Stephen King movie, especially if it's a TV movie; make it scary or don't make it at all!  THE TOMMYKNOCKERS fails to do this miserably!  For most of the film, you're watching a lot of green light and a lot of silly inventions.  Granted, that's all in the book, but it written chillingly by King in a way only he can do it.  There are some exciting alien moments at the end, but by then it's too late.  You've just spent three hours watching a bad knock off of an X-FILES episode.On the plus side, I had no problem watching the infamous Traci Lords act like like a total slut!  Bless her</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
This is another Hollywood costume epic. They spared no expense with the set and costumes, hired talented big name actors Rex Harrison, Liz Taylor and Richard Burton. Despite the resources committed to this film sadly the film was more stylistic than substantive.Harrison was terrific as Gaius Julius Caesar but he is only in the first half of the movie and Richard Burton does not come across as a great Mark Antony. His character is weak willed and he is harassed and henpecked by Cleopatra, Antony was passionate and reckless but henpecked?Although the film is titled Cleopatra, it focuses more on the historic events.  The film also reduces Cleopatra to the woman depicted in Octavian's propaganda rather than portraying the real multi-dimensional woman who was intelligent, a gifted political strategist, expert linguist, dynamic personality and who ironically was not a beauty.  They don't give you sense of what was so compelling about Cleopatra.   She is depicted as a combative shrew with both Caesar and Antony. I doubt constant conflict would have gotten far with either man. If you took away her looks would either man have been attracted to the personality portrayed here?  I would think not especially considering both their backgrounds as Roman military leaders and the weak position of Egypt compared to Rome.Given the limitations of their vision of Cleopatra Liz Taylor was perfect choice to cast as the selfish, beautiful, seductive and glamorous temptress; she really breathes life into this character and gives a great performance.   Although a portrayal of the real person would have been much more interesting you can't deny Taylor's appeal and she does a great job considering the limits of the material.  Although Taylor shines sadly we never get to know Cleopatra her depth managed to get lost in this oversexed Hollywood costume drama.This movie was lush eye-candy without a whole lot of substance; in fairness to this project it fits in with similar epics of the 50's and sixties - the style reminds me of DeMille films like The Ten Commandments. It did capture the public imagination because it launched the relationship of Taylor and Burton and ultimately despite its issues and because of their star power it turned a profit.The research, writing and the Directors vision should have each contributed to creating a great film instead it produced this mediocre costume drama.  The real shame is that in the hands of someone with a vision and a passion for the subject matter it could have been great.</review_text>
I'd give this movie a negative star if I could.  AVOID this movie. It's terrible. Not one positive thing could be said about this movie</review_text>
Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..</review_text>
"Red Water," a made for television film starring Lou Diamond Phillips and Kristy Swanson, carries on the now long and wearisome tradition of ripping off "Jaws." You would think that nearly thirty years after Steven Spielberg's project arrived in theaters filmmakers and producers might move on to another genre. You would be wrong. Every year brings us even more "animal gone wild" flicks, everything from sharks, octopi, whales, snakes, bears, rats, ants, birds, cats, dogs, dinosaurs, crocodiles, alligators, and genetic laboratory experiments gone horribly awry ripping their way through a fresh crop of hapless humans. If the creature in question has sharp teeth, claws, wings, talons, tentacles, and pincers expect to see the monster in question appear in a low budget, straight to video knockoff of "Jaws." Sure, there are elaborations to the standard plot lines, none of which significantly improves these rip-offs, but all of them owe a big debt to Steven Spielberg's film. For example, "Red Water" tries something a little different by having a freshwater shark terrorize people on a Louisiana River. It also inserts a plot thread about a gang of criminals recovering a stash of money from the riverbed. None of these ideas disguises what is really going on."Red Water" is the story of John Sanders (Lou Diamond Phillips), a down on his luck fisherman with an ex-wife, horrific memories of a disaster from his days as an oil drilling technician, and loans on his boat he can't afford to repay. At the same time Sanders dithers with the bank about his delinquent loan payments, a shark somehow manages to enter the river and promptly wreaks havoc on swimmers, fishermen, and anyone else who manages to get in the way. Sanders could care less about the shark, primarily because he doesn't know about it at first and also because his ex-wife Kelli (Kristy Swanson) just walked back into his life. She's a scientist working for some big oil company that is drilling for natural gas on the river, and she knows that John is an expert on this sort of thing. Whether you buy the idea that a scientist would go by the name "Kelli" is another matter. Sanders eventually agrees to help out when he learns that the oil executives will pay him handsomely for his troubles. After all, he'll do just about anything to bring in enough cash to keep his boat. What none of these people know is that they will run headlong into several sharks, one that swims and several that walk around on two legs.The movie switches focus long enough to tell us about some Jamaican criminal who lost a ton of money in the river when one of his underlings dropped the box containing the cash in the water while eluding the authorities. This guy hires some mercenary thug, along with a goon named Ice (Coolio), to go track down the subordinate in an effort to persuade him to reveal the location of the cash. And wouldn't you know it? The site just happens to lie right near the oilrig where Sanders and Kelli eventually show up! What follows is incredibly predictable: the criminals take over Sanders's vessel because they think these guys angling for the money, a disaster occurs on the rig that claims the lives of several workers, and the shark turns up to chow down on a few of the principals. How predictable is "Red Water"? Not only is there a Cajun chap helping out on Sanders's boat, we get a few scenes of a Cajun party complete with music and dancing. Just in case you aren't aware that you should laugh at these hicks, the script throws in a few lines comparing the party to "Deliverance." How clever and original is that? I'm starting to get real tired of seeing this sort of prejudice in films and television shows. If you put any minority group in the place of these Cajuns and did the same thing, the outcry would be deafening.It's not the overt prejudice of the Cajun scenes that sinks "Red Water"; it's everything else. The venerable Lou Diamond Phillips hasn't made a good film since...well...I can't recall, actually. I quit following his career after "The First Power." As for Kristy Swanson, I was surprised to see her here. I remember her star rising in the early to mid 1990s, but at some point she fell off the radar and, if "Red Water" is any indication, into B-movie purgatory. It's sad, really, because she's not that bad of an actress. Coolio, on the other hand, goes over the top in his role as a thug looking for some money. If I had known from the start that this guy was in the film, I wouldn't have watched it. Aside from the performances, or the lack thereof, the production values are low, the pace drags, and the film has the propensity to put the strangest dialogue in its characters' mouths. I really, really wish I had written down some of the odd lines uttered by Phillips's character. I remember watching the movie and thinking at the time, "I should write that down and use it later in a review." For some reason, I didn't. Probably because I just wanted this thing to end quickly.In another bizarre turn, the movie carries a 'R' rating even though there isn't much bloody carnage going on. The only extras on the disc, fortunately, are trailers for "Bats," "The Big Hit," and "Ride or Die." If you're really interested in watching creatures attack flicks, there are plenty of other bad movies to choose from, most of them unintentionally hilarious schlockfests that manage to entertain on some level. "Red Water" is too bland, too confused plot wise, and too full of actors on the downhill slide of their careers to be entertaining. If you decide to head up this river, good luck to you.</review_text>
I watched this movie, seeing that it was a "shark" movie. But where's the shark?? The plot is these people are hostages. The shark is just there so us shark fanatics have a reason to see this awful movie. But I was watching going, "okay, they're in the water, where is the shark???" Even JAWS 3, (which sucked) has more sharks. If you like hoatage movies, see this. (on second thought, don't...) But if you like sharks, see something else</review_text>
This movie was ok. I do prefer The Messenger starring Milla Jovovich. Milla is exceptional in that version</review_text>
This review may sound pretentious and ignorant, but in truth I'm a big fan of British history, so bear with me!Even as a film itself, it's surreal, and I don't like the acting.  But as with any historical film that includes the British, they're made out to be the absolute bad guys!  Sure we were forging an empire within France (i.e. The Hundred Years War), but rapists and murdering pillagers!?  Never!Historically accurate, full of British sentiment, and down-right weird.  Avoid this film today, folks!</review_text>
Rule number one if you're making a Stephen King movie, especially if it's a TV movie; make it scary or don't make it at all!  THE TOMMYKNOCKERS fails to do this miserably!  For most of the film, you're watching a lot of green light and a lot of silly inventions.  Granted, that's all in the book, but it written chillingly by King in a way only he can do it.  There are some exciting alien moments at the end, but by then it's too late.  You've just spent three hours watching a bad knock off of an X-FILES episode.On the plus side, I had no problem watching the infamous Traci Lords act like like a total slut!  Bless her</review_text>
Just awful slasher picture with not one hint of real talent behind it. The first movie I ever walked out of,and I was home!!!! THE PITS!!!!!!!</review_text>
Why should one buy this series? What about the missing episodes? Are they going to be added later, or this is it? I cannot believe this. Would you buy a bicycle with a missing wheel? Or a keyboard without the C and R keys? I'd like Amazon to explain its customers what it plans to do..</review_text>
I've seen all of Elvis' movies, most several times.  This is one of the worst.  Only Stay Away Joe and Harem Scarem are worse.  I usually watch every Elvis movie every time it comes on TV, but not these three</review_text>
The first film was much better than R.E. Apocalypse; more gore, better acting, better presentation overall, and it was done with a lot less money</review_text>
For those of you interested in seeing a delicate and sensitive portrayal of a S/M relationship, I would highly suggest the Japanese film, "Moonlight Whispers" over "Maitresse." That film is a gentle coming-of-age film with male sub/fem dom theme, while "Maitresse" is a somewhat confused film about an ex-con who stumbles into a dungeon and a (highly unlikely) vanilla relationship with a dominitrix.The ex-con cannot deal with "her career" eventually and threatens her to quit, etc. (At some point, you get the idea that the director himself really doesn't understand where the Domina is coming from.)What started out as an interesting film with a provacative opening soon falls apart about halfway through. The writer/director seems to lose the narrative thread of the film and things degenerate with the ex-con wanting to buy the dominitrix out from her protection (or pimp, for want of a better word). Then, we watch as the ex-con -- in a totally unrelated and gratuitous foray -- goes to a slaughterhouse, where a real horse is shown killed onscreen, strung up and stabbed and drained of blood as it kicks helplessly (this image will upset you for weeks, believe me! [I feel like it's my duty to WARN YOU!]). And the film gets even worse from there and finally ends up with a ridiculous car accident and the two main characters laughing like idiots. Totally stupid (like the writer/director suddenly ran out of ideas).Believe me, I really WANTED to like this movie. I ignored the negative reviews, because there are so few "real" films on this subject. But I was sorely disappointed and depressed by it.If you need to see this film, rent it. It's definitely a "one view" film at best; and it will be a film that will leave you angry (because the horse scene) and vaguely disgusted -- and generally bummed out. Too bad."Moonlight Whispers" is a much better, respectful treatment of S/M, a film with real characters and nuance -- one that seeks to explore real psychological (and sexual orientation) questions, while also being a beautiful film to watch. That film deserves to be seen -- and a wider audience!</review_text>
I wish I had read the other reviews first.  Though the quality of the episode and the video are top notch, the episode cuts off after 22 minutes.  Obviously, I already know the ending of "The Black Death", but I still wanted to see the full show</review_text>
Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show</review_text>
In the early going, I thought the choice was between four and five stars.  As the movie progressed, my rating dropped to somewhere between three and four, so clearly the first half of the movie is better than the second.  The ending was so disappointing that I had to drop my rating to two stars.It is about a Polish man in France who marries a French girl but is divorced by her because he is unable to make love to her.He returns to Poland without her, manages to get rich, and comes up with a plot to get revenge on his beloved Dominique.  The problem with this writing is that he loves her, so why is he plotting revenge against her?  It is senseless.The ending is utterly surreal.  She should hate him for what he has done to her, but she is smiling to him.  He is looking at her and crying.  He has betrayed her in a cruel way.  He doesn't have the right to be crying for her.  That is like Hitler crying for the Jews.  He is still in a position to help her out, but he won't.  It's really pretty sickening.The story becomes unclear enough as it is, without adding some fantasy scenes or memories about a wedding and a kiss.  It left me angrily saying "What the hell is going on?"  I really hate it when a director becomes unclear and plays with the audience.  I don't find that cute at all.  Tell the damn story and tell it clearly.  Besides, the ending sucks</review_text>
Lame! Lame! Lame! Corny sexual humour. No wonder it tanked- if the Amazon.com thing is true. Because it's bad. Don't watch it unless you think e*ections are one of the funniest things in the whole entire world</review_text>
I downloaded the player and this episode as part of a promotion that gave a free episode. Not only did I get charged, but when I cancelled the download to contact about the charge - I was told I had to finish downloading before they could refund. Once it finished downloading, it didn't play anyway. I gave up.</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
"Cyrano" is one of the greatest verse plays ever written.Unfortunately Gerard Depardieu is no Cyrano.  He's a great, clumsy side of beef, not a shining flame encased in the middleweight body of Hercule Sevanien Cyrano de Bergerac.  With the best will in the world, his performance seldom achieves adequacy and never brilliance.The English translation was especially commissioned for this film.  It is undistinguished, prosy and dull.  It has little of the wit and less of the poetry of the old standard translation commissioned in the 1920s by the great American actor Walter Passmore.Get the Jose Ferrer version.  This one's a dog</review_text>
A director who has no idea how to film dance sequences? An important song transmuted into God knows what? Mis-casting galore? A female star without one iota of chrisma? (If she stopped 3 shows cold they must have been high-school productions!) This is...or should have been...about the struggle to not only get a job on Broadway but to hang-on to that which is starting to fade. The all important role of Shiela seems little more than an after thought. Turned into a silly love story (which doesn't even play!) it is merely sad. Sad...and very, very BAD!!!(the one star rating is because I HAD to rate it!</review_text>
Recently I read about the revival of "A Chorus Line" on Broadway. I've never seen the Broadway show or any other staging of it, so I thought the movie might give me a sneak peek.  Well, somewhat disappointed here.  I can only assume that the stage version, with its long-running reputation, must be better than this film.  It's not that the film is a total debacle, but it's only mildly pleasant -- and quickly forgettable.  Even songs which I had heard before, like "What I Did For Love", were reduced to barely a mention in the film.  The film seemed to lack any real point.  A bit of a yawner.</review_text>
This movie was even more ignorant (in a bad way) compared to that other movie THE STUPIDS and I thought that movie was ignorantly bad as well. The name of the movie (dumberer) explains how retarded and unfunny this movie really is. The old dumb and dumber movie with jim carrey and jeff daniels is way better than this sorry excuse for comedy + it was part of a classic comedy which made lots of people laugh. Don't waste your money on this sorry excuse for comedy if you like dumb and dumber go for the unrated never before seen film of the old dumb and dumber instead it's worth every penny for comedy fans</review_text>
I'm a fan of NCIS, but living in australia means that the episodes and dvd's area released months behind those in the USA.  Why is this only available to those in the USA?</review_text>
Will not play once video was downloaded. I get the error message:  "can not play file, please try again later. error# 0x80040273" I made the exlusive give me call me back feature but the UnBox department was already closed, I was told the UnBox Saturday and Sunday 6-5 hours. I have to say I am impressed with the Call back feature. I downloaded the Unbox Beta now and am recieving email assistance to try to resolve the problem. Thanks Amazon UnBox! I will Update again - Feb. 10,200</review_text>
This movie is more dark comedy and trippy foreign bizarrovision film than dyed-in-the-wool Zombie Fest.If you were like me, who isn't well versed in the foreign horror movie scene, this movie was entertaining, but not what I'd consider something I'd add to the library (thanks NetFlix).One thing I've found with Italian horror movies.....they spend alot of effort on visual trippery, seems they want every Italian movie to be an art film, and this is no exception (same goes for the Argento films of the past).  Its not a bad thing, just a distinctive style that you either buy into, or you do not.  An awful lot of strange things happen for no real apparrant reason :)  A little bit of sex (again, in that erotic italian artsy style), a bumbling mentally retarded sidekick, and a whole lot of strange, implausable things happening.  And then eventually, the movie ends.The story is definately more love story / dark comedy..its entertaining, has a few minutes of zombie suspense but its almost wrong to call this a horror film, because its really not.</review_text>
this movie started out good but then got all mushy with the action and the gunfire. good snowboarding stunts, and the cast is great, Sawa looks a little scruffy looking. like I said, with the snowboarding and action, dont mix well and it gets muddled when the badguys come alon</review_text>
I thought thet this movie was the WORST movie ever based on the talent that was involved.  I don't think that Yuen Wah could have been any worse.  Jet Li was pretty good, but how the hell do you screw that up.  Tsui Hark seemingly didn't rush through this movie, but it still turns out horribley.  I would like to go on to explain how the movie was so bad, but I'll just sum it up by saying that not a single part in this movie could have been any worse</review_text>
I have to wonder what world, what physical plane, what state of mind were the reviewers here who gave this a good review on? Or maybe they are Full Moon employees LOL...First of all, the movie, especially one of the earlier scenes, was identical to the 80's flick "The Unnamable", which is also and HP Lovecraft based flick. The castle freak itself looked like a bad halloween rubber suit. When he breaks out his cell, well this was just hilarious, it reminded me of the incredible hulk. Yes, Jeffrey Combs is in it. But his acting is cheesy as it can be. Hunt down The Unnamable instead, a much better movie</review_text>
What a shame this DVD transfer is so aweful, because the movie is great. I have seen this movie before on SBS TV (Australia) and have been wanting a copy since. But this DVD looks like a transfer from an already poor quality VHS copy. Very disappointed</review_text>
Dont dwnld " Survivor, "Thunderstorms & Sacrifice" ". Its my fault for not reading the whole thing. you would think that the last episode would be the finale , but NO, its just a 10 minute recap going to the finale 4. I didnt even get a full 45 minute episode. No finale. I got rippped off. $1.99 dwnld not well spent. Dont bother dwnldng any episode of fiji if you dont know the ending. Because they dont have that episode, not even the reunion show</review_text>
The episodes in this series have an average running time of 50 minutes. This one happens to be only 18 minutes. This mean sthat the file abruptly stops right in the middle. Even though it only cost me $2 I still got jipped.  Let's hope Amazon can iron out these kinds of problems before they get this service farther underway. Be careful enough to sheck the running times to be sure they seem accurate before you buy them</review_text>
To put it succinctly, Brendan Fraser is a college senior who ends up writing a ridiculously long thesis, which is then swiped by Joe Pesci, the homeless dude who, predictably, is really quite wise.  The problem is that his "wise" sayings aren't really too wise; he's like the guy you know who is always trying to sound intelligent, but doesn't really know that much. Joe Pesci's character is pretty annoying.  That's probably why he ended up friends with Brendan Fraser's character</review_text>
This is one of the most offensive and anti-gay movies I have ever seen.  Don't let the title or the box fool you.  Every character in this movie is oozing with homophobic sentiment.  I was shocked that such a film could come out of France.  If you're a homophobe and want to sit and watch a bunch of hateful people sit around and attack and harass (verbally and physically) a man who pretends to be gay to save his job, then rent this and snack on a can of worms.HIDEOUS</review_text>
the complaints about this dvd release are all correct. great movie, low qaulity release. yet i'm surprised no one has mentioned the thing that angered me most, the self censorship. the bataan race scene where ustinov swaps the bataan for a bottle of beer. we're ok to witness a pirate being drunk, but a sports commentator saying a teenager is running with a bottle of beer is beyond appropriate?  what are the execs at disney thinking? if they need to put out a disclaimer by leonard maltin befor showing such "questionable" material as they did with many of the vault collection... fine, but stop chopping up the movies. our ten year old children are not buying these movies, many of us were actually alive to see the originals and no we're being ripped off. stop angering a loyal fan base with this ignorance. keep this in mind when you contemplate the inevitable release of a cleaned up widescreen version of this title</review_text>
This film is a documentary, not a movie.  For those of you who admire European films with honest, casual nudity, this film may not be for you.  European films with honest, casual nudity usually are non-pornographic in content.  This film brings the anatomy down to a degrading level.  If you want to view this film, fine, but be prepared for some tears and nausea.  This film is not for the faint-hearted.Though here in America we do need to let loose our prudishness when it comes to casual nudity, yet, to Europeans who tolerate young children being victims of sexual exploitation I ask, where are your child protection agents, your social workers, your law-enforcement agents, your religious leaders and, for crying out loud, the parents?I admire Europe's easy-going ways when it comes to casual nudity, whether on the screen or on their beaches, but when you view this film, you might think that a lot has to be said for the way we protect our children in America against sexual exploitation.  I cannot think of a more vicious, sinister crime.  I believe the body has a soul, only these young lads were cheated out of a healthy outlook on the body, let alone a normal, healthy childhood.  My poor heart just cries out to them.  I practically saw the devil through that pornographer in question.I was going to rent "Angels, But Not Angels," but this film, and "Mandragora", were enough for me</review_text>
This was my first download of this type and also my last.  I did get it to play with my desktop where I downloaded it but moving it to any other machine has been a nightmare.  There are too many software restrictions and even a legal attempt to buy a new licence is fruitless.  The machines keep freezing up.  The idea is nice but the technology isn't there yet</review_text>
Even though I am not a Sophia Loren fan, I thoroughly enjoyed her perfomance in these 3 different short stories about 3 totally different women. Anyone born before 1940 should enjoy them as well</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
This film is about a female student at Randolph University in Alabama in the early 60's who is a writer for the school newspaper.  She gets caught up in the civil rights movement and gets into trouble for writing in the newspaper articles favorable to the civil rights movement.  It could have been a decent movie, but I found the acting and the dialogue so superficial and uninvolving and unconvincing.  A much, much better movie on this theme is The Long Walk Home and also The Ghosts of Mississippi</review_text>
Let's face it. Nothing anyone says can sway a particular fragment of this movie's viewing audience one way or the other. Those who love J.Lo will declare the greathess of this movie, in a variety of ways.  Those who hate J.Lo will counter their every point in describing how bad it is. And those who love quality film won't waste too much time even recognizing that this movie even exists. Guilty pleasure, indeed! One thing you have to admit about J.Lo, she's consistent. She sings bad, acts bad, and is merely eye candy, for thoe who find her appealing. And this movie is full of all of the above, plus awful, cliche ridden, emotionally pleading writing that should be an inspiration to anyone with Hollywood writing aspirations, since this movie demonstrates how little talent it takes. At least it's had it's short, but sill way too long presence on the premium movie channels, cause for a while this piece of garbage was ubiquitous, just like the lead starlett. Maniupulative only begins to describe this drek. But that said, it's more than enough time wasted on this movie. I merely felt compelled to warn folks. Don't waste your time. It stinks</review_text>
I live in the UK and Amazon doesn't allow me to download ANY off the NCIS shows. This service should be open to all amazon users......!!!!!!</review_text>
This series is being sold with missing episodes, like many others here in Unbox. Do they think their customers are so dumb? Would you buy a DVD series with a missing DVD? What sense does this make? What a disappointment this service is..</review_text>
